1: I was waking up at abt 3AM with severe migraines 3 to 4 times a month.  Since taking this I have had only 2 headaches in 6 months. I am very pleased with the results and am not groggy in AM.
2: My neurologist prescribed this 15 years ago for cluster headaches.  I only took 12.5MG each night.  I've never had another headache.  Also, I noticed that I had no more attacks of irritable bowel which was a great bonus.  Because I, ve taken it so long I have decided to go off of it.  I cut my pills in half.  This is my second week doing that and I plan on doing it for another week, then 1/2 every other night.  It's dangerous to just stop taking it even though I had the lowest dosage.  I've had 2-3 nights of tough sleeping but I'm going to keep doing what I'm doing.  This medication worked very well for me with no side effects.  I was surprised to see such high dosages that other were on.  I am a 58 year old female
3: i got this to help me sleep  the after affect is drowsy  i stay that way all the way until i m about to take another of the pills  i don't want a pill that has drowsy affect on me  to help me sleep
4: I didn't take them as I thought it just might induce seizures? Is this true?
5: Sleep disturbancecause by frequent  need to urinate. !0mg before bed  gave me a deep,undisturbed sleep for 7to 8 hours.
6: it works great.I don't get headaches any more, and i have no side effects, but once in a while i forget to take it.
7: I took this for depression, neoropathy and help sleeping.  During 1st dose, taken at bedtime, I had nightmares and hallucinations all night.  Can NOT try again. It could have helped with lots of ongoing problems.
8: I felt like I was on methamphetamines.. not a good feeling for me. Army doctors just give medicine to just give it...
9: I will NEVER use this drug again! I had nerve pain after a procedure, so I was prescribed Amitriptyline. It was HELL coming off it with brain freeze headaches, crying, short term memory loss , confusion and sleepless nights was nothing compared the other mind warping stuff! From what I have heard about the hippie LSD, well , it could have been that!
10: Small increase in energy level, but wish it would restore my energy level to normal.
11: good
12: I sure do sleep better
13: Been on 20 mg for about 6 weeks.  Dr prescribed this for poor sleep and fibromyalgia pain which are both related.  Neither Ambien nor Lunesta were effective.  This does the trick but I sleep 10-11 hours daily.  Am also now having a problem with shortness of breath, dizziness, and lightheadedness.
14: I used Pamelor in 2006 for a bipolar depression, and it really helped that depression, however, I realized during the time taking it I didn't have a migraine.  So, I will return to this med to prevent migraines that are occurring almost daily.  Constipation and dry mouth are worth it.
15: I've been taking this med for a little over six weeks for chronic migraine episodes w/ aura, especially around my period. I started w/half the 25 mg pill, working my way up to the 25mg. Well, my headaches were a bit better in the beginning, but now are returning just like prior to starting the meds. My neuro recommended going up tp 50mg, I tried it and I was an absolute zombie the next day. I've also started having trouble urinating. Btw, I've still  needed fioricet on and off throughout the time I've been on the elavil. Bottom line, like so many of us, the med helped for a little while, but now I'm going to have to get off this and look or something else. The search continues:(Read More Read Less
16: I started on this medication 2001 and have been very happy with the results except it makes me drained in the am hours.  I take the smallest dosage avalable with controls my migrane but makes me feel sleepy and tired.  I have been happy with the results except being tired.
17: So far its only making my headaches worse. Don't like it at all
18: I just stopped taking amitriptyline about a week ago after taking about 50 mg each night before bed time. I would like to know how long it takes to get it out of your system. I am finding it hard to get over the effects of detoxing from it.
19: My doctor prescribed this for migraines about 4 years ago. Since that time, I gained about 50 lbs. I couldn't figure out why until it dawned on me! The weight gain started as soon as I started Amitriptyline. I am now off this drug and trying to find a new treatment that works.I still suffer from migraines....but now, I just started on Topomax- and I have new doctor! Keep your fingers crossed that I lose the mograines and the weight for good!
20: Easy to take but did nothing for my pain. Also can NOT sleep a night.
21: My mood improved but the side effects were very prominent. I was somewhat manic. I could be easily irritated and I got extreme road rage. I was yelling and screaming obscenities at the other cars. I gained 15 pounds. I don't feel full and I just want to eat. I had dry mouth before but this medication made it so much worse.
22: I ws prescribed for sleep therapy. I take 3 50mg a night. I only sleep 3 hours a night. I take 7.5 (2) hydocodone. 2 klonipin and 3 amitriptyline a night. I i still get only 3-4 house a night. Oh and I gained 25 # in 2 months. I'm only 5'2' and I weighed 125 when I started. It isn't a good as seraquel, but was dreamy to me (I loved it`it did it's job however, I gained 25#. And made me stupid for the firist 3 hours I was awake the next morning. Plus i was verrrrrry consitpated.
23: When I first started taking this medication to hopefully decrease the number of migraines I get, it pretty much only helped with my insomnia. The dosage was increased to 50 mg I think, and it helps most times with the insomnia (but not always) but there are times when I still wake up with a migraine that is an 8-10 on a scale of 1-10. Like waking up with a hangover although you haven't had anything to drink. So honestly, I don't think it's working for the migraines. I recently started taking Fioricet for the migraines because Excedrin Migraine caused an ulcer. Although amitriptyline and fioricet can have adverse interactions, I don't think it's too bad. I also started tracking my moods because when I went on vacation for almost 2 weeks, I couldn't take it. When I started back, for like a week and a half to two weeks, it seems like I was easily agitated and irritable. It's better now I think...I'm still tracking.Read More Read Less
24: my symptoms of anxiety have gotten worse since I have started taking this drug.
25: Yesterday I had three dizzy spells. So bad I couldn't even move. Nausea, broke out in a cold sweat. One spell lasted for 2 hours. Evidently this drug has serious side effects for me. Only 10mg at bedtime. Now what?
26: I had experienced migraines from a young age my life was horiable with them and then my dr. put me on this i only suffer from 1 mabe 2 a year.
27: I was put on amitriptyline for migraines that my doctor thought might have caused my stomach problems. I didn't see any changes in my migraines or my stomach issues, but it did help me fall asleep faster. I had to stop taking it because I had a very hard time waking up while I was on it.
28: internal bowel disease that was diagnoised by the doctor
29: I was having severe migraines and my doctor prescribed this medication. It has worked great other than the side effects. This medicine makes me feel depressed,not wantng to be bothered with my husband or children. It just makes me not feel like myself. Going back to the doctor to get a different medicine.
30: Dr. prescribed for a combination of sleep aid and antidepressent. It works great as a sleep aid. I have a terrible time falling asleep and can never sleep thru the night. This medicine helps me do just that. I do feel drowsy in the mornings for a couple of hours. I've started to take 1 pill 2 to 3 hours before bed, that's helped with the morning drowsiness.
31: I started taking this medicine almost a month now for migraine prevention and lack of sleep. I have gained some weight since being on it, which I do not like.  I am having the same amount of headaches, but not severe migraines.  I am going to stop taking it because of the weight gain.
32: I take this drug for sleep.  I also conveniently noticed a reduction in my migraines.  This is a great drug with the exception that I crave food constantly when I am on it.  If I can fix the weight gain problem this drug is the solution- killing two birds with one stone.
33: I went on this drug because I was experiencing tension headaches after a fall and then sleeplessness and anxiety.  Directions say 1 pill for a week then two pills. Works fine to help me sleep so never went to two pills. Doc didn’t tell me about staying hydrated and constipation. Bad roids. Had to get off and then get back on. Have been drinking water eating well and exercising  and drug has been a great help. Groggy and a bit foggy in am, but sleep through the night mostly and less anxiety.
34: I had tetanus(lock jaw) a rare disease to contract in the u.s. these days i almost died from it in Nov, I still have bad jaw pain my dr gave me this med 50mg, i hate it I feel like i'm starving all the time, im irritated, and it doesn't help with the pain my doc put me on it before in a small dose, told him I had no luck so he moved the mg's up not sure why and it still does nothing.
35: As long as i kept taking this medication on a regular basis it worked really well. More than two days of it though i would feel extremely depressed and at times suicidal
36: I take this med for fibromyalgia and sleeplessness. Since I started, I don't sleep any better. But, I feel more depressed than before and I don't want to do anything! I haven't been to the gym for 2 weeks; and I need to work out because of the fibromyalgia. Has anyone else had this problem?
37: Just got this pill today and after reading just 100 reviews. The bad reviews outweight the good. I am not going to take this pill...
38: well, I started taking 25mg 4 days ago.  I love that I dont have anymore headaches, so far.  Funny, other symptoms I have that I didnt really mention to my doc like history of bulimia, OCD issues, and ADD seem to be better.  Except for the fog I get after I take it...no more staying up all night watching tv. (must be working).  But this dry mouth is A PAIN IN THE... Hopefully that goes away.  I am worried about reports others wrote about trying to come off the drug and my fingers feel a little numb. not too bad, I could live with that over no more migraines, I had them once or twice a week and they were really pretty bad.  But, I should mention I liked my ADD symptoms so if I keep being so rational and slow, I may come off the drug. LOL! I need to get stuff done!!! and I am cool as a cucumber! Of coarse I will have to ask my husband and kids what they think, but I swear I am easier to get along with. :)Read More Read Less
39: Taking this medicine for Tension Headache relief. It is working for that but makes me a little groggy in the morning and some nightmares. I have also had had weight gain in the stomach. Always hungry. Did put me in a better state of mind (more positive). Tried to see if tension headaches were gone and did not take med for a weekend but they soon returned. Possibly looking for alternative treatment. Something with less side effects.
40: I have noticed since I have been on this medicine I have gained weight. Dose this medication cause weight gain?
41: I was prescribed this med. a year ago due to insomnia, restless leg, and migraines.  The med. has worked very well for the insomnia and restless leg, but not really well for the migraines.  I have gained weight this last year but I thought it was because of my low tyroid.  After reading the reviews at this site, I realize it is this med.  I am now taking a lower dose and may eventually wean myself off it and try something else because of the weight gain. At least now I understand why I have put on weight even with exercising and dieting!Read More Read Less
42: Was placed on this medication for; headaches,RLS, and insomnia. With in three days I was in the ER. Thought things were coming out of the T.V., was screaming so loud at night my neigbors called the cops, and lastly a loud ringing in my ear that is just enough to drive one crazy.
43: I have used this for four months. and i love it. The trick is to take it at least three hours before you want to go to sleep. I crave sweets, am thirsty. Gained 15 lbs. the first time. Stopped for three months am back on.I do like the weight gain.  I love that it helps me get a restful sleep. And i'm ready for the day when i awake. Feel nice and relaxed all day. Haven't had a bad migraine while on it. The trick for me is to roatate days taking it. and it keeps me mellow and focused. I feel like me again
44: I was prescribed 10 mg of Amitriptyline last month because I don’t sleep; I have chronic pain from Degenerative Disk Disease, PTSD, Night Terrors, and Depression. I came home from my doctor’s appointment and I looked this drug up on WebMD and started reading reviews, I ended up back at my doctor in tears trying to negotiate a way to not take this drug. She reassured me that this drug was safe and the very best option for me. I take this drug in combination with Hydroco/APAP5-500MG ”Vicoden” and Fluoxetine-20MG “Prozac”. 10 MG of Amitriptyline helps me sleep and it’s supposed to help block the pain receptors, so far I seem to be in more pain then what is normal for me but it’s still new, we might need to adjust the dose to see if we can achieve that response. I have needed to take more Vicoden then I am comfortable with but so far I’ve had more rest then I’ve had in years, even on the nights when I have that wide awake sleep I’m still resting, huge difference for me. I no longer wander my house at night, even when I wake up sometimes as many as six times a night I am able to just roll over and go back to sleep. I’ve had none of the scary side effects that I read about on this site and am adjusting to this quite well. I love being able to go to bed and sleep!Read More Read Less
45: Doc prescribed this for my insomnia. Didn't work at all. Got even less sleep with this stuff. As my grandson says "I was wired".
46: I have just got thos medication perscripted to me today. But, after reading on the side effects, i am almost scared of taking it. I went to the brain doctor and he perscribed it to me. To me it almost seems like the worse medication that i ever had. But, idk. i'll give it a try.
47: I take it for insomnia.I have also fought depression since the loss of a child several years ago. It helps take the edge off, but I wonder if the mg should be increased. I take 50mg now and I still have a struggle going to sleep and not being depressed.
48: Taking for sleep problems. Had to build up for several weeks had to take the 20 and find myself CRAVING food...sweets esp but anything will do. Not continuing use. Has to be something better that won't do this to me.
49: I take it to sleep for my fibromyalgia, if I didn't take it, I could not sleep at all..
50: I've suffered migrane's for 25 yr's and taken many, many prescription's to no avail  until my phy. prescribed amitriptyline 25mg  at bedtime (Elavile)and Topamax 50mg twice daily it has been a blessing.
51: Formerly, I would toss and turn all night because of painful knees, and back aches. My sleep had been disrupted for over 5 months. My arthritis doctor prescribed amitriptyline HCL 25 mg. for use at bedtime. I have been sleeping soundly ever since. Dry mouth is bothersome at times, however. Day time sedated feeling. So far so good.
52: Before I found this medication, I had a migrane on a daily basis. I am so grateful I found this so that I can function. Now I only get a migrane when I have my period. It has also helped me be more even tempered, but it does make you very tired. I suggest taking it a few hours before you want to sleep and are just relaxing at home. It takes a while to get used to the drowsiness. That is my only complaint. Otherwise I have really been helped by this medication.
53: I was given this for pain and sleepless nights, however I found no relief for either. after two months 25 mg,I had trimmers and involuntary movements. watch this medication and keep in touch with Dr.
54: I was prescribed this drug for insomnia.  I take a 10mg dose right before bedtime.  I don't have any trouble going to sleep, but can't stay asleep.  I have to will my eyes open and pry myself out of bed as I feel drugged.  Feeling lasts for several hours.  I don't know why I was prescribed an anti-depressant for insomnia, but I am not going to take it anymore.  I would rather be exhausted than drugged.
55: It seems to be helping the migraines, but a few days after starting the med, I began to experience dizzyness when moving my head. Also, when standing up I am dizzy for a few seconds.
56: i am taking this medication for headaches
57: I was prescribed this med for depression and insomnia. After the first week I have never felt better. I wake up calm and rested. I had already been prescribed,Wellbutrin w/Ambien no help, cymbalta no help, lexapro no help. This drug has allowed me to get the sleep I had been deprived of since I quit drinking 3 years ago. I recommend this to anyone who has tryed all other anti depressents to no avail.
58: This medication was taken in 50mg dosages for me nightly but it made me gain over 50 pounds in less than 4 months. I was having high bood pressure problems and I was almost 200 pounds
59: I was given this to help with sleep difficulties and depression/anxiety.  It works well.  I sleep alot better.  I haven't noticed a difference yet in my depression but I am giving it more time.  I would recommend this to amyone with the same conditions.
60: I was also on Prozac for Depression, but the Neurologist did not think that the combination of these two drugs would be bad.  Never take them together.  My headaches did not go away and I was on Suicide watches.  I had severe mood swings.
61: I am a Marine that just got back from Afghanistan and I was having a lot of problems sleeping because of how I had trained my body to constantly be awake and alert. My doctor prescribed Amnitriptolin and it worked like a charm. It took about a week and I was back to a normal sleeping pattern.
62: My 12 year old has complex migraine disorder.  Other than migraines & chronic headaches, she also had vertigo & very disturbing altered nerve perceptions.  She's been on it for about 3 months, and it is the 1st thing that has worked to slowly get rid of all her symptoms.  She's sleeping better, has much less anxiety due to her nerves going awry, is finally smiling again.  She has had zero side effects.
63: I had this medicine for over two month. very easy to use, safe, and effective for my sleep disorder.
64: My doctor prescribed me this pill for my headaches. Although, this pill is mainly for depression, it can cause worsening. So far, my headaches have not gotten better, but I just started taking this. Even though I am overweight, I see all the comments on here about it might make you gain weight or even make you feel weak, I don't think should be recommended to people with bulimia or depression since you never know what could happen. But like I said, just started this, so all your comment are going to thought of in my head, hopefully I don't get memory loss like the one person did, I can't remember things as it is, and I really am afraid of what it could do to me.Read More Read Less
65: Does not work for RLS! I've seen no results. This medication caused me to break out on my arms and back. I've also had suicidal thoughts due to it. I would not recommend it!
66: I have been diagnosed with chronic migraines for a year now.  I was originally gived Depakote & Topomax, which seemed to work.  I lost 40lbs due to the Topomax and my headaches were down to 1-2 a week, taking Vicoden as needed for pain.  About 10mos into it, I started losing my hair.  I told my Dr I was freaking out about it & stopped taking both.  Headaches aren't too bad, manageable.  Checkup he prescribed Amitriptyline for headaches & to help me sleep with Maxalt as needed for pain.  I just got it filled & am very nervous to start taking it.  I take Ambien now to sleep, so I don't have a problem w/that.  The reviews are negative.   Honestly, I'm scared to start. I had 2 horrific nightmares the other nite and that was w/o any meds.  Should I even start?  Or say heck with it & stick with the occasional Vicoden to help with the pain?Read More Read Less
67: I just had one 10mg dose at night and next day afternoon I had hallucinations, i was searching my python programming code in grass as I thought I lost my code in grass. It made me felt crying, I thought I am in different world and out of my mind. 
Never take this drug in nerve pain like symptoms, for me I took it for tennis elbow pain.
68: Have severe itching
69: worked for pain, but made me disoriented and foggy for 2 days after 1 dose. no longer take it.
70: Felt out of control, couldn't think straight so I stoped taking
71: I've been taking this medicine about 6 months for nerve pain. I have bilateral carpal tunnel and severe nerve pain. Previously, I had taken Gabapentin which I hated the side effects so I only took one. After that I took Paxil which caused me to have glitches, tremors and very high blood pressure. Finally the doctor said she wanted me to try Amitriptyline and I can say that it took maybe about 4 days or so and I really started feeling relief but then, I noticed that the 25 mg stopped working after about 2 months and had to go up to the 50 mg which also worked about 2 months and now taking 100 mg. It also has the ability to deal with depression and anxiety and I can say that while it works beautifully in conjunction with my Wellbutrin, it also silences me and makes it difficult for me to want to carry on a conversation about anything and with anyone. I feel as though I'm blank inside
72: I have diabetes and was having bad feet and leg pain at night. I know longer have pain.
73: Had IBS and fibromyalgia and arthritis was a mess from pain, this drug gives me restful sleep and better outlook, have no side effects and life is way better, has been three years now and no longer depressed like l was due to endless pain.My IBS is managed now and l sleep to restore coping with chronic pain. I have just increased dose from 10-25mg as my pain has increased, use biotene toothpaste to keep teeth healthy at night due to dryness it helps
74: Made my thoughts more vivid and did not help
75: I have taken 50mg for nearly 2 years for neuropathic pain, depression and insomnia. I always read the reviews, but I've learned I need to check back.  I've just been told I need to have nearly all my teeth removed from horrible decay from dry mouth! This stuff really helped with the insomnia & pain at night (however, weird dreams & sleep walking - cooking, washing dishes, eating, etc.)  I'm not so sure about helping the depression.  I drink a lot of water (up to and over a gal/day). Just started craving sweets (dr. said the new steroid may be doing that) & gaining weight.  Dr decreased dose to 25mg. I'm starting that today.  I will update this.  Good luck fellow sufferers!Read More Read Less
76: I experienced chronic pain in my leg and lower back. My xray and MRI showed I had Spinal Stenos us.  I noticed on Mayo Clinic They suggested anti-depress en and I asked my primary care DR. about it and she prescribed it.
77: I have been on this drug for about 2 months now, unlike the other drugs i have tried it does not give me bad migraines. I take this for my fibromyalgia and oestoarthiritis. It doesnt make me sleep that much better, and if i take it to late it makes me sleepy during the day. how ever it does not take pain away totally and i still have flare ups and still have pain
78: Great antidepressant which helps with multiple different conditions like nerve pain, headaches, depression, sleep, hyperactivity etc.
79: I have been on and off of this med for about 2 years, every time I go off of it, I find I cannot live with the fibro pain and migraines so I go back on it. I have tried 3 other meds for my condition, none have worked as well as this med.  Within one dose I can feel my pain is less, plus I do not have the migraines, which is worth a bit of weight gain. I sleep through the night instead of getting up 5 or more times, I am a bit foggy in the AM but nothing more than what I am used too with the fibro. If you want a life without fibro pain or migraines than I would say this med is so worth the bit of weight gain. This is the only med that works for me in controlling my pain and migraines
80: I use this drug for my migranes and it helps with them. I dont have any of them when i take it. BUT!!! i have been having horrible nightmares and hallucinations at night. One night i started screamin thinkin all of it was real. It does help but i really hate sleeping now.
81: I had headaches...headaches every day for months.  I had all kind of tests done and this dr. prescribed this for me.  I have worked up to 50 mg and the headaches are gone.  Thank God for this medication.
82: I've only been on this for a few weeks for fibromyalgia, at first it knocked me out and I slept great and woke up sooner than usual and feeling better. I take it along with Tramadol so I'm not sure how well it works for the pain. Now I'm back to having a hard time going to sleep and waking up on time but its not every night so its definately an improvement.
83: I took this for migraines and it worked for about half a year and now it does nothing. I am up to 100mg and am still getting headaches every other day. It also makes me very dizzy and nauseous.
84: This treatment have helped me with stiff muscles
85: I have not noticed any of the side effects that others mention here. I do have ringing in my ears but I have had that most of my life well before I took this medication. I have fibromyalgia and this is the main reason for taking it. I also have IBS pre-elavil, and it did not get worse. I could not sleep well before and now I sleep much better with dreaming almost every night, mostly good dreams. I never had dreams before. I started on 25mg and after a few years needed to increase to 50mg. This works well for me and I have been on this med now for about 5 yrs.Read More Read Less
86: Does not help the depression.  Feel hopeless, restless, low self-esteem, lack of energy.  Occassional suicidal.
87: feeling of a parkensins type jerking at night, and anxiety
88: I've had RA for a couple years and have trouble getting "good" sleep. Only taken this one day so far I like it. We will see in a week or two how I feel. I am on so many other meds it is hard to know for sure which one is helping. I will post again.
89: Only downfall is that it makes you sleepy! Other than that - after suffering with cluster migraines every single day of my life for more than 20 years - I no longer have them. I can't say enough about this medication. It has changed my life and has rid myself of migraines!
90: A LAST RESORT MEDICATION GIVEN...STARTED WITH AN EARACHE, WENT TO A EAR NOSE AND THROAT DOCTOR....HE SAID ITS NOT AN EARACH BUT A PAIN TRANSFERRING FROM NERVES IN MY NECK......HAD A SCAN , AND TOOTH EXRAYS TO AND THEY WERE ALL CLEAR.....MEDICINE KNOCKED ME OUT FOR 10 HOURS! DOCTORS SAYS NOW DO 1/2 OF A PILL......
91: Using for both fibromyalgia and anxiety, and the headaches that accompany anxiety. Wonderful that it works for all conditions, the pain has virtually disappeared.
92: i have recieved no reliefe what so ever from this medication
93: I have depression due to finding out I have cancer.helps me 110%with my broken sleep working great.
94: I WAS TAKING PROZAC FOR YEARS & I DECIDED TO QUIT COLD TURKEY.  EVERYTHING WAS FINE FOR ABOUT 2 WEEKS.....THEN I FELT LIKE I WAS GOING TO SNAP!  THIS DRUG MAKES ME SLEEP VERY WELL & IT HAS CALMED ME DOWN.  IT WILL GIVE YOU A LITTLE BIT OF A HANGOVER THE NEXT DAY.
95: works ok
96: I suffer from advanced Scoliosis. I had not been sleeping more than a few hours a night for several years. I was at my wits end trying to control the back pain with no sleep. This medicine has really helped me to get at least 6 hrs. a night. It has helped so much with sleeping that I am better able to deal with the constant pain. I have had a few of the sides effects..numbness/swelling in hands. Dry mouth and blurry vision. But not bad enough to stop taking this. I highly recommend it for anyone with sleeping problems
97: I felt compelled to review this medicine b/c I have suffered from chronic daily headaches and migraines for years.  When it started to really impact my daily life (and that of my children), I knew I needed something more than my Relpax, Maxalt and the copious amount of ibuprofen I take.  My migraine meds work wonders, BUT they can't be taken every day, and I was sick of having a headache everyday.    I also suffer from anxiety, and one of my triggers is actually taking new medicines, so I was weary to try amitriptyline b/c I fear the side effects.    My PCP prescribed 10mg of amitriptyline at night, and I have ONLY TAKEN ONE DOSE.  For those that are afraid of side effects, I want you to know that, at least, in the immediate I have nothing negative to report.  I am looking forward to seeing how this works for me.    I woke up this morning, and could feel my head pulsating, BUT it caused no pain.  It was weird.  I slept well, not too hard or dead-to-the-world.    So far, this drug gets 2 thumbs up from me.  I will update after I've been on it longer.  I am hoping this is the fix I have been searching for.Read More Read Less
98: I have been on this for 2 yrs now. I take. It about. 4-5 hours before i'm going to bed. I fall to sleep easily. I wake up good. Get started with my day with energy and a great attitude.  I was on 25mg. Now on 50mg. They are a godsend to me. I think the key is taking them when you are ready to sleep. They make  me crave sweets which cause a little weight gain.  Butit WORKS for me.
99: MAJOR WEIGHT GAIN  80LBS  Unable to lose the weight while continuing use.  Huge help with sleep.  Man breasts.
100: Started taking this for neuropathy in my feet & legs.Took 10mg for 7 days at nite, then 20mg for next 7 nites. Have taken myself off of this.  Helps very little with my pain, but it makes me so tired all day I just want to sleep and sit. It has made me very moody, and don't want to do anything. Doctor wants me to take Nortriptyline 20 mgs once at bedtime, after reading the reviews, am very hesitant about taking it. I think I will pass and stick with my pain meds.
101: The only thing I have had problems with on this medication is timing on going to bed.  I have a 4 month old son and if I don't go to bed within 2 hours of taking my meds then I will NOT wake up for anything.  My boyfriend came home from work one night where I had stayed up too late and he was very concerned because he couldn't wake me up.
102: This med has helped me w/sleeping problems & also w/pain. I have gained some weight but didn't realize it was from the med. Makes me feel less anxious about that. I was told that it takes at least 6-8 weeks to have full benefit of the med. I'm at that stage now & will keep taking it as I think it does help. Especially w/sleeping.   No other side affects for now.
103: Have lost 2/3 of my hair and have constant dry mouth.  Have also gained 22 pounds since starting in Aug. 2006.  No longer helping the head pain.
104: I take this due to frequent migraines, I usually wake up with one. While taking this I went from having headaches 4-5 a week to maybe 1 or 2 a month. I also take Celexa for depression and this has not affected the Celexa. I am very happy with this drug. The only reason I gave 3 stars for Satisfaction is because I have a really hard time waking up from this. Super groggy and unfocused when I first wake up. Other than that it is great. I like the fact that it doesn't make me high.
105: I am using this drug as an antidepressent with all over body pain. I wasnt an imediant reaction. it has gradually gotten to the point that it is working.
106: My doctor prescribed this medication for frequent migraines. I take it in conjuction with 500 mg of magnesium and 500 mg of B2. The amitriptyline helps me sleep through the pain but has caused many problems for me including tooth decay,severe dry mouth, weight gain, anxiety, and increasing paranoia. I am in search of new treatment.
107: Is the only thing to help my migraines. Cut them from 4-5 times a week to 2-4 a month. But, I can't stop eating. I have trouble losing weight, but no trouble gaining. :(
108: Over all it works for me , but I get a lot of the side effect from it weight gain, confusion , dizzy, constipation , black stool. But it does work great for my migraines   . What should I do?  Midg
109: started taking this med when i had a constant headache for 6 months.  after taking med for 5 days my headache disappeared. after a few months i stopped taking it and within 2 weeks my headache returned. I took restarted the med and the headache was gone again within a few days.  the only side effect i have is that if i dont take it 12 hours before i have to wake up i have a hard time waking up.
110: I suffer from Vestibular Migraines and this medicine made me dizzier then i already am and caused tremors, Insomnia, hypotension and complete numbness and bladder pain. I couldn't function on it and had to quit.
111: I have had fibromyalgia since I was in High School.  I also have Migraines and Stabbing Headaches.  I was on Topomax for a while but stopped because it terribly effected my memory and my brain function.  I am on Indomethacin for the stabbing headaches but that did not alleviate the constant migraines.  My doctor finally proscripted this drug to treat my migraines and help me sleep through the pain of fibromyalgia.  This drug works great for me.  There have been no side effects and I have been taking this drug for 3 months now.  The only thing is that this past weekend I had to bump up to taking 15mg from 10mg.  I stopped being able to sleep all the way through the night.  I hope that in another 3 months I won't have to up the dosage again.  All in all, so far a wonderful drug for me.Read More Read Less
112: heart racing, blurred vision, spaced out on 50, 25 and 10 mg. Worst is constipation which I still have even being off drug for nearly 2 weeks. NEVER TAKE THIS RX!
113: I'm a male approaching 60. I've been taking this med for about 12 years, originally for nerve pain, then continued for insomnia which I've battled all my life. WHY is INSOMNIA NOT LISTED in REASONS for TAKING?? seems like it's about the #1 reason.     I've had some side effects - morning drowsiness, yawning, fuzzy vision, rapid pulse & palpitations, very deep sleep (can't remember dreams) yet still can't sleep a lot sometimes. These side effects are generally mild.    However, recently (about a month) I've been experiencing EXTREMELY DRY SKIN on my face, almost like a RASH. After I wash or shower, the skin around my forehead, nose, & chin is just shedding small dead skin dust(flakes). Shaving really irritates my skin and leaves my face RED & with WELTS. This condition only started recently, yet I really believe it is due to my taking amitriptyline. (have a doc appt. soon)    PLEASE, has anyone taking this drug experienced this RASH-LIKE EXTREMELY DRY SKIN.   Other than this possible side-effect, THIS DRUG HAS DONE MORE FOR MY INSOMNIA-RELIEF THAN ALL other medications & suppliments (except for Benzo's which are very addicting)
114: I asked my Dr for this drug, because I had chronic pain. Whether it is arthritis or spinal stenous as my MRI showed. It has helped . I started with 10mg and increased to 20mg on the fifth day and it did what  and more then I had hoped for.
115: I restarted Amitrip to help with IBS D. In the past this medication (5 - 10 mg,) has helped me very much. IBS being a mind- gut interaction can really benefit from this medication. Take at night.
116: It's worked for me.
117: I'm seeking out a drug that would treat my bulimia but not cause me to gain weight.
118: My Doctor asked me to try this medication about a month ago (because I was having trouble sleeping) but I have gained about 10 lbs. (which I'm not very happy about)otherwise... it has helped me with sleeping (I only take 1 25mg. tablet right before I go to bed.) I am not a depressed person so it wasn't given to me for that reason. I am concern4ed about the weight gain.
119: I took this med. for two weeks.The gradual side effects got worse. It reinflamed an infection in my mouth including a red flushed face and fever!Other symptoms were: sweating profusely,severe drowsiness and fatigue, and a general feeling of illness! Never again!!!
120: been using this med for chronic pain for 3 years 150mg per night to help sleep it helps me sleep but i get freaky nightmares  i can sleep about 6 hours compared to the 1.5 to 2 hour i used to sleep
121: Working good for nerve pain, migraines and depression but is making me hurt very bad in back where kidneys r at.
122: I was prescribed this medication for migraine prevention and trouble sleeping. It helps a great deal for the sleeping issue, but has not been effective for the migraines. My doctor and I are working on dosage and hopefully will see some success for the migraines. I do have VERY dry mouth and am searching for some relief in that regard.  Otherwise, good drug. I am optimistic I will find relief for the migraines.
123: I started on this med to prevent migraines and to get better sleep. I took the medication for three weeks,  slept well with it,  but got NO relief from migraines. I had horrible dry mouth on it,  a lack of appetite, but the worst side effect was constipation. A week and a half of dealing with constipation, taking two other medications to help me "go" and being in pain from it. Plus, it wasn't helping with migraines at all!  Very frustrating.
124: get to sleep faster
125: been on for over 12 years.  100 mg a night.  When I did go off, could not sleep.  I take this along with my anti depressants of well butrin, 450 mg of that.  Dry mouth seems to be only side effect.  Sleep  so much better at night.  Could not live without it.
126: Am using it for sleep.. I was up to 150mg but it effected me sexually.100mg was good.. Does anyone know how long it takes to get the higher dosage out of you??
127: This was given to me for migraines, but I have gained even more weight and I have this constant ringing in my ears and had a severe non migraine headache today, my whole head! I am going to quit this medication, not worth the trouble.
128: I HAVE BEEN TAKING THE DRUG FOR 3YRS AND I HAVE NOT HAD RESOLUTION ON TENSION HEADACHES. IT FEELS LIKE MY HEAD HAS TIGHTENED SINCE TAKING
129: Amitriptyline is fantastic. It helps in so many pays, to sleep all night, my migraines, my mood, and pain with Ehlers Danlos. I've been on it for 5+ years and gone off a few times. It also helps my lucid dreams/nightmares. It does make me hungry and slightly more drowsy in the morning but the benefits are substantial.
130: I was put on this medication for lower back pain, which hasn't worked. It has made me somewhat depressed and just not myself. It's made me very withdrawn and anti social. I don't like it at all...
131: it's hit or miss. sometimes it's effective, sometimes it's not
132: I began this for migraine prevention.  I did prevent migraines, as well as helped with restless leg syndrome.  However, after reading the reviews I realized this drug is why I gained 30 pounds in 6 months!  I was only on 10 mg. a night.  Even with diet and exercise I was still gaining.  I stopped the medication and am starting to lose weight - finally!  Overall I guess it worked for the headaches and rls but not worth it because of the weight gain.
133: in small doses, it works as an antispasmodic for IBS, and it has done wonders :-)
134: I have been on this drug for apprx 11 yrs now for my  REM sleep related to my Fibromyalgia. It works wonders, I can't sleep without it! And it helps with the nighttime pain. BUT, since I have been on it all these years it has put 30lbs on me! Seriously, I used to be 120lbs with never a weight issue in my life. And I am a "clean" eater. Almost a vegetarian. I've just been considering talking with my doctor to see if there is anything now on the market that can compare w/o this side effect. But it does work great.Read More Read Less
135: It has taken the sharpness of the pain away.Also I have been able to sleep longer , before being waken due to discomfort.
136: This is a scary medication. Taken for insomnia and anxiety.  I slept as if in a coma...and for the next three days, had deep ache in both legs, from hip to ankle. These are going in the trash.
137: I have felt really awesome with this medication, the Dr I now see has upped my pills by 10mg every week until I get the right dosage, I was on 50, the 1st Dr I saw said we will up it when u come off Zopiclones as I was having 5 halves a night & just come off them cold turkey, I did manage to with my family thankfullly, though I did get back on them, but back off again, the 1st Dr said if u go on them again u will find it a lot harder to come off them again, I didn't & my ex boyfriend has since moved out of Wgtn, so I don't need to see him again, & the problem has gone the 1st Dr couldn't even remember what milligram I was on & also told me something different every time I went, I certainly had no faith in him, I don't do drugs he said, why be a Dr then I ask u, am a lot better now even though he said upping them wouldn't help my migraines & they have too.Read More Read Less
138: suffered terrible nausea and dizziness.Made me feel weak & terrible all over.
139: 1st night had a dry mouth odd taste 2night couldn't sleep dry mouth and RLS 3night WOW felt like I had a seizure. What didn't hurt?  I didn't have that much pain b4 taking the medication. Was ordered to take at night and it gave me nightmares I was hitting my wife and scared the hell out of her. Would I recommend them YA tell the DR to keep them. Satisfaction is not on them but now the bad taste in my mouth and the headach but I can deal with that.
140: I have degenerative disc disease, Stenosis, osteoarthritis and shoulder inpingement syndrome and am also depressed. I was given this drug for its dual effect on pain and depression. The very first night about 30 minutes after taking my heart rate was fast and I was wide awake for about 2 hours. I had to supplement it with a muscle relaxer in order to get to sleep. This medicine did nothing for the pain, I actually awoke because of the pain in my lower back. I was already on this drug but at a lower dose it did not interfere with my sleep or heart rate. At 75 mg it certainly is. Sometimes trying to change ones medicine in an attempt to lower their narcotic pain medicine just doesn't work
141: After being on several antidepressants including Buspar, Wellbutrin, Clonodine, Cymbalta, and Prozac, Amitriptyline was the only one that helped me feel like myself again after depression and anxiety lasting almost a whole year.  Stick with the medicine at least for 6 weeks, which is when I finally felt better.  The dosage I was on of 100 mg made me even more depressed, so I finally convinced my psychiatrist to try a lower dose of 75 mg.  This worked perfectly and helped with my insomnia.  Aside from the constipation and dry mouth, I now have my life back.  I am also on secondary antidepressants of Trintellix and Seroquel.Read More Read Less
142: made me feel like i had a hangover the next day
143: Take small dose, 10mg, if unable to fall asleep in reasonable amount of time (1hour.)
144: I am having severe dry mouth! I have swollen lips and cheeks. I have been taking this med for 1 week. No pain, but very uncomfortable. Should I stop taking the med? Has anyone else had these symtoms?
145: I was prescribed 25 mg to take at bedtime for insomnia/night terrors related to PTSD. This is the first antidepressant I've taken that's put me in a really foul mood by effect, if not endogenously. I slept for 10  hrs, with vivid, unpleasant dreams. Was alert enough to get out of bed in the early afternoon and shower but too drowsy to do anything with the remainder of my day. But it's not a pleasant drowsy - it's this scattered, almost anxious feeling that makes it hard to concentrate on anything. Hope this gets out of my system soon. I've heard it takes awhile for the effect of this medication to kick in, but I don't want a repeat experience
146: I have taken this for anxiety/panic attacks  worked well...dry mouth severely now need dental attention. Also gained 30 lbs with this medication which of course makes me more anxious...I was a size 5 now I am 12/14 and I have been on this for 7 months. I am needing to get off of it, due to painful breasts and BAD stomach cramping, I am about to lost it here...and the dry mouth is insane..no ice chips or gum or candy will help this it is horrible.
147: This medication doesn't help me so much with neuropathy, however it has stopped my insomnia. I take this every night before bed and sleep like a baby.
148: Has helped with preventing migraines.  One side effect is weight gain.
149: in the morning i feel grogly it hard forme to walk i remember things i for got yesterday .....
150: med. helped decrease frequency of fibro. flares and has helped somewhat with the overall generalized tenderness I experience chronically.Has not helped with fatigue or mental fog.
151: I have been on this medicine for a month with no results. My headache is no better, I still cant sleep but it could be because of my continuious seizures who knows.
152: This medicine is for my 12 yr old (almost 13) son as a migraine preventative who's been having severe headaches (doc called them migraines, but he doesn't throw up or have to have total darkness and total silence). But now I'm noticing depression, and recently his blood pressure has gone up and he's had heart palpitations. We will have to find something else. My biggest concern is if this new issue with blood pressure and heart will be permanent.  I will be very angry at my doc if those symptoms don't go away!Read More Read Less
153: I went from Ambien immediately to Amitriptyline.  I have experienced no sleep and a bitter taste all over my tongue and in the saliva
154: It was given to me to help with my depression and to also help me sleep.  I would fall asleep but wake up an hour or so after and be up for the rest of the night
155: My physician prescribed this for me 40 yrs. ago for migraines. It reduced them 50% and as a second benefit, I never have insomnia. My only side effect has been dry mouth. I gained a little weight at first because I felt so much better, but then it leveled out because I was able to be more active.
156: severe leg pain do to hurniated disk c6. Drug helps with leg pain unfortunatly the tradeoff seems to be diminished sexual performance. Cant wait to get fixed!!!!!!
157: I believe I've had an allergic reaction to this medication. I've been so tired today so I had to take off. I just couldn't wake up. I plan on taking some benadryl tonight but I just don't know what will work for me. I am so unhappy with all these meds out here & nothing to control the pain I feel in my legs.
158: dr increased dosage pain is still very bad in hands now and legs and feet
159: The drug made be feel anxious and suicidal, and would uncontrollably cry. Stay away from it!
160: Had a lot of trouble stying awake. Flet bla, a good portion of the time.
161: I am on a low dose, 10 mg each night. I take it two hours before bed, for fibromyalgia. It does help me sleep, but I'm having nightmares every night, and wonder about my sleep quality. I have gained a minimal amount of weight, so far. I am on the fence about this, I don't know if the disturbing dreams are worth it.
162: I tried this medication for migraine prevention. I know it's also supposed to help with sleep which is another problem I struggle with, but this medication gave me severe night terrors! For a 2 weeks straight I woke up many times throughout the night in a sweat and panic. I stopped taking it and the nightmares stopped. My doctor said it couldn't have been the meds but I haven't had nightmares like that since. It also made me feel anxious, uneasy, rapid heartbeat shortly after taking it. I didn't give the medication enough time to see if it was effective with migraine prevention so I can't comment on that. I'll take my chances with a different prescription.Read More Read Less
163: blured vision and weight gain
164: I've had awful migraines for many years. I started out on 25mg which worked well until I was put under a lot of stress. We bumped it up to 50mg. I have maintained a consistent weight, even though I am working out. There is some constipation/diarhea, but it isn't too much. My headaches are gone, but if I forget to take it one day, they do come back. My doctor was afraid about me taking an anti-depressent at my age, but I have had no mood swings, no weight gain, no depression, no suicidal thoughts or actions. It made me very sleepy and lethargic the first month of taking it, but now I feel like my normal self. I am able to enjoy life as a college student migraine free and it feels great! This is all due to a PA that finally listened to what I was saying.Read More Read Less
165: Therapeutic levels
166: I have Complex Regional Pain Syndrome so I have insomnia neurological pain and depression which go with the syndrome, it helps with all three very well. I was oly sleeping for 1-3 hrs now I can sleep for 6 hrs/night. It helps with my neurological pain allot, why I am not painfree it does help
167: Have been using this medication to help me sleep.
168: I have took this for forever to help my muscle and skeletal problems and my depression.I heard it was a older drug for many problems.So I call it my cure all pills.I been on this medication way over 10 years.It works.
169: the only thing i have put on some weight and can't seem to get rid of it.
170: my doctor put me on this for pain it does not seem to help just makes me sleepy and i feel very groggy the next day all day long  i am suppose to take 1(25mg) at bedtime to help minuzie pain at night so i can sleep i sleep ...just dont ever stop feeling tired (spacey)...my doctor also had me on this for depression a few years ago and i had to stop taking it as i didnt feel depressed when i started taking it ..but need after i started taking it,i wasnt depressed ,but my doctor said i was depressed and didnt know it yet i was happy -go -lucky it killed my overall personality at that time so took myself off it  Read More Read Less
171: I started this medication after a few rounds on other antidepressants that didn't have an effect. Now after a few months I often almost forget to take it because I feel alright again. Treatment resistant depression and PTSD can be tough, and this was one of the last stops before trying an MAOI or SNRI. I never experienced many side effects except for an increase in appitite, which can definately be controled.
172: I started taking 10mg a night for prevention of migraines. It helped at first, but a few months later, I was getting constant migraines again. I started taking 50mg at night. I am sure to take the pill so I have at least 7 hours to sleep through it. I still wake up foggy and it lasts until lunch time. I am also noticing a shallowness of breath and rapid heartbeat. I am constipated. I have the ridiculous heartburn, which I had never had before. My sex drive has plummeted. I am a zombie. I have gained unexplainable weight. It does great helping you fall asleep, if that's what you need it for. I feel the electrified sensation that other people describe. I see flashes when I close my eyes. I had bad dreams at first but those quickly subsided. I wouldn't recommend this drug unless your symptoms outweight these side effects. I'm not taking it anymore, even though I am running out of treatment options for my migraines. It's just not work feeling like the living dead. (These side effects are very similar to the side effects that I felt taking Topamax, which is the reason I stopped taking it.)Read More Read Less
173: 150 milligrams helps me sleep longer and not get depressed highly recommend it.
174: I have been on this medication for 3 years.  It is a godsend!!  I am finally able to get a good night's sleep.  I have to make sure I don't take it too late at night though, or it is hard to get going the next morning. ( drowsy; fibrofog .  I did gain wait but I think the tradeoff is worth it.
175: I was put on 25mg of amitriptyline for chronic pain from endometriosis 3 days ago. I have a new born and have a difficult time waking up to feed him 3 times during the night and feel groggy and very sleepy till noon. Plus my boyfriend has noticed that after the first night taking it I was mean, irritable, and my emotions were out of control. I'm going to give it till the end of the 4 weeks to see if anything changes. Oh, another thing is, I'm bipolar and have a fear that I may go into a mania.  Read More Read Less
176: Was prescribed 25mg for the severe migraines I get from taking another medication. Took a week for it to start working. No migraines since however it feels like I take a sedative every night. I went from being able to hear my newborn sneeze to not waking up to him screaming top his lungs in the very next room. I stay completely knocked out what feels I slept for an hour or 2 waking up to 8 hours passed. If I have to get up before 8 hours I feel so groggy almost drunk like and even when I do get up for  the day it takes so long now to actually feel awake. I take it and within an hour you can’t even fight if you tried it will 100% knock you out cold. It’s been a few weeks that symptom hasn’t got any better. It’s also seemed to suppress my appetite I go 24 hours not feeling the least bit hungry. I also went from having all the patience in the world to being extremely irritable
177: 2010 originally prescribed to prevent nightmares experienced due to MS either 10 or 20mg as required.After admission twice within six weeks with thunderclap headache dosage raised gradually to 50mg every night.Now sleep better and have banished frightening dreams and hopefully, 2 months on, have not had recurrence of headaches. Had lumbar puncture and CT scan of head on both admissions to hospital to rule out bleed in brain.
178: Helped with my headaches/face pain, but made me crave sweets.  Also, made me sweat at work the next day.
179: After 35+ years of chronic migraines and the use of either too much OTC medications, Imitrix shots or oral medications, none of which effectively controlled the migraines, this simple pill removed most of my migraines.      I've used it for over three years.  And the difference has been amazing!  I was told it was an anti-depressant, and was told to only take it at night because of the side-effects. So I took it just before bedtime.  Half an hour later, I slept well, and woke up feeling fine (not drowsy).    Since I used to go the urgent care centers/emergency rooms at least eight or more times a year, this has been a blessing.  And my missed work days dropped off to nearly nothing.     If I do catch the trigger of a potential migraine, I take a low dose of prescribed Maxalt to lessen the effect of it, which has helped stop the migraine from getting worse. If I need to, I do take the day off of work to sleep and try to conquer it, and have not returned to urgent care center or the emergency rooms since.     This used to effect our entire family.  That is no longer the case with the use of this medication
180: Was prescribed this medicine to help with my depression/PTSS
181: the meds have relieved alot of the foot and leg pain I experience trying to sleep.With minimal drowsiness or other side effects.
182: I have been taking 10mg of this for about 6 months.  Have decreased my headaches tremendously, but have gained weight since starting it.  Have also been very sleepy during the day, even though I feel like I sleep well at night, since taking this.
183: discomfort with my toes ,do to diebetic damage
184: Just taking it, can’t rate it fairly, at this time.
185: I'm a 26 year old male dealing with episodic nausea and sometimes vomiting on a daily basis.  There were periods (usually between 7 and 9 days) before taking this drug that I could not keep food down, was always exhausted, and was extremely nauseous.      After having every GI test done in the book the doctors concluded that I had cyclic vomiting syndrome.  Even though I wasn't symptom free in between episodes, I've read papers where adults with this condition often aren't.      I've been on this drug for over a year now and have not had any really bad spells.  I still get daily nausea which is incredibly difficult on me, but at least I'm not totally incapacitated and can get some joy out of life.    Any person diagnosed with cyclic vomiting syndrome or any parent whose kid has this awful disease, this drug works
186: I was on this drug for a total of eleven days for Insomnia, Night Terrors, PTSD, Depression, and chronic pain due to Degenerative Disk Disease. I told my doctor after reading the reviews that I did not want to take this medication and she talked me into it. Worst Mistake I could have made! I didn’t even realize how bad the side effects were. I had two of the worst headaches I’ve ever had, magnified my pain, I was spacey and my body felt like an electricity charge that kept gaining energy. In the middle of our 12 year old son’s birthday party I started to breakdown by the time everyone left our home I was up against the wall in our bedroom with a death grip on our pillows, shaking, crying, screaming, my entire body was in a knot and I thought my head was going to explode. Thank God no one other then my husband who was scared to death saw it. After he managed to get me down I slept for 14 hours. I’ve been sick trying to get this stuff out of my system for the last week, clammy, night sweats, tired, miserable. I took it back to my Doctors office and told her to get rid of it because it wasn’t going back home with me! This is one drug I will be reporting the negative side effects of to the FDA.Read More Read Less
187: It is helpful in going to sleep.  I take it for that, but find that my mood has improved over the several months I've been using it.
188: i can at last sleep with minimal pain
189: I'm taking this drug to help with migraines.  I've only taken 2 pills so far and I have a very bad headache ever since.
190: I have a pintch nerve in my back and neck, and I went with the injections, in both places, and the neck I will never do again, it was very painfull, besides all the pain I am already in, I was given this med. and so far so good.
191: It hasn't helped with my headaches, but it has helped with my sleeping.
192: i was prescibed this for everyday use for migrains but it literally drove me crazy. the first day i took this i ran into walls and had no coordination. as i continued taking it i became a very angry person and dizzy all the time.i couldnt control it. i dont recommend this drug.
193: This did not work at all.. not amused..supposed to work for fibromyalga but didn't even touch it
194: Love that it helps with the migraines. Maybe had like 3 real bad ones since being on this. What Iâ??m not liking with this drug, is the weight gain. Iâ??ve put on about 30 pounds in about 5 MONTHS! Itâ??s insane. Most likely will be trying something new because canâ??t keep doing the weight gaining crap. (Gaining weight wouldnâ??t be a deal breaker, but thatâ??s just too much too fast)
195: I took 25mg for a week, then upped to 50mg for a week, and then returned to 25mg. I still have headaches, but I sleep good. I would say I sleep well because every morning is like going through a fog, and I actually NEED caffeine to finally wake up. Currently, I am considering jumping through other hoops to resolve these headaches, and this annoying "aura" b.s.
196: Does not meet the intended use critierea.
197: I have been on this for about 6 weeks and wanted to read reviews from others bc I was beginning to suspect it was hindering my weight loss.  I am so glad I am not alone.  I have been running and weight training more than ever in the past four weeks and I have gained pounds and it is not muscle! It didn't make sense and I was getting very frustrated.  My craving for sweets has gone off the charts which is so unusual for me.  Now I know that this med has got to go.  My migraines are less frequent and less severe and I sleep great.  However I am not willing to gain weight as a trade off.  Thanks to all for leaving your reviews, I now know that I am not alone.  Tine to go to the doc for a new med.Read More Read Less
198: I have been taking this medicine for about a year. Helps me sleep, Makes life so much better when you getting sleep, but doc prescribe to much and ended up with overdose, be very carefull
199: Taking this drug caused me to have acute gluecoma. I was literally hours away from losing my sight.Not enough warning was on the leaflet and I feel very very angry that this has happened to me. I am now facing months of eye treatment.
200: i got dizzy, dry mouth, and very sleepy
201: I HAVE TAKEN THIS MED. FOR ABOUT 8 MONTHS...150 MG...HAVING A HIGH TOLERANCE TO MEDS. MY DR. PUT ME ON TWO CAPSULES A DAY/NIGHT...SLEEP WAS WONDERFUL, BUT I STARTED HAVING PROBLEMS STANDING, WALKING, IT WAS LIKE I WAS STANDING ON SOMEONE ELSES LEGS...WELL LAST WED. I FELL...MY HUSBAND HAD TO DO CPR ON ME I WAS GONE...I ENDED UP IN ER. THIS MED. HAS HAD BADDDD THINGS WITH IT, ATLEAST FOR ME...WE DUMPED THEM N TOILET..NO MORE FOR ME..I PREFER UP AND ALIVE THAN DOWN N DEAD...BE CAREFUL USING THEM...I CAN SAY...THEY HAVE KILLED ME...THANK GOD MY HUSBAND FOUND ME...AFTER FALLING 12 TIMES N 6 WEEKS...SOMETHING HAD TO GIVE...SCARED CRAP OUT OF ME...Read More Read Less
202: I take it for fibromyalgia, I can now have a good night sleep but groggy all day and put on a stone in 6 weeks !! Which is making me depressed which seemingly causes fibromyalgia defeats the purpose. I feel so fed up, rather have the aches and pain than be obese and heavy as that makes it worse.
203: In 1 year of taking this medication I gained over 40 pounds! I finally saw my doctor and got weaned off this medication. After just 4 months of being off of this medication I have lost 25lbs! I had a hard time sleeping at night, exercising, breathing, etc on this medication due to the weight gain. For anybody interested in this medication it will make you gain significant weight. For warning!
204: I started taking 25mg at bedtime for Fibromyalgia pain. I was really happy to get sleep and I haven't had any side effects. Finally I found something that helps me live easier.
205: I started taking Elavil which is supposed to  be for a muscle relaxer for my neck, shoulder, arm, and hand which throbs most of the day and awakens me at night.  I am very light headed and nauseated when I get up in the morning and feel like I have overdosed on medication
206: Was prescribed for breakthrough nerve pain, 25mg used intermittently for severe pain episodes.  I use meditation and ibuprofen for most days.  This does leave me a little drowsy though now taking 3 hrs before sleep and 12 hours before I want to be sharp and awake, very positive overall on managing pain and getting sleep.
207: On a day to day basis, the neuropathic pain is reduced, but during a major pain flare it doesnt really lessen the pain in any sense. It also helps me sleep and stay asleep.I have not really had any side effects apart from some grogginess when waking.
208: I am tired all the time,Drymouth doesn't seem to go away, sudden mood changes.
209: can make you very drousy i use it for sciatica but very good.
210: weight gain?
211: I write this recommendation even though amitriptyline no longer works as well as it did when I began treatment. So, this is a cautionary recommendation: Once you commit to this medication, try to stay on it as long as your doctor suggests. DO NOT STOP taking it prematurely because you feel like your migraines are cured, because the amitriptyline will never work as well the second time around. When I began the medication, I thought it was an absolute miracle drug. The only side effect I suffered was sleepiness, but since the medication is taken at night, it didn't interfere with work or life. I told all fellow migraine sufferers I knew to try it. Then I stopped taking it because I believed I was done with migraines. Well, I wasn't. Without the med, the migraines came back with a vengeance, and now I need a triple dose to get any effect. I wished I had never prematurely stopped the medication. It is a miracle for migraine sufferers...try it if you can and stick to it. Oh yes, be prepared to gain some weight. Unless you incorporate this medication with a healthy diet plan, you will blimp out...it may take months, but rest assured, you will wake up one day and realize that you've become chubby. Chubby and migraine-free still equals happiness in my book.Read More Read Less
212: the 1st 2 weeks it was hard but each day got better took a month on 25mg it helped me.  doc wants me to try and raise to 10 more tried 5 more side effects are less this time but on 4th day couldn't sleep 3am not sure what to do next appt. in 3 weeks it has helped my symptoms worst problem dry mouth
213: Um, I was under the impression this drug was primarily used as a 'mood enhancer.'  ? Was I mistaken?
214: I Use This Medicine For Migrane Headaches  I Take 4 25mg tablets per dose and within'  40 mintutes after taking the medicine the  migrane headache goes away for 4 to 5 hours,  this is my experience on how amitriptyline  help with my headache pains.  Sincerley; Dave Neumeier,Jr Of Salt Lake City Utah.
215: After months of referred pain caused by C7  Radiculapthy. Started taking AMT. 40mg at bedtime and I am PAIN FREE!!!Love it! Have dry mouth but that seems to be the only side effect. I also used to get up 2x night  to go to the bathroom. I do not do that anymore. That is a great and surprising side  effect.
216: My mind would race horribly at night. I would take sometimes hours to fall asleep.  Since I have been taking this medication, when I lay my head down at night, I am sleeping within minutes!  I love it!
217: After going for 5-6 years with very little sleep a doctor wanted to try this med.  After the third night I got my first good night's sleep in years.  I have gained weight and I crave sugar CRAVE SUGAR, It helps with depression also.  It keeps me calmer.  When I have tried to quit taking it I immediately lost 10-12 lbs and I was almost manic.  After resuming it everything was back to normal for me.
218: can`t sleep
219: I FEEL LIKE I AM GETTING A ANXIETY ATTACK
220: I have a chronic sleep disorder, and this is the only drug that has enabled me to reach deep rem sleep.
221: I have generalized edema and arrhythmias. I do not care for the side effects. I continue to have migraines.
222: since starting this medication my migraines are gone and i am able to live my life again, despite constant drowsiness. Although recently i have been having many panic attacks, i do not know if they are related to the medication, but i feel i cant stop in fear of the migraines coming back.
223: The very first pill I took made me feel like a zombie--but within 2 days I was used to it and everything was ok. It interfered with my sleep so I take it in the afternoon even though it makes me a little tired. It helps tremdously with my anxiety. I have noticed that when I get mad while i take the drug(I only take it as needed) I get really mad--flying off the handle--I wonder if this is the drug or not.
224: It is to help me sleep at night so far so good.
225: this helps with both depression and pain.it also helps me sleep better at night,but very tired through the day.
226: I have found that starting on a small dose for while for my body to adjust has worked BEST FOR ME. since it helps me sleep better and helps with my pain I have been patient in increasing my dose. Now that I’m on a 20 dose I am sleeping better with my pain and I am happy with this.
227: Helped ease my stress level and neurological pain in the right side of my neck.
228: I take a very low dose and have at least begun to sleep solidly for 4-5 hours per night.  That has helped but suspect after two years I may need to increase the dose.  I'm not happy about that.
229: Was put on this for insomnia and to help with pain related to arthritis with degenerative disc disease, I was sick to my stomach all day long nothing relieved it and the pain did not get better, did not help me sleep at all, bad headaches as well, would never go back to it even if I had to for depression.
230: I have had neuropathy in both my feet for years.  Throbing pain that at times narcotic pills didn't help. It usually started at night.  Tried this medication and it has stopped the flare-ups for five months.  It's been a miracle drug for me.
231: I take 50m at bed time for sleeping problems. I have been taking this med for about 3 years and have not had any of the bad side effects that some have stated here. The only two good side effects are I get more sleep and it helps with my back and hip pain. If I had read this before taking this drug, I would not have started it. But I have now learned that what works for some wont work for all. If you are thinking about taking this med, I would say take it. You most likly will have the same responce I have had from the drug. Dont let the bad side effects that some people have put on here scare you because you may just pass on the drug that really works for you. And works well!Read More Read Less
232: I've been taking amitriptyline for a year and a half. In the sense of the amounts of migraines, it has worked. When I do get one, it's usually pretty bad. Just glad the migraine doesn't last 5 and 6 days like it used to. Haven't had any big side effects since the dosage was upped to 35mg at bedtime. Still have trouble sleeping but feel better about not being in constant pain.
233: insomnia
234: Taking the initial dose seemed to work, but my body became adjusted very quickly, needing me to take higher doses (which I wasn't keen on doing).
I have been taking the medication for over a month and I am on the lowest dose that I can bare (50mg). 
I am in agony all day and all night and will be looking into another avenues to see what else I can do.
235: Had surgery for slipped disc (L4-L5), pain was horrific, after surgery, still had same  pain. Popping percoset didn't help. Finally Dr. put me on amitriptyline. The very next day the pain was gone. Still had tenderness and weakness in right buttox area from limping so much. Been on this med now for one week, sleep great. Taking 10mg before bedtime. Looking forward to getting back to normal and off all the meds. Before taking I read about all the side effects and was willing to go for it anyway. I understand now after reading all the blogs how it does'nt help some, makes some worse and others have trememdous success as I did.Read More Read Less
236: I was put on this drug for fibro and migrains I am on 75 mg and can longer sleep and am having a reen dicarge for my breast witch is a rare side affect went to gyno dr today was scared of secretion dr said it will more likly get worse. I am stopping this drug as it is not helping much and causeing other affects.
237: My doctor started me on 10 mg and up me weekly by 10 mg.  I am now taking 50 mg.  It helped the pain but I have been gaining weight pretty quickly.  I exercise every day and still gain weight weekly.  I am up 35 pounds since starting it. And to top that off my breasts are so sore.  I am not sure what to do.  Trying to cut back on mg.  Notice my toes are bugging me more again.  This really stinks.
238: Sleep walk,hallucinate, Dreaming, talk in my sleep
239: Prescribed for leg pain 25-50 mg. I have been taking 25 mg at bedtime. I sleep all night, but have trouble waking and dry mouth. It helps the pain at night, but wears off during the day. Not sure if I will increase dose, due to drowsiness.
240: I take 50mg 1xday of amitiptyline,1200mg of neurotin 4xdaily 20mg baclofen 4xday, 150mg wellbutrin 2xday, 150md zoloft 1x day. i still have pain, but its dealable becauce my mind is so relaxed and i can look past the pain
241: My Doc should not of started me out on 75mg of this. Should be lower dosage to start. Was Rxed this less expensive alternative to Clomipramine. Very bad reaction, slept 12 hours, burning mouth, etc. Threw a whole bottle of it away.
242: not sure why dr gave me this med she said for my knee pain. didnt do anything for that.not helping me sleep or helping with body pain. oh well back to dr.
243: Amitriptyline has worked well for my Migraines but one of the side effects of the drug is weight gain. I was wondering why I was hungry all the time and was gaining weight, so I looked up side effects and found out what was causing the recent gain. So I will not be taking this drug anymore. I had gastric bypass 3yrs ago and lost 150lbs and I refuse to take something that is going to cause me to put the weight back on. I will have Migraines before I gain the weight back. Maybe I can find something else to take in it's place..Read More Read Less
244: I was in a car accident 4 years ago. Started taking med 2 yrs ago and headaches no better. I gained 40 lbs and very upset.Stopped taking med. Friend suggested message theropy and that has helped the most and DR. prescribed it so insu. pays for it.  Migrains can come from tightening of muscles in neck and arms (can take years before migrains show up after a car accident). I highly recommend a few sessions and a book about pressure points with some Biofreeze to help relax muscles. It honestly works. The headaches are not gone but they are under control and I have only had 4 sessions and I am still learning. My muscles are so tense acupuncture may be my next step I hope this helps. I will report back.Read More Read Less
245: I'm taking 50mg at night for lower back & leg pain & to help me sleep. I do sleep a little better but I feel like a total slug the next day with no energy at all. I've had a terrible time with dry mouth, rapid heartbeat, jumpiness, & seeing things that aren't there so I'm calling my Dr. to discontinue this medication asap!
246: I've been taking the medication for 2 years now . I started out with a low dose of 10 mg. now up to 50 mg. Im at 28 year old that has severe nerve pains due to diabetes i was to the point of not being able to sleep at night , That was until i started this medicine.I only take it at night about 30 min before I go to bed . I sleep like a baby . I wake feeling great ! I wouldn't recommend if you cant get at least 7 hrs sleep, bc you will feel like your in slow motion in the morning.
247: I have been taking this medication for about a month and it has not done anything for me. I have very bad mood swings, depressed more, and it does not help me sleep. I feel as if I am taking this med for nothing!
248: Taken originally to aid sleep lack of which caused by erythromelalgia (Mitchells Disease).  10 mg had no real effect so doctor upped to 20mg and now I sleep most nights and the symptoms of the above complaint have been kept at bay.  Side effects = dry mouth, and a bit spaced out first thing but it wears off as the day goes on.
249: my husband sleep for 2 days... said it was like taking 2 zanax bars! never touched them again.. works great for sleeping
250: I take 10mg before bed and sleep all night. I have been using for about 1 year
251: I was prescribed this medication for my severe migraines. I  am taking 100mg at night, but it doesn't make me tired at all. I haven't gained any weight, rather I lost some, but I also changed my diet to being fully raw. This medication makes my mouth extremely dry. Now the doctors are prescribing me Zonasimide 50mg to take along with the Amitriptyline. So, I really don't think the Amitriptyline works. I have reduction in pain or migraines. I did notice that they make me feel very anxious. I went to the doctor and my BP was 97/63 and my heart rate was 163 and it causes me to blackout. I am a 25 year old, about 110 pounds. I don't know if it was due to the amitriptyline but it is definitely something to watch out for. I know they took me off Propanalol 40mg because my blood pressure was so low. Good Luck
252: I was initially given 10mg daily for head/neck neuropathic pains and found it was a good sleeping aid  and had some relief for pain but would wear off within 16 hours. My mood improved and my anxiety level decreased.    However, my GP increased dosage to 20mg and it has made my body and particularly chest feel heavy and I am drowsy in a most unpleasant way.
253: Took this medication years ago and stopped taking it when I forgot my child at daycare. My current doctor has put me on 25 mg daily for my depression and insomnia.  As before excessive weight gain especially in the stomach area. I don't know if it affects males that way.  Both times I have taken it I have had the weight gain.  Am taking myself off of it once more.
254: Hate it.  I stayed confused and spaced out the next day after taking the meds at night. Vision was blurred and felt terrible.
255: After months of not being able to sleep all night, I received my first night's sleep and continue to sleep relatively well.
256: I was told to tske st bedtime. Made no difference in helping me sleep or controlling pain so I could fall asleep
257: Taken for insomnia-does not work
258: I have had totally different feelings on this then most of the people posting. I got really emotional, to the point of feeling like crying and thinking I was losing my mind. Did nothing for my headaches,did not help me sleep at all and greatly demenished my sex drive. Took forever to get ready if you know what I mean. Does not help if you have a new girlfriend. Had a panic attack that she was leaving me, knew her a month and was all mushy saying I love her and crazy stuff. I hate this med. and my dr. has taken me off of it. All this is the opposite of how I was before I started taking the med. I would not recommend taking it at all. It made me depressed, could not concentrate, and was hard to recall things. Also I would have periods where I could not remember what I did or what was said. Like I was in a fog. I still have my headaches but it is better then the side effects of this drug. Girl friend wont even talk to me now. So there you go. bad drug for me.Read More Read Less
259: i take this for pain in my bladder due to my bladder stretching in spots. i am somewhat depressed and it is hard to fall asleep on normal nights. i take 1 or 2 pills at bedtime and i fall right asleep in and hour. it seems to help me and ive never had problems with twitching or anything like most people. im only 16 and this has done me well with no bad side effects besides making me very sleepy
260: I have been on this med since June-July of this year and it has cut down on my migraines but I also found out that I have Cyclic Vomiting Syndrome and that I was born with it. it has also slowed down my attacks of it to a point but then I still get the attacks.My dr put me on the 25mgs of this med at night and it makes me kinda have more PMS then usual but it has helped with the migraines that are so bad I need to go to the hospital for them. :( The Cyclic Vomiting Syndome really really realy SUCKS. I have to take Zofran 4mgs for it every day every 6-8 hrs and I'm still getting the attacks of the CVS :(  Read More Read Less
261: I had so much trouble with vulvodynia, almost at the point of giving up and getting really depressed because of it. My doctor prescribed 25mg dose of Amitriptyline and it has been a miracle! My nerve pains are 90% gone and honestly, I can deal with that 10%. Life changing, wish I did this years ago.
262: Really hard to wake up in the morning with this med.  Also have to deal with the weight gain after losing a bunch with another drug.  Works ok for a while, then less effective.  Currently combined with Topamax and it is ok again.   Haven't had a migraine for about 4 weeks, which is great!  Just don't have much energy...
263: I was prescribed this medicine to reduce the Chronic Pain I have from DJD in the neck, knees, back, as well as a compressed L4 & bulging L5 disc from a Military injury. Like everyone here I went through the Zombie phase that 1st week or 2. Once you get past that and the medicine builds in your blooodstream it is very effective for Muscle and Nerve issues. I feel almost Normal, which I haven't felt unless I was taking Percocets or Tramadol. Unfortunately, a few of the Side Effects I am struggling with: minor weight gain, that is difficult to lose and more concerning a trastic loss of Sexual Interest. Has anyone else dealt with this? I'm planning on stopping this medicine unless my Doctor can suggest a way to avoid that loss of interest. As for the weight gain, I can live with that and just work harder at losing it and keeping it in check.Read More Read Less
264: I was placed on 10mg initially combined with (prednisone - taken short time) to eliminate my dialy headaches/migraines.  I increased to 20mg amatriptyline after 1 week.  The entire time, I had shortness of breath.  I thought this was from the prednisone, but once I got off the prednisone and incrreased to 20mg of the amatryptline, the shortness of breath got worse.  not only was I exhausted from not sleeping, but now I could not breath well - very heavy chest feeling.   I was exhausted, but could not sleep - I dreamed all night, waking up about every 2 hours.  Completely exhausted the rest of the day, trouble breathing continued.  I stopped taking after 2 weeks and of course the headaches came back. I have had 2 migraines since then as well. I am looking into physicaly therapy and massage therapy now.  No side effects!Read More Read Less
265: Initially I welcomed the additional anti-depressant, although it was primarily prescribed for my insomnia and lack of deep restorative sleep.  During the first several months, maybe even up to one year, there seemed to be improvement.  The   schedule that seemed to work best for me was to take it (100mg) about 2-3hrs before my bedtime, so I would try to remember to take it around 8p.m.  After a while, however, I began to notice that there was little if any impact on my sleep.  It didn't matter when I took it, I still could not fall asleep when I wanted to, nor could I remain asleep.  Moreover, I was experiencing increased anxiety and irritability, a drop in bp upon rising, not just from bed, but anytime during the day (even from the sofa, recliner, chair, etc.), and often I was feeling faint.  The most troublesome side effect has been the cognitive impairment!  The daily, moment-by-moment, forgetfulness, inconveniencing not just myself, but others as well.  I forget normal, automatic actions, like not turning on the slow cooker, or losing my train of thought. Many of us experience those behaviors, but I'm talking about being handicapped in family, work, and social arenas.  Presently, my doctor is weaning me from Amitriptyline over the next 6wks.  And I welcome the change with the hope I regain my memory, become able to follow more than 1 instruction, and decrease the drop in bp and feeling faint
266: I am a 57-year old cancer survivor -- unfortunately cancer left me with severe anxiety, restless leg syndrome, insonmia, depression, high blood pressure and fibromyalgia.  Hey, but I'm alive ;-)  Amitriptyline has been a blessing.  I've been taking it for 3 months and this is really the first time I've slept in years.  BUT -- and there's always one -- I've gained 6 pounds in 3 months.  I'm already overweight and have been fighting to get my weight down.  I see the doctor again in December.  By then I'll really be waddling like a fat old duck!  --But I will be well-rested.  It's a horrible trade-off for a good night's sleep.Read More Read Less
267: Have been taking this medication for a little over a year, and just stopped. It helps me sleep (TOO MUCH)but does nothing for my Fibromyalgia, which is what it was prescribed for. Also made me extremely angry, and had difficulty functioning at my normal level. I began experiencing extremely painful and swollen breasts a few weeks ago, but didn't know until today that this medication can cause this as well. All in all, I'm glad I chose to stop it - though the withdrawls are REALLY tough. Was thankful for the ability to sleep, but had NO LIFE while taking it!Read More Read Less
268: I used this medicine for one month,had to stop because it caused me to have irregular haertbeat.I stopped taking it the symtoms stoped after 2 days.
269: i was placed on 10mg of this about a yr ago for migraines and insomnia and over the yrs it has been raised to 100mg(which is way too much 4 me)so i take 50mgs at bedtime and it puts me to sleep well..only drawback is a slight "hangover"effect the next morning
270: to help me sleep
271: I have been taking this for about 4 months now for chronic headaches..and lack of sleep due to headaches..has helped with that for the most part..still have the headaches, but not quite as intense..  Bad point..has killed any sex drive....
272: This is a very dangerous drug! There are serious withdrawal symptoms that come with discontinue of use of this medication. It takes months if not years to wean off due to the horrendous withdrawal symptoms. Don't take it! Just as bad as benzo withdrawl.
273: This medicine has helped tremendously with migraines and sleep. I wake up too, feeling rested and ready to start my day. I like it that it does not wipe you out, but gives you the sleep I need. I hope it works well with others. I would give it a try.
274: Works very well for me!
275: it has been working great for me.i would wake up all night.now sleep through the night.when i wake i feel great
276: I was put on this drug for nerve pain from my back, after Lyrica caused swelling and pain in my legs, ankles and feet.  Now this drug did the same thing except my swollen areas are beet red!  So tender to the touch I can't wear shoes!
277: Helping me sleep.  Migranes are not intense
278: Helped me sleep the first night I took it, then stopped helping even after they raised the dose.I guess it worked for about a month, then out of the blue I was in the emergency room with severe depression, and they took me off it.
279: I have been on this for over 20 years and have tried 2 times to go off which resulted in migraines returning.  This medication is great for me and I don't feel any side effects.
280: help me to sleep longer yet, i have only 25 mg.
281: I found the drug did wonders for my migraines but at the cost of weight gain. I have been exercising almost everyday and the weight is still coming on. I have an athletic build so it is not due to gaining muscle mass. I have gained about 20 pounds since going on this medication over the past 4 months. I am on 50mg and clothes I bought last month do not fit me anymore :(
282: I took this for my ibs, anxiety, and fibromyalgia. It only made things worse. My stomach did slightly improve but i gained 15 pounds and i barely eat. Secondly this med gave me constant heart palpitations to the point of frequent panic attacks esp while driving. So i got a xanax script to combat that (which i hate). So Ive tapered from 20 to 5mg then im finished.  Also it kept me awake...full blown insomnia
283: Have found this treatment has had a calming effect on my intestinal nerves, eases burning sensation, however sometimes makes me feel nauseous, this can be off putting hopefully will ease off, have been on this nearly a month.
284: I have been using this medication for almost 8 year's not and it worked to some extent but it's can't stop the reoccurrence of my depression I have about 5 major relapses in the past 4 years.
285: I recently started taking this med for migraine prevention.It has helped to cut back on the frequency and the severity of my headaches but the side efforts are not worth it to me.  I could probably deal with the dry mouth and feeling groggy.  But what I can not deal with is the excessive weight gained.  I have never weighted more than 115 not even pregnant and I have 5 kids.  Jan 2015 I weighted 118 by March I was up to 140.  That is very dramatic to me.  Not work it. BTW I am only 5'2
286: Actually prescribed for urinary incontinence.  But it has really helped my anxiety and depression. I am on 10 mg but will need a little bit more. Can get off adderall and xanax. Went thru 8 ssri with no help and ended up with cystitis and was prescribed this that solved all my problems after suffering for over 2 yrs. Few side effects was tired first few weeks. Got my happiness and life back. I thank God.
287: Has made my mouth really dry and makes me very sleepy.  Good for a sleep aid.  although I felt very dizzey in the morning.
288: This medication works well for my insomnia
289: My doctor put me on this for IBS. I dont see much of a change
290: I take 75 mg every night 30 mins. to an hour prior to going to bed.  It allows me to have a good nights sleep and has kept my Fibromyalgia in check.  I was so lucky to find a reumatalogist that knew about this condition and worked with me to find the right medication.
291: I was taking 10-15, 25 mg benadryl, a day so I could sleep at night. I was taking them during the day just so I could get tired before dark. Now I take 1 or 2 of these a couple of hours before I lay down and i fall right to sleep ans stay asllep all night. I might wake up once and get something to drink and use the bathroom, where as I was getting up all during the night, when i did finally fall asleep, when I was taking OTC sleep aids. Thank God for Amitriptyline!!!!
292: Gustatory sweating=diabetic
293: Did not help me very much. I have been taking a very low dose of this drug for 9 months/ I am a big person with diabetes with right foot issues due to nerve pain
294: I was in a severe car accident, and developed mood change/insomnia.  I prescribed 10mg doses once a day.  I followed that dosage for two weeks with no improvement.  I was instructed by my physician to increase the dosage to 20 mg.  This decreased the insomnia and general anxiety.  However, I do feel twitchy and have twice experienced short term ringing in my ears.
295: This drug is very very bad.Even if you taper off slowly, as advised,the longer you are on it the worse time you will have.It may help you but dont be fooled it will ruin your sleep when off of it and you will suffer greatly.Just some advice from  someone who was on it long term for many health issues. Been off for 9 weeks,what a nightmare!!!!
296: I am able to sleep all through the night without  waking. I have neuropathic pain and without amitriptyline IO hurt sop much it is impossible to sleep
297: I have gained weight within the first 3 weeks and after the 3rd week I found myself extremely irritable.  It does help me sleep but my irritable moods outweigh the advantages of sleeping for 4 hours.
298: After using this medication for my tension headaches, my symptoms was relieve after day one.
299: I am a 44 year old woman who suffers with servere migraines, about 4 to 5 a month. When I first started taking this medication it seemed to be effective with only 1 to 2 migraines a month. But as time went on I began to suffer from other side effects. I have gained 40 lbs and suffer from severe agitation and excitement.  I have also suffered with dry mouth, uncontrolable movements, constapation, persistent heartburn, restlessness, uncontrollable movements of my hands,ringing in the ears, nervousness, shakiness, sweating, unusual hunger, increased thirst, urination and constipation. I have stopped taking this med because of these side effects and encourge anyone else who begins to suffer of these side effects to please contact your doctor.   Read More Read Less
300: I was prescribed this drug as part of a "drug cocktail" for severe neuropathic head and neck pain. It works wonderfully.....however I have gained about 60 lbs and my breasts have grown 4 sizes! The weight is causing other health problems in my joints and feet. I excercise 30 minutes a day and only eat 1200 calories and I CAN'T LOSE THE WEIGHT!The doctor said it's either the weight or the severe pain. I'm 5'3'' and weigh 195 lbs. now. I don't think I would recommend this drug.
301: I used this for anxiety and trouble sleeping caused by anxious thoughts. It has changed my life. Even a low dose worked for my body.
302: Doctor gave me this For spasams...Constipation...dahh it constipates you. I can't function at all. I want to sleep..sit. Can't even think. A glass of wine will make me sleep, or benadryl. I give up on all these darn drugs Im not a taking them.
303: I have been on amitriptyline 35mg for the past 2 years and it has worked wonders. Haven't had a migraine since. I take it at bedtime, as it makes me sleepy if I take it during the day. My only other side effect is drymouth. I will take that over a migraine any day.
304: I take it at bedtime for Fibromyalgia/Degenerative Disc Disease to help me sleep. I wake up feeling unrested. I'm okay for about 2 hours after moving around and then I get very tired. Some days I actually pass out because I am so tired.
305: Taken 25mg for years for restless legs at night.Now up to 50mg as coming slowly of oxycodine 20mg and back/shoulder pain severe at times.Sleep better but dreadfully tired most of day. Hoping not to put weight on now as no problem before.
306: I used Amitryptline for 30 years.It worked  well.BUT decided to get off off it.I have been off it for 7 weeks and it's pure HELL. No sleep,anxiety, etc.I am trying so hard to stay off of it because I have  heard the long terms effects are bad.Dont start this drug thinking it is good and it will be easy to live without it.Its NOT.Dont get fooled.
307: Amitriptyline did reduce my migraine severity and frequency by quite a bit. Unfortunately, it did not help with my sleep, as I'd hoped. In a year of use, I gained 40 pounds, so I had to taper off and give up on this drug. Did cause dry mouth, but I could have lived with that.
308: Initially started using it for a combination of depression and anxiety, which too often resulted in an upset stomach, lack of appetite, and unwanted weight loss. I went through 4 or 5 different SSRI’s that only made things worse. They gave me this and it made a HUGE difference in my life. I currently have a super fast paced and stressful job, and this keeps me leveled out, it helps me sleep at night, and my stress no longer affects my appetite. I had years of counseling that never quite cut it until I found this. Been on it for about 5 years now and wouldn’t trade it for anything
309: When I first was perscribed this medicine it was too stron for me so I was told to take 1/2 of the pill.  Now I am taking a whole one and doesn't do anything.  I was given it for depression and chronic pain.  Do I need to get something else?
310: I have been taking this med for almost 2 month and i havent had a migraine since, it also has helped to sleep better, and a extra benefit is i feel happier during the day. have had a few of the side effects, constipation but i just eat high fiber foods and drink lots of water.. other then that it has been working well for me. it took a few weeks to start working.
311: I have been taking 50mg at bedtime for over 1 month.  It has helped me sleep well at night but it makes me so tired all day.  I just want to lay around and sleep.  Also, I've been wanting chocolate badly since I've been taking this.  I never craved chocolate.
312: I used to get headaches daily and migraines about 3x per month. Now I get headaches about 3x a month and Migraines about once a month.
313: My Doctor suggested I take this with my Percocet and it makes my pain medication work 100% better. I tried to stop taking it and the pain returned. Dramatic difference.
314: I have had fibromyalgia for a year now and I tried this and other meds and nothing helps with the pain. As far as sleep I get 2-3  hrs a night thnx to soma. Fibro doesn't help with migraines either.  ;(
315: its has worked for me
316: Started taking this after returning from Iraq. I was having troubles sleeping and dealing with anger. For about two weeks into taking it I was informed by my husband that I was hitting him in my sleep. It does help me sleep, but only for a couple of hours. As for my anger, it has helped me not overreact to situations. I have gained a few extra pounds after taking the meds, but I will continue to stick with it for a bit longer.
317: does reduce migraines but, knocks you out after taking it
318: My sister 50, takes this medication for cluster migraines & she has been a lot better, it has also helped her depression due to work problems, family etc, when I went there to stay she is a different person, Mum remarked on it too, she is not so out of it & doesn't have an afternoon rest now, it's easier for her 5 kids & husband to have her back again like she used to be, 1 Doctor put her on anti epilepsy medication & it made her dopey, then she coudn't get in to her doctor & went to another 1, she tells me she is not on the anti depressant dose only on 30 mgs, I have depression 2 & migraines, & it is helping her depression, it is great Read More Read Less
319: This has truly become a miracle drug for me.  I have suffered with moderate to sever fibromyalgis for about 15 years.  For the past 2 months, I have felt like a new person.
320: My doctor put me on 25MG a night for insomnia after trying most everything else. This has worked somewhat but there are still nights I have difficulty falling asleep. The one problem I seem to have is weight gain. I'm wondering if this is something others have experienced. All the gain seems to be in my stomach. I would really like to know if others have this problem with the drug.
321: Well, to put it simply, this medicine has caused quite the amount of complications in my life 'till this day. I began taking it when I was about 14 for mainly migranes, but it also helped with my depression following my parent's divorce. I was always a fairly docile child, but things changed after that nasty divorce. My mood would swing violently to one side or another with little or no provocation.    I remember as for one example watching Tom and Jerry at around 2AM (insomnia as well) and I was absolutely outraged, literally red in the face at Tom never letting Jerry catch a break. Then, not more than a minute later, I was laughing myself to tears when he got nailed in the face with a frying pan.    School was difficult too. Needless to say my grades were crap. I ultimately decided that the medicine was to blame since none of this ever happened before I started taking amitriptyline, so I immediately discontinued use. The following week was hell, almost literally. I went for days without sleep, put on and lost weight on a daily basis, and had an absolutely blank slate for emotion. Now here we are, about 6 years later, with heavy insomnia problems and migranes at least once a week. I'm told by countless people that it was the medication that I quit cold-turkey like that, how it kind of "burnt bridges" on the way out of my system. I've now, believe it or not, become completely nocturnal.Read More Read Less
322: I have to say that this medication caused severe side effects for me to include, hallucination, constipation, sever stomach pain, limited sex drive, dryness of mouth, groggy in the mornings, staring throughout the day, and unsual dreams.  If you are generally a healthy individual and just need something for the onset of migraines, this medication is not for you.  I was only on the medication for 4 nights, 10 mg per night.
323: Overall I am happy with the results of this drug, and I have tried many.   The only thing that bothers me is the weight gain side effect.  I am not a big eater to begin with and truly watch what I eat anyway - but it still made me gain weight.
324: I've been on this medication for over 14 years and haven't had a single side effect. Didn't have another migraine for 10 years, and have had only 1 per year in the last 4.  May need to increase the dose from 50 mg one of these years.  I don't care if I have to take it for the rest of my life.  It works.  And if you get yourself in a pattern of taking it right before bedtime every night (like going to the bathroom or brushing your teeth), you won't forget.  I haven't missed a dose in 14 years.  Maybe that's why it has worked so well for me.Read More Read Less
325: I was prescribed Amitriptyline after 2 back surgeries and a hip replacement and it appears to help with the pain and stiffness in the surgical areas.
326: this stuff put me into a comatose state. i couldn't function at all and the doc says this is the small dose and wants to move me up. i have never heard of thaking an anti depresent for back pain. but i guess if it helps me sleep it's a good thing.
327: help with depression sleep muscle pain
328: More drowsy the next day than when I took it. Woke with extreme dry-mouth. Left a bad taste in my mouth all day after use. On it for 4 days and needed to try something else.
329: This medication is very effective! I sleep 8-10 hours a night, after spending a year not being able to eat, I can finally eat, my depression is finally under control!  This medication has changed my life! After changing medications so many times with horrible side effects, My doctor finally prescribed something that really works!
330: I was diagnosed with Arthritis and Fibromyalgia. I have been living with pain for almost a year now. I have been on several different meds. I started with Trazadone 50mg then over time uped to 100mg then last 150mg and thats when i started having bad migraines and feeling like crap in the morning. Doctor started me on the amitrip a week ago so far i like it i also take celexa in the morning in combinatioin but the celexa 40mg isnt helping my anxiety started at 10mg worked my way up. I am 23 have told my doctor that I have been on xanax and klonipin for my PTSD and anxiety and it helped but he wants to explore more options before he gives me an addictive drug. Im just over my conditions taking over my life and wish my doc would listen but overall amitrip is better then trazadone by far!Read More Read Less
331: Have been taking this drug for many years as a migraine preventative - it has worked really well with very rare migraines now that are not nearly as severe. I was also a poor sleep & that has been an added benefit as I generally sleep much better. No side effects at all.
332: After looking this up, I realize my doctor didn't prescribe this as it is indicated in this brief description.  He gave it to me to help me sleep.  It's so strong I have to cut it in half (25 Mg) so I can wake up in the morning to get my children to school.  I get the feeling overall that most Doctors DO NO want to deal with chronic pain patients at all.
333: My mom took two-three 25mg.  She was drowsy, dizzy, and had slurred speech.  The worst of it all was her feet we're tingling, which was a serious side effect.  She was better in about 2 hours, but she will not be taking these anymore.
334: Was prescribed for not sleeping, depression and neuropathic pain. It helped everything however it gave me dry mouth,hoarseness and dizziness and sluggishness and sleepy in the mornings, If I'm going to gain weight, I may ask the doctor to take me off.
335: I am a 22 yr old veteran with depression/ptsd who just began treatment with this medication. My only concern is the zombie effect it has had on me i can just sit and stare off into space for hours my sleep has improved as well as my mood but I still feel as though i am in a fog. my doctor prescribed 20mg a night along with 10mg citalopram or celexa for the day. Since i have began ive had problems with a lack of appetite and severe nausea which is followed by diarriah everyday. i don't know if the benifits out weigh the side effects though.Will ask doctor next appointmentRead More Read Less
336: I have been taking this for about 4 months gradually upping my dosage which started at 10 mg.At first I had horrifying flashback like dreams but within 48 hours that seemed to diminish. Its made my compulsive behavior slightly worse (eating,cig smoking)however I now get the best sleep! I still toss and turn but I actually don't wake up a trillion and one times anymore hehe. I don't see much improvement with my anxiety just yet but I'm hoping and have been told once at 50mg or higher it would effect my mood,make me less ansy. So hopefully I should start feeling better soon.Good luck to everyone else and hope this helped a tad. :)Read More Read Less
337: restless at night much more aggiatated and memory has been alot worse.
338: Having been a diabetic for at least 10 years, neurontin was becoming ineffective and causing stomach problems. My Dr. prescribed Elavil instead. Imagine my surprise when it really worked. This is really a "Head to toe" medication.
339: put on 20 mg at night about 8 years ago for help sleeping,also had pain from car accident and problem with ptsd-couldn't go into a deep sleep. the doctor said i'd been sleep deprived for years! really helped to  get the rest i needed. felt years younger,  but did gain about 10 lbs. have been reading  about all the side effects, explains the dry  mouth and terrible sugar cravings. am trying  to go off,its only been a few days but am  struggling with crying and insomnia. will tough it out a few more days.  worked wondeRead More Read Less
340: Started this medication for migraines on 8/25/15, no side effects. At that time weighed in at 106lbs been this weight since early teenager, only time my weight ever changed was pregnancy but shorty after lost it fast. In 11/16 I weighed in at a surprising 116# no changes in diet or daily life. Recently 3/16 was seen and weighed in at 128# eek! Dr ran a thyroid test came back negative. Was told this was a side effect of drug but if my weight continues to rise I may definitely discontinue.
341: i find it hard to wake up in the morning, i am very drowsey in the am.
342: I now get heat stroke every year if I'm not very careful. I get body ticks(jerking movements, it makes my stomach hurt(even though the Drs. disagree) I cry all the time, and I don't DARE stop taking it, as I feel suicidal. I HATE this medicine!
343: PCP and GE prescribed this for me for abdominal pain and stomach issues that I have been experiencing for almost two years no, in combination with zegerid it seems to be helping and I am only on my second week of this trial.  I have been experiencing the sudden attraction to sweets (was not a big candy or sweet fan before) so concerned about weight gain.  Big bonus has been that i am getting 6+ hours of sleep each night!  They started me on 10mg doubling the dose every 3 days and to stop increasing if i begin having side effects... then will reRX at my effective dose.  Talk to your Dr about this one...Read More Read Less
344: I'm in high school, I suffer with debilitating migraines, and unfortunately, I am also an insomniac. My doctor prescribed 25mg amitriptyline for me to try.....and it has worked extremely well for both reasons for a short while. However, after 2 and a half months, it suddenly stopped working, and my migraines came back much worse than before. But for the time it worked, it was a miracle, except for the side effects like waking up disoriented and lethargic, having an extremely dry mouth and the all-day drowsiness.  Read More Read Less
345: Been taking amitriptlyine 27 years for fibromyalgia. Works great for me.
346: I am taking this drug for IC (intersitial cystitis) or Painful Bladder Syndrome.  The pain went away almost immediately, but I am drowsy ALL day even though I take the drug around 8PM. I've also noticed weight gain, and a constant craving of sweets.  I have only been taking it for about a month, so I'm going to give it another month and see what happens...otherwise I will ween myself off of it.
347: I have been taking this medication for 15 years and have good results with it. I am really scared to change. But on the other hand, this medication has kept weight on me. So I am damned if I do and damned if I do not. So is there anyone who could help me with advice about changing.
348: my GI dr. suggested 25mg as a new treatment for my IBS. i have been dealing with this for at least 10 years and this medication completely calms my digestive tract and has almost entirely cured the diarrhea. but if i skip a dose, it comes back immediately. i am also CONSTANTLY fatigued, regardless of exercise. i feel like i can sleep all day and am very unproductive. coffee all day does NOT help. in fact, the caffeine irritates the IBS. :(
349: Works well but sometimes instead of getting migraines I just get minor migraine like symptoms and a bad mood.
350: Hola. I have been taking this medication for a few months now for fibromyalgia, migranes, and insomnia. While it does ease the pains in my legs and arms, the migranes are worse than ever and it takes hours for me to fall asleep, no matter what time I take it. Recently I discovered that it may cause one to crave sweets, and lately that is all I want. Unfortuately, I've been gaining a lot of weight b/c of this. The dry mouth is also agravating but at least it doesn't interfer with my appearance or health. I plan to quit this ineffective medicine ASAP.Read More Read Less
351: I have just begun using for timiginic neuralgia and the pain is subsiding, but I'm a little slow during the day.  I hope that after longer taking this drug, I will feel more like myself, although not having the constant pain is a very good sign.
352: i started taking this medication 4 days ago after trying 3 different medications for persistent headaches and migraines. The first evening i passed out on my couch for 4 hours and couldnt remember hardly anything that happened while i was "awake" i slept from 8pm till 1pm the next day. Ive still been having headaches daily will they subside and will i be able to get through the day without needing a nap or having to take something else for my headache and deal with feeling jittery and queasy from all the meds and feel like im out of breath and yet im not breathing heavy!? i need to be able to wake up early as i am in the military and thats part of the job
353: well i have been on this for a year and a half. i started on 10ml now i'm on 300ml a day. weird things have happened since i have been on it. if i take it i sleep and feel so groggy the next day if i don't take it i don't sleep. sometimes when i have taken it i still don't sleep or i may sleep it seems like 24hrs. i have strange dreams and even freakout at night. i see things that are not there. i have seen clowns on my tv dancing to my husband turned in to abe lincon. i once screamed to get my husband up because i was so scared in the bathroom i couldn't leave and get back to bed. it helps a little with headaches, but not really. it kind of helps with pain, but not really. i have to go back in jan for my six month checkup. i don't know if i should stay on it, stop taking it or what. sometimes i feel happy other times i feel like i hate everyone. one day i can't get full and other days i won't eat for a couple of days. i just feel messed up and unsure. i just don't know about things anymore, anyone feel this way??Read More Read Less
354: i have been taking this medication for a number of years: however, i have a new Dr. and he does not feel this is good for the heart. also, this is a very old drug, and there are many available without this side affect.
355: 150mg for high anxiety and depression and it has changed my life, slight weight gain but I have now got that back under control, took some initial time to get used to but it means I sleep, it gives me a buffer zone with my anxiety and it keeps my depression at bay whilst I engage other services to deal with my ongoing recovery journey. Not perfect but it has literally changed my life for the better.
356: The only side effect I get is that it helps me sleep better at night. Which is a good side effect. I take it for my pain and it helps by easing it to a less severe pain. For me, I had to stay on 10 mg for a few months before increasing my dose to 20mg. The 20 mg; it’s helping my pain and sleep. In time, I’ll increase to the 25mg. I think some people start off on too high a dosage and it’s too strong for them.
 For me, weaning myself on a higher dose of the medication very slowly works best for me
357: Still getting migraines, maybe not as often. Experiencing a lot of side effects such as dry mouth, increased appetite, loss of sex drive ie find it hard to orgasm also diahorrea.
358: I have been taking this medication for six years for migraine prevention and chronic pain. At first, I found it very hard to wake up in the morning, would sleep through my alarm and not wake up until someone came into my room, woke me up and waited until I was out of bed so I wouldn't fall back asleep. Gradually, I have gotten more used to the medication and although it helps me sleep through the night I can now wake up with my alarm clock.     Currently, I only take 25mg at night and 50mg the week I get my period because my headaches are worse then. Overall, this drug has been very effective at reducing the frequency of my headaches. I used to have a headache nearly every day and 3 migraines a month. Now the headaches are much less frequent. Also, I take Zomig for the migraines and so far it is great.     One side effect that I have noticed is very extreme, realistic, terrifying nightmares that usually seem to occur quickly after falling asleep. Also, the have decreased in frequency over the years.Read More Read Less
359: ?After taking this drug for four days, I feel extremely fatiqued all day, nervous, tingly, high pulse, dry mouth and achy all over. I was told to take one at bedtime.
360: I take to sleep better. I wake up many times during the night and taking 10 mg every night I fall right back to sleep when I wake up.  No side affects in the AM, no matter what time I take in the evening. This was prescribed by my physician. Nothing in your research mentions that it helps to sleep better at night?
361: I feel more depressed after being on it for about 3 weeks.  Taken in place of celexa because that drug could cause seizures with pain medication Tramadohl so the doctor stated. Taken for fibromyalgia but makes me groggy in the a.m.
362: It being used for pain over whole body. Worked better than the Ultram I was given. I cut the Ultram's to one or twice with the amitriptyline.
363: prescribed to me for migraines along with high anxiety preventing me from sleeping. worked well, i was out like a light. it took a while for it to take effect on my body, but the wait was 100% worth it.
364: I started taking this drug for insomnia which it worked great for. I have discontinued using it though because of weight gain and inbility to lose any of the weight while on it.  Lost a pound a day after stopping it!!! I also know after reading some of these reviews that it is the cause of my constipation!
365: I had chronic pain from surgery for three years and within a day of taking the amitriptyline oral,the pain was reduced and is now barely a shadow. Side effects for me has been slightly sleepy & dry mouth. I found taking in quarters every ten hours keeps the pain down. I'm thrilled to start back into a quality of life again! No other affects except for the pain.
366: The first few weeks I was extremely tired but the doctor told me to expect that.  75 mg per day and life has never been so good! This is the first antidepressant I've tried that didn't cause me to have numerous side effects.  A little dry mouth once in a while but otherwise quite literally a life saver!!  I fell in love with my husband all over again!  I've also began exercising again.  I've lost 20 lbs. so far and I'm on a roll.  Love it!!!
367: I have been diagnosed with occipital neurology and prescribed Amaitriptyline by a neurosurgeon,  Drug was changed to nortriptyline by my GP. She calaims that Amaitriptyline is not for use by elderly patients.  Can you coment
368: suffered from depression.  20 mg is sufficient for controlling it.  was on much higher dose and gradually went down to 20 mg but this is the absolute lowest i can go.
369: I suffer from hemiplegic migraines use to get a few a year but once I hit 25 it got worst to a point I was having a hard time going to work at all.  Got put on this medication, I can regulate the pills as I please usually only take one, but if I feel "off" can take up to 3. Since I have been taking one I haven't had a migraine for 3 months. Living better!
370: Taking 50mg each night. Cut migraines from 8 per month to 1 to 2. Combine with Fioricet at onset of migraine at is not as intense. Add promethazine for nausea. Great migraine preventive maintenance med. But no longer allowed to take tramadol for pain (back surgeries) due same liver enzyme in processing meds.  But my migraines were so bad I'll take the back pain over it most days.  If allergies triggering migraines then I add ZyrtecD in the a.m.
371: ok
372: Definately a sleep aide.
373: I truly believe it helps with my migraine, but I have an underlying neurological condition that was stirred up by my last preventative. While this does nothing to the neurological problem, it has made me gain a LOT of weight. I'm getting to the point where I have to make a decision if the continued helpfulness is outweighed by the side effects.
374: This drug made my hands numb.  I took it as directed for the first 3 days and the numbness went on for weeks after stopping the use of the drug.  It was not good for me.
375: hasen't helped with headaches in fact they are worse, gained 10 lbs in 1 month and feel depressed wasn't before sleep about 18 hrs a day and have no motivation to do anything when i am awake..this med did not work for me at all!!!!!!
376: This was given to me for the pain of shingles. Made every nerve ending in my body feel elictafide. Intensafide all pain!
377: started at 25mg and had no response at all---then doubled to 50mg...that caused serious dry throat night and day..plus passing urine was difficult in am---eased off a little at bedtime ( that's when i took it--just before racking out )
378: This is the only  med that I have taken that really lets me get a good night sleep . I feel great after I am up and moving.
379: This medication took 3-1/2 weeks to give me a fairly good benefit for taking it namely herniated disc problem
380: I have FM and have used it to help me fall asleep.I have been taking it for 5 years and take 100 mg 1 hour before bedtime.I have no side effects and it is not addictive.If you can't fall asleep try it I can sleep now.
381: I was prescribed amitriptyline for ym anxiety and slight insomnia. It helped me sleep at night but did absolutely nothing for my anxiety.
382: i'm 48 been on this medication for 2 months the headaches are less frequent,but the side affects for me are not warranted continuing this drug,i have the weight gain,dry everything,constipation,sweating,and now tooth issues.i'm slowing stopping i started out on 30mg i'm now down to 5mg.
383: Take this med (10mg) as a sleep aide as a result of sensory nerve pain after surgery on knee.  Was reluctant to take because I was told it was an antidepressant; however, once I started taking it every night I noticed that it did help with sleeping throughout the night.  No longer awakened by the discomfort of tingling in my foot.  I have been gaining weight and think this pill may be the culprit.
384: Been taking for 3 months.  Helped with migraines.  Get them not as often and they don't last as long.  BUT loss of hair, dizziness, blurred vision.  Think I will ween myself off after reading some of these reviews.
385: After reading all of the posts, it also dawned on me why I was gaining weight after so many years of keeping it off with portion control and exercise. I thought it was due to hormonal changes since I am menopausal due to surgery.  It seems like its a combination of both! At first, the pill made me very groggy in the morning, but now, after 4 months of taking it, my body has adjusted.  I take one 25mg at bedtime. That seems sufficient to help me sleep although I do wake up in the middle of the night sometimes, but I get back to sleep.  It helps take the edge off the pain, I must admit that (I have fibromyalgia and arthritis) so in the morning I am not so stiff.  I do not like the weight gain so I am going to consult my doctor for alternatives.  Thanks for all the comments - they are very helpful.Read More Read Less
386: I was in a very bad car accident and began having severe headaches all day and night long. My doctor (after 3 months of telling me ohhhh it will go away) sent me to a neurologist who put me on this medication 40mg a day. I have been on it for about 2 months or so. I still have the same terrible headaches and now have terrible pain in my ear, I have gained almost 15 pounds, sleepy all day long and extremely cranky all the time. I have a very active 3 year old to run after and I rather have the headaches then all the side effects. After the doctor decided to send me to a neurosurgeon the first thing he said was this is one of the worst medications and I should have listened to him, after reading these reviews I am stopping this med tonight.. I attempted to contact my neurologist but she is out of the office until Sept. NICE right.. and no one else there to help me so I took my neurosurgeons advise and am going to see a new doctor next week.Read More Read Less
387: I have IBS and this medication was prescribed to help with abdominal cramping.  I've been on it for 6 weeks.  It has NOT helped with the abdominal cramping.  I've been emotional, feel like sleeping all day, vivid dreams, and have moments of light-headedness/dizzyness during the day.  Will be talking to my doctor this week about discontinuing it.
388: Was prescribed for NERVE pain. It worked!!
389: I have taken now for 2 years the problem I have is dry mouth....if you experience this problem let your dentist know so you can get special tooth paste ....she told me dry mouth causes more problem with cavities the dryness increased bacteria.Just a note form experience I thought you should know and I as still on this medication
390: I was prescribed this to stop from getting so many migraines. While it has decreased my migranes drastically, I find it makes me very sleepy so I have to take it before bed and have noticed its harder for me to wake up and get up in the morning.
391: Recovery from an accident, neurologcal, pain
392: I really haven't noticed any changes in my level of low back pain since being on this medication. I do sleep better most of the time although i wake up with "medication hang-overs" occasionally.
393: The relief from neuropathic pain was within days of taking the first one.  However, the weight gain experienced reduces my overall satisfaction.  I will discuss it with my health provider.
394: Except for extreme sleepiness about once per week, this medication has done a great job controlling my anxiety and depression.
395: This medicine has changed my life. I used to suffer with 4 - 6 migraines a month and I now have been migraine free for 27 months! Yes, I count the months, because living migraine free is amazing. I take 10mg at bedtime with no side effects!
396: I HAVE BEEN TAKING IT FOR ALMOST 3YRS NOW AND IT HAS HELPED WITH MY MIGRAINES AND TO HELP ME SLEEP ALSO. I HAVE HAD NO SIDE EFFECTS FROM IT, BUT IF I DON'T TAKE IT I CAN GET VERY MOODY AND MY MIGRAINES ARE WORSE IF I DON'T TAKE THEM.
397: It helps me go to sleep, for sure.  But during the day I just cannot wake up.  It's like I'm in a constant fog.
398: I'm not certain til I see my doctor but I've been taking this for about a month and still get headaches.  Also getting swelling in hands and redness.  Again it's a possible reaction to the medication.
399: My teenage son took Amitriptyline for post-shingle pain. It was effective for treating the pain but he was very drowsy all the time and started to have extremely negative thoughts and he had trouble with short term memory which made reading books difficult.  We discontinued the drug and the negative thoughts went away after a few weeks but the difficulty reading/focusing is still a problem even 5 weeks after discontinuing the product.  Anyone else having this problem?
400: My mother had cramps in her feet alot caused from a stroke, this medication help her sleep at night.
401: I take 10MG tabs. I feel like I want to sleep later and later each day.
402: Works well to help me sleep, that is one of the reasons I put on this med. But I'm curious as to why only women is in the the user review.
403: Did not help, merely made me unable to function normally, rechecking everything I did 2 or 3 times.
404: Was prescribed this medication for anxiety/depression to help me "stay" asleep at night....experienced severe dry mouth, eyes and infrequent urination. Medication did help me stay sleep however I felt "sedated" throughout the day. My doctor has taken me off and will be now trying Zoloft.
405: This drug works really well to prevent the migraines
406: I will NEVER take this medicine again! Memory problems, weight gain, sleepiness, blurred vision, craved sugar, and the worst side effect was the dry mouth.  In 6 months, the DRY MOUTH caused plague to build on my gumlines, along with the increased sugar, which lead to severe cavities and gingivitis.  Used Biotene toothpaste and mouthwash (specifically for Dry Mouth), drank tons of water, sugarless candy, ice chips and had 3 root canals trying to combat the dry mouth.  Dentist advised discontinuing the meds but my dr disagreed.  I continued using the meds for 6 months, and my dental problems rapidly worsened, and I got very sick from infections and decay. The end result being oral surgery in the hospital to remove ALL of my teeth, including impacted wisdom teeth,at the same time.  So, at the age of 40, I have full dentures!!!  I absolutely, HATE wearing dentures...almost as much as I hate the doctor that prescribed this medicine and refused to discontinue it.  I do blame myself for continuing to take it, but I had no idea at the time that dry mouth could cause such severe dental problems.  If DRY MOUTH seems like an insignificant side effect, IT'S NOT! Besides causing the aggravating symptoms mentioned above, dry mouth also increases a person's risk of gingivitis (gum disease), tooth decay, and mouth infections, such as thrush.  Dry mouth can also make it difficult to wear dentures.  I learned that the hard way... hopefully you won't have to!Read More Read Less
407: My Doctor originally prescribed Cymbalta which was amazing!  My health care provider would not cover much of the cost - so I was sent to amnitriptyline - which is better than nothing.  If I had my choice - I would go back to Cymbalta - but the pain of getting a part time job to pay for it was more than the relief it provided.
408: groggy and blurred vision the first week
409: As a migraine preventative, I have experienced great results. I take it at bedtime.
410: I have been taking 10mg's QD and using Midrin PRN. A-trip has worked wonders for me!!!
411: i was scared of going to sleep because of horrific nightmares where i was alert but could not move. not getting enough sleep gave me the same nightmares! so it was a viciuos circle,dr gave me 25 mg saying i was depressed i didnt agree and said it was stress as the treatment was the same i was happy to give it a go. so it took about 6 month and up to 150mg before i felt any benefit, my husband died in november and went on 200mg in stead of diazipan along with 150mg of amatryptyline.im not frightend to go to sleep now and its great .theres always a BUT though isnt there? i keep forgetting things.or i do things i cant remember,im loosing things .i go to get somthing and forget what i had to get.im not out much because of disabilitys.and i miss my huband so much.what im asking is this the side affect of amatryptiline or is it grief. i got taken into hospital the same day as my husband as i broke my hip on my polio leg, it was only me that came back out..i dont want to tell the doctor incase she takes me of 200mg these symptomsstarted from nov when he died. its just like the affect of drink(dont drink anymore as my polio leg is 3inch shorter than my left, so dont have much balance.what do you think ?side affects or greif and stress??Read More Read Less
412: i sleep good at night' but stillvery tired the next day head feels foggy ,startit aweek ago. is this normal?
413: I had migraines since I was 8 years old... The painless but "aura" type with nausea, depression, sensitivity tto all senses in bad ways.  In high school the doc tried caffergot on me which made migraines worse... In college I began getting them daily; a doctor there put me on only 5mg/day. For over 10 years, i remained on that dose. I don't think I had a migraine during that time. I am not on meds for migraines now, I just avoid caffeine and low blood sugar, I don't get migraines anymore.
414: I have been taking 20mg of this drug at night to help me sleep and also for restless legs. As far as both of the above conditions it has worked well. I have been taking this drug for about 2 months now, but am concerned about the weight I am putting on. I am very active in my job at work and weight has never been an issue, so now I can't seem to stop gaining weight.
415: pain in legs and feet is almost non existant after taking this med.Work better than neuronton
416: I have found that a relatively small dose has improved my life .It did have some side effects but nothing dramatic.
417: My back doctor prescribed amitriptyline with Neurontin to help with nerve pain for my dergenerative disc disease. It did not help with the pain and the side effects were unbearable. headaches, very moody,angrey,Irritable,forgetful,and for some reason craved sweets that caused me to gain weight. The smallest inconvenience sets me off. I have a two year old and he and the family didn't understand why I was always in such a bad mood. I took this medicine for 7 months and feel so bad for my family to of had to put up with this. I will check on web md from now before taking any medication that I am prescribed. No pain is worth putting your family thru this.Read More Read Less
418: Dry mouth, extreme fatigue, "fuzzy brain"
419: I have taken for over a year along with Topamax at bedtime for migraines.  I have not gained any weight.  The Topamax makes you lose weight.  I have had some success with this combination.
420: I have taken 50mg a day for pain from a pinched nerve for 11 years. Works great!!! It takes away the pain completely, unless I over-exert (tennis, running, anything jarring). At first it made me very sleepy, but after a month or two, my body adjusted to it, so it wasn't enough to impact my daily life. I don't know what I would have done without this medicine. Before I took it I had burning pain 24/7. After taking it a couple of weeks the burning was gone.
421: Gave me headache and tinnitus. To go off I found out after the fact, you can get med in liquid form to reduce med slowly as needed... Can take months or more depending on how long  on med. Also not sure if regular pharmacy does the liquid form or if a compound pharmacy is needed. Sadly not many docs know or tell you about this!!! Best of luck to all!!
422: Causes drowiness
423: I have only been on it a day and see a huge difference !!OMG I am amazed I have Lupus and Bad headaches and stiff necks all the time !!Wow I feel like a new person ALIVE !!!!
424: dont know
425: helps me sleep
426: Unable to sleep due to nerve pain in fingers toes back and neck. I also have chronic migraine.  I started taking 25 mg for 1 week and then upped to 50 mg at bedtime. Nerve pain is better and migraine is very mild and not continuous. So far the side effects have been minimal, with the exception of dry mouth. I hope I can continue with this medication, it seems to be working. God bless you all!
427: I am miserable with this medication. I gained 10 pounds since I have been taking it. I have a tremendous appetite with it and I feel terrible with it. The weight gain is very upsetting.
428: I used elavil s a prophylactique for migraines.  The first time the Dr started me on 25Mg qd. after a few weeks I had hallucinations every night. I saw insects, spiders all along the walls of my bedroom. Somehow, I new it was not real but had to put the light on to be sure. My migraines did not improve.  My neurologist started me again on Elavil. We started on a low dose : 10mg hs for 2 months, then 20mg for the next 3 months. I have no hallucinations, but tremors of hands and extremely dry mouth. Migraines ? as bad as ever. I will actually ask my neuro to discontinue the med.Read More Read Less
429: My dr. put me on this to help me sleep and to help with my depression. It worked great in helping me sleep but not with the depression. Dr. put me on another anti-depressant to take on top of the Amitriptyline. It also curbed my appetite and helped me stop smoking again.
430: I take amitripyline  for sleep
431: Sleep. After 2 years of insomia and trying everything including lunesta and ambien for sleep finally a new doctor prescribed this. It started helping me immediately. It has taken a few months to build up to a high enough dose to help me sleep all night but I feel blessed to sleep the 5-6 hours that I do get.
432: I took this medication for a year and a half.  It had taken the edge off of most of my headaches though not getting rid of the completely.  Then all of sudden, it just stopped working all togethier.  Once you are a drug for too long, it becomes less effective.  I am now on a new drug.  And have had NO head aches (knock on wood!!!!)
433: I was in a car accident two years ago and had two different doctors prescribe this for neck pain, headaches, and sleep.  I started having terrible nightmares along with craving sweets. It did help me to get more sleep but not worth having to go through the God awful nightmares.
434: i take it for perifial nueropathy in my toes  dose not help much
435: I feel like I have taken a stimulant. Restlessness, sweats, shaking almost like a body tremoring and hands become extremely shaking. Does provide mood and feelings are more positive regarding depression from other pain medications like Vicodine 10mg every four hours plus epidural morphine pump.
436: Taking 1mg a night for migraines this medication gave me my life back. The migraines had basically made me nonfunctional. I did put on about 40 pounds but I think that had more to do with the difficulty waking up and exercising. I finally made up my mind that regardless of how drowsy I am in the morning from it I had to get up and work-out. Since then, I have lost 20 pounds and am continuing to lose weight.
437: I have Fibro and arthritis,and also depression. I was taking another drug called Cymbalta that was supposed to be helpful for all, but I find this is a much better choice for me. It helps my muscle pain and also my sleep. I believe it is helping my depression too.
438: It has really made a difference in calming the pain, after 2 heart surgeries. I have been on the medication for  I have 35 days. I have chronic insomnia, but I am sleeping better. I have noticed a 8 pound weight gain, that I truly cant handle. It it continues I will discontinue use and just suffer.
439: I have chronic back pain, Only have used this drug for a few nights as prescribed. Back pain  has increased later in the day, when before that was when it decreased I will see my Dr again. advice on packet says do not stop taking this medicine
440: I have taken it for over one year now, and before that I had to go to the hospital when ever I got a migrain with this medication I was able to slow down and even stop my migrains even before they started.
441: I feel very very good only on 10mg of amitriptyline,I am also gng 2 a very good physicologist & learning how 2 deal with stress as well as, due 2 a relationship problem, & losing my father when I was only 18, he had a heart attack, only 53,
442: I was prescribed this drug for Fybromyalgia and have been taking it for about 3 years now.I was getting very little sleep but that improved 100% when i started taking this drug.I have gained quite a bit of weight but I think that is partly due to the fact I am going through the menopause.It also works very well for the pain. I did stop taking it for a while because I felt so much better,but suffered terrible withdrawal symptoms and a return of my fybromyalgia symptoms too. I am now back on it and feel so much better,this works for me.If you,re just starting to take this stick with it,it really helps.Read More Read Less
443: i’ve been on this medicine and it’s worked wonders it’s taken my migraines away completely i used to get them so often it used to take my day away but with this medicine its helped me so much and it also made me lose 30lbs which is a great bonus but im also exercising. i wake up with no grogginess i have no other side effects over all this medicine is great for my migraines.
444: would like to know if crushing or chewing this pill has an warning about htat.
445: i have fibromyalgia and chronic fatigue syndrome, this medication has helped me
446: Taken for neuralgia of the facial nerves, pain has completely disappeared. I also suffer with depression and anxiety and find this helps me to sleep too.
447: I was prescribed this medication for chronic pain relief. It worked wonderfully,except the sweets cravings,I had to lower the mg to 10 to control the cravings. I was using this med. for five years; at the fifth year my family and I noticed severe memory loss (small amnesia moments). I since got off the med. but now suffer from tremors and am considering using it again. Migraines were gone when I used it and I was more happy; maybe because it made me forget the things that would normally stress me or cause tention in my muscles. Pain or memory loss? what to do? Over all feeling happy beats feeling mad due to pain. I will be getting back on this med. soon. NOTE; if you read others comments on this drug; notice how many mention how they forget things.Read More Read Less
448: I was given amitriptyline to help my migraines. It made me really tried 24/7 and I could hardly ever wake up. I got so annoyed by it that I stopped taking it all together. It didn't help my migraines. Like I said, all it did was make me very sleepy all the time.
449: I was taking this med for lower back pain it somewhat worked but gave me extreme heartburn
450: I don't like it at all, I took it as prescribed, 2 pills, 2 hrs before bed. I woke up tired and exhausted, restless and irritable, fatigued and merely complacent, the ability to move used to be an effortless process but not any more, feel like I have lost my mind and all the things that make me, me. I have no annimation and feel my personality is stripped. **Note first dose was last night, and these are my experiences of today.
451: I used it for sleeplessness, I was very moody and mean around people, not like me at all. Wasnt happy with the nasty taste either.
452: I was diagnosed with depression and fibromyalgia.My doctor prescribed anti-depressants  including celexa, lexapro, and then cymbalta, all of which didn't help and had terrible side effects, especially the cymbalta. I went to a rheumatologist, he prescribed amiltriptyline 10mg to take at bedtime along with ambien.  I feel like a different person.  I sleep well at night , my fibro pains are less, and it has helped my depression.
453: I WAS GIVING THIS FOR RINGING IN MY EARS.ALL IT DOES WAS MAKE ME SLEEP TOO LONG.I ONLY TOOK FOR A MONTH.
454: I was just given this medication today, but going through the side affects and posts listed, I'm getting a little worried about trying it. Some chick on here gained 10 lbs the 1st month! I really think I'm going back to the Dr., becuase as someone pointed out, this medication is not for people with active life styles. I have two jobs, I can't afford to be tired and sleepy all day, no matter how well I sleep at night. Also saw several people mention low sex drive, and contstipation, as well as memory issues...  Read More Read Less
455: After Reading another post about this RX as I take it for Fibrymalgia and I have gained weight taking it for a year now.. about 15 to 20 pounds, and my eatting habits are great.  going to ask my dr if i can try somthing else.'or go off it
456: I was put on this when I was 19 to prevent headaches that I would get about everyday.  For about the first month, my headaches would be a little less often, but more severe.  After about a month of use, it really kicked in and I was headache free.  I didn't experience any of the side effects that others have been talking about.  I put on a little less than 5 pounds this past school year, but that could be the freshman 15 and not a side effect of the drug.  I have recently noticed that my headaches are slowly but surely happening more and more often now.  I don't know if that is due to it being summer and I have extremely bad allergys or due to the fact that I am getting immune to the effects of the drug (which I have been told can happen).  If it keeps going like it is, I might have to up the doage to experience the results that I had for about 6 months.  I'm hesitant to do this because of all of the side effects that are possible, but I believe being headache free is worth trying.  I believe I am on 25 mg a night which seems pretty low compared to others.  Overall, the drug has worked wonders and I hope that it continues to do so.Read More Read Less
457: Loss of sense of taste and smell
458: I was given this medication for back pain and to help me sleep. I had no idea it was an antidepressant. And yes, it did help me sleep but I gained 40 lbs in 3 months--now, I'm depressed!!  And angry!!  I stopped taking this 3 months ago, much exercising and dieting later--not one pound lost.  NOT WORTH IT!!!
459: want to about withdrawal effect
460: I started taking amitriptyline for nerve pain, migraines, and severe IBS. I've been taking it for 8 days now, and I've already seen a huge difference in my nerve pain & IBS symptoms. The only real issue I'm having is the extreme drowsiness. I'm taking it currently at about 8pm, but I'm going to start as of today taking it with supper around 5:30. When I take to at night I'm still awake until usually 10:30-11pm. It's in the morning until nearly lunch time I'm drowsy, slow going, and I wouldn't dare drive a vehicle. For me if the severe drowsiness into the lunch hour would subside, I feel like this is a miracle drug for me, as I'm no longer is daily pain from my medical issues
461: I have become addicted to it. I cannot sleep without it
462: My Dr. prescribed the 25mg for my neck/spine and low back injuries, all it did for me was allow me to sleep a little bit better, gained about another hour of sleep while using this med.  It didn't really do a thing for the pain, barely touched it at all...only side effects I suffered from was a little 'punch-drunk' the next morning, don't care for this med for the reason it was prescribed to me.
463: I have been on it for 9 years now and it is wonderful. I was unable to sleep more than 2 hours a night and now I sleep good for 7 hours.
464: 10mg/day started 3 months ago; severe chronic migraine lessened significantly until approx 1 month ago when they started to increase again in frequency and severity; side effects (also on 30mg cymbalta & 20mg celexa): 10lbs weight gain; dizzy; blurred vision; constipation; dry mouth; exhausted over past month; trouble sleeping; some ringing in ears ... was on 35mg amitriptyline many years ago for same reason and worked for me for a few months back then as well, and then stopped working ... it was hard to wean off of as i recall, hoping getting off 10mg won't be difficult ... overall satisfaction / effectiveness is much less than reported as what good is it if it only works for a few months, then stops
465: First night I used it, yes it did put me to sleep but I was kicking my husband in the middle of the night and didn't even realize it till the next morning when he told me. I stop taking it after that. I couldn't function the morning after. I needed to get my kids ready for school. That morning was just a blur.
466: i really cant rember what i take this for ? can u tell me what it is for?
467: I was unable to fall a sleep & had restless leg syndrome.  I also had joint pain which was finally attributed to gout, and I was given Alllopurinol.   I was prescribed 50mg of Amitriptyline at bedtime to help relax and fall to sleep.  After taking this drug for about 2-3 months, I was able to sleep soundly but it took me approximately an hour to do so.  I started to develop severe dry-mouth starting about mid-morning and lasting in to late afternoon.  I noticed that it became more severe if I became anxious, flustered, or angry.  It didn't take much for me to get cotton-mouth.  Now I'm constipated, which will last up to about 3-5 days.  I'm also very irritable, and the smallest inconvenience sets me off.  In the past I suffered a stroke, few days later a heart attack, and eventually bypass (5) surgery.  Presently I take 13 prescribed medications including one for diabetes, and others for high blood pressure and heart.  I have gained a considerable amount of weight, which I feel is due to several medications that I now take, and my inability to exercise for any length of time.  I stopped taking Amitriptyline yesterday and now I'm curious what the side effects I will have
468: Blurred my Vision to the point I had to wear reading glasses just to read the words on the Television. I have a Huge High Def TV. No other effects... good or bad. Did not help at all.
469: Was taking this drug to help me sleep. I take it about 30 minutes before bedtime. I think it has the oppisite e3ffect on me. I think it keeps me fr5om sleeping. I have been taking this drug for over 9 months. I am scheduled to see my specialist on the 18th of March. I am going to ask him to take me off of thsi drug as it just is not working for me. I am a se3vere diabetic with right foot lose of feeling. It may be the very low doasage I am on, but as it is prescribed now, I get better re4lei8f from taking aleve.Read More Read Less
470: allowing me to sleep better
471: BAD,BAD,BAD That is my experience with this drug.the doctor first had me on 75 mgs one at bed time every night for sleep and depression for 5 months then he increased the dose to 150 mgs. about 3and 1/2 weeks later i was dizzy,my tongue was stuck to the roof of my mouth every time i would wake up in the morning. my speech was slured,i would studder when i talked, i was very week. then i looked the medication up on line and found out that it interacts with different medications. so please be sure that if your'e taking other medication like prozac it does not work very well, you should be off of prozac for at least five months or more.Read More Read Less
472: Satisfied with the results of my migraines, but affected my memory after 3 weeks of use. It got so bad that I forgot why I was where I was, where I was going, loss of memory, etc,  Frightening and when I called my neurologist, he told me to immediately quit the meds.  I did!
473: This medicine had no effect on preventing migraines and the side effects were no longer do-able for me. I intend to ask my doctor to try something else. I stopped taking it on my own which may not have been advisable.
474: I used this to treat what my doctor misdiagnosed as cyclic vomiting syndrome. While I was on it I experienced paranoia, anxiety, and hallucinations. It became almost impossible to sleep because of how alert and scared I was while on the medication. It made my persistent vomiting less severe but also more frequent. Your experience will probably be different, but mine was hell.
475: When starting the medication at 10 mg I noticed a difference in my headaches but when it was increased to 75 mg and then 100 mg I found that it actually made my headaches so much worse and they lasted for about 3-4 weeks.  Maybe it's just me but being in constant pain is no bueno!
476: It has worked well for me
477: This medicatio along with Neuronton takes the edge off my pain and makes life bearable.
478: was perscribed this med for sleep and fibromyalgia. TOOK 25MG and had my legs twiched all night long got no sleep and woke with groggy head and my legs ache as if I was on a 50 mile forced march.
479: my husband took this medication for 5 days and it caused drowziness, confusion.  Stoped taking it after the 5th day and am still experiencing drowziness and confusion after being off of the medication for 5 days.  Hope this is only temporary?
480: I have gone from having 12-15 headaches each month to only 4/month. This med has also helped be sleep better at night.  One draw back is that my mental processing is affected and I often forget what I was about to do or have difficulty pulling up information from my brain.
481: After living with chronic pain for 5+ years, i've finally been diagnosed with FM and this drug has worked best for pain (coupled with Cymbalta).
482: I have taken this medicine for my legs for serveral years now and it works very well for me.  At one time in my life, at age 31 I also took this for depression.  I had to take several at that time for it to work.  But I only needed it for about 1 year and I quit taking it.  Now I take it for another illness.
483: I have taken this medications twice over 5 years the first time I didn't give it time to work.  I've been taking  it for 2 months now and it seems to give me some relief from my 3-4 headaches a week.  I suggest keeping fruit in the house and no sugary sweets...if you don't have them you can't eat them.  Hope it works for you.
484: It has reduced my migraine intensity, but not frequency.  I can exercise now though so it has lessened my triggers.  I have gained about 10 pounds : (  This will not stop me from using it though because now I have more of a life.
485: I suffered a severe concussion and while I was in the hospital they gave it to me to make me sleep and to try to stop the migraines. I'm still suffering migraines. I do sleep but wake up with full blown migraines. I have gained almost 30 pounds in 2 years and that really depresses me. I have asked to be taken off it but the neurologist keeps upping the dosage. I feel like I don't have any control.
486: I have noticed my blood sugar level has increased a lot.  Could it be due to this medication:amitriptyline?
487: Works for a few hours when first taken, 5-6 hours, awake with same pain.
488: It has helped me with my migraines. I had a very stressful job which caused migraines 5 x week from stress. I am 26 years old and when I started taking this medicine 8 m ago, I weighed 122 lbs. Now I weigh 140. It makes me want to eat all the time and I have joined a local gym and no weight loss no matter how hard I work. I am considering stopping/tapering this medication since I now have a less stressful job that I love.
489: I am currently on 100mg of Amitriptyline.  I have suffered with Fibromyalgia as well as other chronic pain conditions like RSD/CRPS.  I noticed a dramatic difference increasing this medicine from 75-100mg.  The only downfall is the weight gain.  This medicine has had the least amount of side effects which are weight gain and difficulty emptying my bladder.  I am extremely foggy in the morning also, so I just set a timer at night and take the Amitriptyline at around 9pm and that made a huge difference as apposed to taking it at 12am.  I have literally tried every medicine for fibromyalgia and this is the best by far.  I would recommend slowly increasing the dosage of this medicine.  When I was first diagnosed I couldn't even walk up stairs my joint's hurt so badly.  I hope this review helps Read More Read Less
490: I have intercostal nerve damage from a lung cancer removal surgery. My Doctor put me on this 75mg each day. I also am in a fog at all times and don't remember things well at all..right in the middle of a sentence. My husband says I say wierd things in the middle of the night. It is wonderful for the pain, but awful on the rest of my body. I have been on every kind of pain killer and this one works the best even with the side effects, I guess I'll stay on it and hope that eventually the grogginess will wear off.Read More Read Less
491: has anyone else had the pins and needle feeling in thier hands when taking this? i have been on it for 3 days for migraine prevention.  it has affected my memory already and i feel a little loopy off and on during the day as well as having dry mouth.  but all and all none of the aide affects are awful.  the worst one for me is the tingly feeling in my hands. i am just curious if anyone else has had the same thing and how long it took for it to pass.   i love being able to sleep at night now and not having the feeling i have to urinate all the time. those are two "side" affects i can deal with, :)  Read More Read Less
492: I have taken a very high dose (80-100mg) for 11 years. I am now reducing my dose. I got down to 50mg and my sleep was so awful I am back to 70mg. I think this is going to be a bxxxh to come off and I am looking for other people's tips on how to reduce the dose and actually have a life. Clearly my neuropathic pain will stop me coming off entirely but I'm looking to get to the bare minimum. Apart from chopping the pill into a million pieces, has anyone any tips on how to come off this?
493: It took a while to "kick in" for nerve pain.  I wish I had been told that.  Now that it is working, I am finding it although extremely helpful with pain (now just uncomfortably numb), it makes me cry all the time.  I feel depressed and anxious at 75 mg.  I have also lost a lot of weight, which I can't afford to lose.
494: This medication has really decreased my migraines but suddenly realized that I had gained 10 lbs and didn't think that it could have been the medication until recently looking at the side effects.
495: I am susceptible to getting "zombied out" by medication and amytriptyline made me almost delirious as in out of my mind!  It did kill pain but I couldn't continue to be so zoned out.
496: GAINED 15 POUNDS IN 2 MONTHS LOSS OF SEX DRIVE AND HAD EXCESSIVE HEARTBURN AND ITCHING.
497: I have been on this drug for over 10 yrs for migraines and to help me sleep. But please beware that I now have a heart condition called QT interval prolongation caused from this drug and now I am dealing with tests and lots of pain that I shouldnt be having.  My family dr wasn't up to date on this amitripyline pill so please have your heart checked on a regular basis!!!
498: I have been on this for 20 years. It is the only medication that helps me with my insomnia. I have tried every other drug and nothing happens. I am worried about long term effects. Literally no other drug effects me. I guess you could put this down for Depression or PTSD, which I do have. Believe me, it does'nt work for depression at all.
499: I take it at night and it helps me get a good nights sleep without waking up. I take it for fibromyaligia.
500: Since my mom had started taking this medicine she has developed small bumps on her legs and they itch and they are spreading.  Could she have an allergic reaction to this drug?  This is the only new medicine she has taken within the last 3 years.  Carole
501: This drug made my tongue and lips swell and I felt like I was going to die.
502: I have put on about 5 kg in the 6 weeks I’ve used this product. As a motorised wheelchair user, weight gain is the last thing I need or want. I was on the lowest dose and stopped it last night once I figured out it was the cause of my weight gain. I monitor everything I eat so I know the drug was the issue. I’m on two other drugs for the pain so will chat to my pain doc and see if just those two are enough. I definitely don’t want the pain back but I’m not willing to be overweight either.
503: I have taken several medications for depression in my lifetime. NEVER had anything affect me this way, I had hallucinations that were Very disturbing!! I can not recommend this drug to a lab rat!!
504: It has been amazing with migraine releif and fibromyalgia pain I was at point of not driving because of neck pain with fibromyalgia.
505: I have fibromyalgia and had constant pain at night and could not sleep.  I took Elavil about 15 years ago.  At first it was a God send. My pain went away and I could sleep at night.  After a few months though, I woke up gasping for breath two or three times. I literally could not breath.  My Doc took my off it and I have not had that happen since.  Scary!!
506: I find this medication fabulous, it does work if you give it time to work unlike any other depressant you get better gradually instead of BING better, my Doctor would NOT increase my dose & also told me to come off cold turkey with my sleeping pills Zopiclone which is like Ambien because of stress not for sleeping, Amitriptyline is gr8, 3 months later I feel better than I ever had & more relaxed & not so panicky, & only on 10 mg's, also have 150g of Venlafaxine as well as
507: i suffer with very bad headaches most of the time, this medication has helped me sleep but does nothing for the headache.
508: I had back surgery in 1991 and while the surgery was successful I suffered from agonising pain at night and was only getting about 2 hrs sleep a night. I was at my wits end and saw another neurosurgeon for a second opinion. He agreed with the diagnosis of my original specialist but offered me Amitriptyline to help alleviate my night-time pain and help me sleep. I started on 75mg at night and the result was amazing. I have been taking for it 26 years and have never experienced any side effects. As a retired psychiatric nurse I was well aware of the pro's and con's of this medication but for me the pro's won hands down.Read More Read Less
509: Rx for getting to sleep on days when chronic neck pain is off the charts. It dries.me.out in all ways a person can be dried out. Nasal dryness and severe constipation. I only reach for this if nothing else has worked and even then it doesn't knock me out like I wish it would.
510: I find this drug helps me get a goodnight sleep where as before i would be in to much pain and would get restless.
511: extreme anxiety, seizure like symptons
512: I have been taking this medication for over 30 years. I have Fibromyalgia and for many years no could name it, the Dr. did try to find the reason for my pain, but at that time no one ever used the name.I did take over the counter pain relievers, but most did not help or left me groggy and or sleepy from not sleeping well. I do take Hydrocodone/Acetaminophen 5-325TB with the  Amitriptyline 150mg, I now have Padgets Disease and this combination of drugs  are  letting me sleep and feel refreshed,   I just had my 80th birthday July 18th
513: I believe that the doctor gave me this medication to help me sleep.It does make me sleep,but is not strong enough to relieve back pain
514: One doctor would only give me 25mg, due to potential heart problems. my pcp increased it to 75mg even tho she knew I had heart problems. After 3months I realized I was blinking more, thought it fall dust by December the pain in my eyelids was extremely excruciating, way over a 10. My eyes were bloodshot from rubbing and they gave me eye drops that could not help as my eyes were soooo painful already. It turned out that my meibromian glands were gone. I had extremely dry eyes, very painful and it is for the rest of my life. I am often forced to lie down in extreme pain, in tears. Doctors are pill pushers that do not read the labels. This was all to try and help my insomnia, BUT MADE IT WORSE. Can anyone help me? It has been 7 yrs of hell, no abatement AT ALLRead More Read Less
515: I suffer from Fibromyalgia, Rheumatoid Arthritis and Raynaud's.  When I went to the orthopedic surgeon for my carpal tunnel she asked about my Fibromyalgia and how was I sleeping at night and said I wasn't hardly because of the pain and was almost always exhausted.  She prescribed Amitriptyline and I now enjoy a good night's rest, am no longer exhausted and no bad side effects either. I am forever grateful to my ortho surgeon.
516: I am 17 yrs old, and have been taking this med for about 2 months now. It is the first medication that actually did anything for me. It immediatly got rid of all of my headaches. The only side effects were tiredness (eventually that wore off) dry mouth, and weight gain. Those were well worth it, since i had gone from having headaches every day to not at all. But just within the past few days, it is just now starting to get warm and sunny here, so i have been outside alot more. Ever since i started being out in the sun, my face started breaking out really bad. My whole face was covered in these red bumps that look like a rash. I have realized that the bottle says to avoid sunlight, so i am pretty sure that is what it is from. I am going to stop taking it, because i cant deal with my face being like this. Has anything like this happened to anyone else? I will call my doctor to make an appointment to see if there is another medication i could switch to.Read More Read Less
517: Being Diabetic with Neropathy of my feet,Doctor gave me 10 mg ,to use 1-2 at night and it works very well !!!
518: Treatment for anxiety. After 2 weeks amitriptyline nipped those suckers right in the bud.  New insurance req'd chg to nortriptyline has been OK but had full-blown anxiety the day I was hospitalized.
519: Amitriptyline 10 mg daily has been highly effective in reducing neuropathic pain. 
Two mild side effects:
1. Feel drowsy for the first hour after waking
2. Occasional dry mouth.
520: taken for stumic disorder witch worked great but now can't get off it because I have side afects that i never had before taking this.is there a way to get off it without making you nuts?I tried to stop it myself was good for awhile then you can't sleep you feel ( the only way to exspain it is crazy) I never had depression, no mental ilniss in my family. so I wnt to get off because I believe the med is worst then the pain i had before surgery many years ago.
521: I found Amitriptyline to be very effective in three areas: insomnia, neuropathic pain and treating my severe back and bone on bone (knee) pain.  The first week of taking this med had me sleeping 10-12 hrs per day, a big change from years of sleeping only 4-6 hrs per night.  Also, amitriptyline suppresses my appetite, resulting in a steady weight loss.
522: none
523: Just wanted to say I say a comment telling people to not take meds and change lifestyle. That is SO bad to tell people, for some people, just changing something on their live isn’t going to help. Sometimes, some of us need meds to function. If I wasn’t out on meds last year, I would still be so depressed, in mental and physical pain and not have the mental energy to do anything , stay in bed and let my world continue to fall apart, and I would prob actually unalived myself. Please do not tell people to not do something for their health Read More Read Less
524: Although this medication is used as a preventative, I still suffer migraines at least once a week.
525: I have slept better since using amitriptyline. As has been said by other people even when I wake in the night I can easily get back to sleep.I have been dreaming a lot since I started taking amitriptyline.I took  stillnoct for years  I did not dream while on this.  I stopped taking the stillnoct as it quickly knocked me out but only for about three hours. I used to wake up with a start like a cork popping out of a bottle,wide awake and could not get back to sleep again, my bed used to feel  so very uncomfortable I would toss and turn, then get up and  have a cup of tea go back to bed but just could not get comfortable.With amitriptyline I have that cosy feeling on waking warm and comfortable,I feel as if I have had a decent nights normal sleep.Read More Read Less
526: I was prescribed amitriptyline for functional GI disease/chronic stomach problems, and almost immediately I had energy for the first time in years.  I was able to eat well again and gained back the weight I lost (plus a few more, but that could be do to all the muscle I've gained from being able to work out again).  It also helped with minor depression I was experiencing and possibly some dizziness caused by an allergic reaction to cipro a year prior.
527: I sleep all night with no interruption which aids the well being feeling in the morning. Migraines are absolutely less frequent. My depression and anxiety is also better, unfortunaly when it was recently reduced to 25 mg a 3 day migraine and depression followed!
528: Given for migraine prevention. Took only 10mg for at night for two days and I couldn’t sleep entire time. 2nd night it caused head pressure felt like my head and neck was going to explode it was agony. I’m on this for migraine but I don’t understand how this drug is ever used for insomnia! I usually sleep well but i was so high wired, sleep deprived and in pain from this drug. It was like a stimulant. Will need to look elsewhere for migraine prevention.
529: I started using this after I have gotten my concussion about a year ago. It keeps my headaches somewhat under control but when I don't take it they come back just as fast. I would rather not be on this for the rest of my life, but the way its looking now, a year after my incident, I think I might just have to be.
530: I am very thankful for that day when I deceided to change primary care doctor.  As long as I take  my 50 mg nightly I am fine. I have been using since 2010.  Praise the Lord for leading me !!!I must say this. I have experienced weight gain like I never had my whole life, which I still prefer than to be down in that deep vally.  Glory to God Church!!!
531: Even though I was put on a low dose (50 then 25 mg/day), I gained 25 lbs. in 1 month. The added weight cancelled out any minor benefits. Awful.
532: I have been on 10mg/day for 3 weeks now, for the treatment of fibromyalgia and the, for me, most debilitating fatigue. I am definitely sleeping better and I wake up more refreshed than before. Immediately after I wake up, I feel very drowsy, the feeling disappears within half an hour to one hour. Also, my mouth is very dry, especially when I wake up. The pain in my muscles and joints has only decreased insignificantly. I do get fast heart beats at times, but it does not last. Sometimes I briefly feel slightly dizzy. My appetite and weight have remained normal so far. I am definitely more energetic and more focused at work and can finally monitor my daughters homework again after a long day of work. Unfortunately I still get the headaches, though, I think less frequently. I wonder if my doctor will increase my dose. I don't want more or stronger side effects, I'd rather be content with the improvements I am experiencing so far.Read More Read Less
533: I take it for migraines and insomnia. I sleep much better, I have very few headaches and my shoulders and neck are not tensed up all the time BUT I have been gaining weight about 10-15 pounds since September. I am not petite to begin with. Not a good thing.  It has been very frustrating.  And today it hit me that maybe it was the medication. I feel better knowing that it may have caused my gains, but now what do I do???
534: my doctor had put me on this for no other reason because of not sleeping at all.Dr. said it was depression. Been on it for 3 months now with no side affects, but I only take it when I need it to sleep. Bascilly I take it when I worrie to much about my son serving in the army. But it does work without it I would not sleep and could not through this.
535: Was given this medication for help with some facial nerve damage. One of the happy side effects was the lessening of monthly migrains.My first dosage 50mg left me so dizzy I couldn't lift my head. Now I take 1 25mg before bed- and get into bed.Double the dose a week before my period. But alas, I'll never loose weight on this pill, but it's way worth it.
536: After one week on this medication, there is no noticable relief in my neuropathic foot pain.
537: med worked at first to help with pain and being able to sleep. Doesnt seem to be to affective now.  i am noticing a lot of depression now which i never had. pain is still there and is very intense.
538: My Migraines are less frequent and I sleep much better.
539: taken for depression, insomnia and, later,pts. taken for 10 years, changed my life. at first dosage had to be increased before symptoms were releived. fortunately had an md for worked with me re dosage. we hung in there until we found the right, although high, dosage. some mds, patients, judge before trying different dose. sorry for them.
540: I take for sleeping, but find I have bloating. Also I use Celexa for depression, lowest mg.
541: I take this for sleeping. Although I do suffer from Migraines. This knocks me out and helps when I'm in a cluster period with the Migraines. But you need to ensure you dont take this late at night if you got an early up schedule because it will make you drowsy. Get the sleep and no problems. Never knew it was an anti-depressant drug.
542: I am a 46 year old woman. My Neurologist prescribed this for me for acute vertigo, believing my vertigo is related to migraines though I haven't had migraines in years, and the vertigo first started Feb 2008, with few instances until Jan of 2009 when it started and has basically continued until present currently apprx. 8 months. Within the first couple of days I thought is was helping, then it stopped helping. Soon the vertigo was back full fledge, except I was sleeping better. By 5 weeks in my family and I noticed I was becoming extremely angry quickly and often, which is out of character for me. I have been off these meds for 10 days, the vertigo is unchanged and my mood is back to normal.Read More Read Less
543: I currently was taking a separate medication for Fibromyalgia, for rhumatoid arthritis in my knees, for IBS/Constipation and depression, and a separate for hotflashing/night sweats, and ambien for insomnia. I am 47 years old & had an emergency hysterectomy at 39.  I have noticed that I can take Amitriptyline alone for 2 weeks & my symptoms have subsided!!  I am blown away! However, it did make me sleep for 12 hours the first week, but I rather have that side effect than take ambien & 5+ other medications
544: I have been on this drug for the past year already, and find that it helps my pain in my back and legs immensly at nights. Nothing else has been helpful for my arthritis except for this drug, though it is taken with morphine and anti depressants as well at night time.
545: I have been taking this along with venlafaxine and I sweat a lot more than average.
546: Meds are helping.I take 100MG at night with 30MG of Cymbalta.I am sleeping much better. Has increased my appetite and my mood.Felt a little sluggish when I 1st started taking it. Feel fine now.
547: iam haveing lower back pain and it goes to my legs
548: I take the 150mg, to help me sleep.  It has worked better than any over the counter or Ambiem.
549: I have been waking up with migrains, Since taking this medication I sleep well and had only 1 migrain in 30 days. I was waking up every morning with onel
550: I've been on this medication for a month now (25mg) before bed to help me sleep. I have gained a lot of weight in my stomach. Has anyone else had this problem?
551: I found out in 1998 that I have Fibromyalgia and have been taking Klonpin 1 mg.  I have had severe tendonitis and frozen shoulder pain now in both arms.  My soft tissue's is being damaged.  My doctor prescribed Amitriptyline 10 mg now 20 mg.  But now I'm thinking of taking my own life, I never had such thoughts before and I'm scared out of my mind.  I don't know what to do, but to go off this Amitriptyline.  I weighted 135 now I'm up to 160 lbs.  The nightmares finally went away but these thoughts of taking my own life are scary.  I'm afraid to even tell my husband or college children, I don't want any to look at me different.  But I'm so scared!!!!Read More Read Less
552: I started taking this about 3 months ago.25 mg at bed time. Not sure if it helped or not. I have interstitial cystitis or so we think. Suddenly about two weeks ago I started getting a burning pain in my calf, always the right one (maybe because I use it more such as driving). Also my feet and hands have been tingling on and off. I had gastric bypass two years ago so I informed my bariatric doc. We did all my blood work and it's all fine. So, I called the uro and the nurse said it is possible to develop a reaction even after taking a med a few months. She says I will probably have to come off it and they will let me know tomorrow after speaking with doc. Anyone have anything happen like this? Read More Read Less
553: WHAT IS WRONG WITH DOCTORS THESE DAYS?  YOU CANNOT STOP MOST DRUGS COLD-TURKEY!  AND PATIENTS NEED TO TAKE MORE RESPONSIBILITY WHEN TAKING AN RX.  MANY DRUGS REQUIRE THAT THEY BE SLOWLY LOWERED OVER TIME, NOT STOPPED COLD-TURKEY, BECAUSE OF DANGEROUS SIDE EFFECTS!  TALK TO YOUR PHARMACIST AND YOUR DOC BEFORE STOPPING ANY - AND I MEAN  ANY- MEDS.
554: My primary care physician told me to go off this medication on 11/14/08.  I had been taking amitriptyline 25 mg for 20+ years.  Since I went off I have headaches everyday.  Today it was so bad, I threw up and went to bed from 1 pm - 4:30 pm.  Woke up with a headache.  My doctor told me I can take Advil which does work.  What are the side-effects from going off this drug cold turkey?  My symptoms have been dry mouth.
555: Weight gain & hard time urinating
556: This medication was prescribed to me in March. Prior to going on this med for vertigo, migraine related, I had lost 30 lbs and was able to cut my BP meds in half. Since being on it I have regained all the weight even though I ate very clean. It also reduced my desire to get out to the gym, reduced libido and my BP meds had to be increased again. It is not my desire to have to take more meds to deal with the side effects of this poison. I went off and will deal with the vertigo like I have for the past 40 years.Read More Read Less
557: I am already on depression medication I take in the morning. I was given this to take at night to help me sleep because nothing else worked. Started off on a low dose with little help so doctor doubled it and now I sleep, plus I have better days, not so sad all the time.
558: I used to suffer from severe headaches on a daily basis, with 50 mg of this medicine every day, I've had much less headaches, and this medicine has worked great!
559: This medication has helped tremendously with the pain in back stshoulder blade.  I am dissatisfied with the weight gain problem. I am now starting to have muscles to draw and result in charlie horse like muscle spasms. I do not know if this is the result of medication or low potasium.
560: I have been taking this med for about ten years, 20 mg. There are a few times when I have to supplement with Tylenol for the fibromyalgia. It doesn't help much with anxiety though, nor with sleeping through the night.
561: once the dosage was corrected, I feel fine
562: My doctor prescribed this to me because of pain caused by shingles - it didn't work at all and the side-effects were awful. I am normally a very happy, energetic person but this medication turned me into an irritable zombie within a few days. It interfered with my day-to-day activities, including work, driving, my social life, and exercising (I am an avid runner).  I had a lot of trouble sleeping on this medication and it didn't help at all for pain relief. I threw this medicine out.
563: mild depression - restless let syndrome
564: i still have occasional headaches, but far less than the multiple migraines i had before.
565: the sound full night sleeps are amazing. \I only feel groggy for 10-15 minutes in the morning. \I am on 25mg tabs and I take them 2 hours before bed. \if \I stay up too long after that it makes my "skin feel crawly" so I make sure I can go to sleep
566: Reduced my nerve pain and aided in sleeping. Have been only taking 1/2 of 25 mg tablet before bedtime. Have had dry mouth and more than usual ringing in my ears. BUT I do not feel like I am myself. I plan to ask my doctor to take me off it.
567: I take 200 mg of amitriptling and I have notice that whrn I take my Loratab 10 mg I oover take the loratab does the 200 mg have any affect on the pain medicine most of the time i dont remenber taking the loratab its so much that I throw up, and I know that is dangerous
568: I have been taking 10 mgs of this drug for IBS for over a year. Within several weeks after beginning the use of this, I saw remarkable improvement. I've struggl with this problem all my life and today, I am completely free of IBS, using on 10 miligrams daily. I can eat what I want, make it through very stressful situations, without any negative effects. It's remarkable and I wouldn't trade this for $1m.
569: I have been taking this drug for about six months, within three weeks it started to help with my insomnia and the fibromyalgia. Gained about fourteen pounds tho, now it seems to be not working as well as before, pains coming back in my legs and arms, taking 25mg I'm not prepared to increase the dose cause I don't want to put on any more weight. Side effects of dry mouth quite bad, I use chewing gum and drink water usually at its worse in the morning when I wake. I find I sleep a lot later in the morning, don't wake up till about 10.00 am not so bad as I don't work.      Read More Read Less
570: it seems to work well
571: anxious, inability to sit still, hyped up, numbnessand burning in legs,hostility
572: Used for Fibromyalgia. Taking for several years at different strengths and has worked well for me dealing with the pain, but is lifesaver when it comes to helping me sleep.  If I don't take it, I do not sleep !
573: I was given these as doctor wanted to review my migraines and take me off my painkillers onto something new. I was lucky to review this just after 2wks after suffering some side affects.  After reviewing them it explained alot and the way I felt, feeling that had enough of life, stomach cramps and upset stomachs, dry mouth, restless nights
574: i just started taking this medication and so far i see no difference; previously i took it years ago and it cause me to be way too sleepy, so i take it at night and i have difficulty falling asleep. I am also taking seroquel and it still takes a while. I  take the amitriptyline at about 10pm and when ever i am ready to go to sleep i take the   seroquel. and i am awake for a while.
575: This medication worked very well for my insomnia.
576: I started taking this medicationn a few months ago 50mg ..cut pill in half and worked up to 50.. was feeling very tired throughout the day, but was getting the best sleep in years. I stopped taking because of fatigue.Now Dr. gave me 10mg. So I hope that will take care of my needs. And I was just diagnosed with Fibromylagia. So we'll see how it helps that.
577: Doctor prescribed 25mg for my 14 year old with chronic pain (headache).  It has been wonderful!! A different kid after the 3rd day!!  Also, seems to have cured her nocturnal enuresis (bedwetting).  So if you have a child with a bedwetting problems and chronic headache, talk to your doctor about this medication.
578: I was just prescribed this today as another noted, im almost afraid to take it after reading other posts. i will try but will deffinetly wait until the wkend when im off work!
579: Suffered from migraines for years, tried many different meds...amitriptyline was the first one to help me. I was on it for about 5 years, had one headache in that time and have been migraine free for almost 10 years.
580: Taken as an added med. for neuropathy but has made me sick at stomach and a little fuzzy headed. Cant tell if helps with my neuropathy. will side effects go away.?
581: blurred vision and seem to have trouble loosing weight
582: I've been taking this medication for about 2 months now, low dose, just 20mg at night, helps with my sleep but i have gained nearly 20lbs in 2 months, my Dr. says this is not from the medication but i think it is and i am going to stop taking this medication
583: I have for the first time in my adult life been free from migranes. I can think clearly and put together sentences, I can now live my life.
584: Migraines and pain with defecation 2 days in a row.  Stopped when I stopped taking it.  Then a week of crying.
585: KNOCKED ME OUT FOR 3 DAYS RIGHT THROUGH MY ALARM CLOCK. VERY SCARY! FELT I HAD BEEN IN AN AWAKE COMA. never ever again!
586: taking the medication for the prevention of migrine headaches
587: Causes drowsiness so take early before 8pm.
588: i just started it
589: I take ametriptyline for fibromyalgia symptons.  I still have the foggy brain but I'm sleeping better.  Dreams are common.  SHoulders a better.  I'm on the smallest dose.  If I take any more, I have no brain.  Migraines are gone.  I still have to be careful about my activities but I have my life back.  On the days when it just hurts too much, I take a whole pill and know I won't be good for much for 24 hours.
590: Been on this drug for 6 months dizzy feeling helps me sleep a little better next day feels groggy I find it hard to wake up . No  pain relief I have put on loads of weight was size12 now 22-24 and I've got a very sweet tooth and a dry mouth....... I'm in constant pain all the time.....don't know what to do .....
591: i was hoping to get rid of the migraines forever it has eased them i get exremly tired and exhausted being on it but i went almost 2 years in chroinic pain and vomitting from the mirgraines i'm nervous about swtiching meds they all seem to have the same side affects
592: This drug has helped with my depression after atwo weeks of use but it seems at times I have difficulty waking up and I do have the dry mouth and slight speech difficulties. Overall it is better that not taking anything.
593: This medicine has helped me so much I still have some bad bad headaches but for the most part it has worked..give it a try..and don't exspect miricles in the first month..it has to get in your system..i would recommend this to anyone who has migraines,,I call it mu miricle drug...so talk to your doctor about it..you will be amazed...
594: I HAVE Post-Traumatic Headaches from a fall and hitting my head. day one on Amitriptyline  I could start feeling relief from this drug,Overall, I have been satisfied with my experience on Amitriptyline.
595: I am bipolar and have been on many antidepressants to no avail finally went old school and it works great.  I am upto 100mg a day and sleep well doesn't do much for restless leg sydrome though am on mirapex for that.  I say it's great for depression.  My 12 yr old has been put on 50mg and is doing wonderful as he is bipolar also.  It gets rid of the rage and grumpyness after about 4 weeks.  Beware you will go through a weepy stage where you are coming into yourself.
596: It is also used for GI meds for controlling the gas of it.
597: This was prescribed for severe abdominal pain, caused by a partial bowel obstruction, as an alternative to a potentially dangerous surgery.  I have been taking this drug for about 6-8 weeks and over the last couple of weeks, I have gone so far as to fantasizing about killing myself, to almost acting upon it (went so far as to write the note).  I was so depressed after a difficult day at work, that I contemplated running my car off the road.  I have been treated for depression and thought I was having an repeat episode of the depression, but after thinking it through, I thought it may be something I was taking for pain management that was causing these unusual symptoms.  That is when I logged onto WEbMd and found the symptoms I am having are a well known side effect of this drug. I should have read the material provided by the pharmacy or researched this drug on WebMd before taking it.  Unfortunately, I could have been dead or seriously injured before anyone figured it was a known side effect of this drug.  I have yet to fully confirm this, but my symptoms line up too perfectly to really be organic.Read More Read Less
598: I was given this medication to help me sleep and for painful headaches. I have to admit I am sleeping great. My cholesterol is now high as well as my fasting blood sugars. I have also gained weight and crave sweets more than I did before taking this medication. I am going off this medication after being on it for 4 months.
599: I WAS ONLY SLEEPING 2-3 HOURS PER NIGHT NOW i SLEEP 6-7 HOURS PER NIGHT
600: I have several lumbar problems that includes nerve damage. I have been on 25mg for a month and doc bumped me up to 50mg. I have been able to sleep at night again but all I want to do all day is sleep and I have gained 20lbs. in one month and went to a DD bra size. I want my shape back. I teach middle school and big boobs and puberty (others going thru it not me) don't mix. It has helped with what it was meant for but I can't be sleepy with 75 students! I am going to discontinue asap. The weight just packed on without a change in diet
601: I have been taking this for 25 years for migraine prevention, abdominal migraines to be specific.  After a battery of test I was so glad my doctor tried this medicine.  I have been symptom free unless I am severely stressed.  I have had no "long term issues" others are stating.
602: I am taking 10 mg. tablet every evening to relieve colon problems. I would waken in the early morning with severe pain in my lower abdomen and could not go to the bath room. The meds have relaxed the colon and I no longer have a problem.
603: I've been taking this drug for off an on 13yrs. and for the last 6 yrs straight. I did gain some weight on it but the benefits FAR out way the side affects, i have a little more sweating than normal and a craving for chocolate but again none of those out weigh the benefits of it, it helps w my depression, sleeping, and OCD I think its a mirical drug!!
604: Prescribed for fibromyalgia.  Experiencing extreme difficulty sleeping, mind racing at night, getting hard to concentrate, more moody and angry, and pain is worse in my back, legs, and arms.  Only good thing about this drug is my migraines were less frequent.  But this is just too much to deal with in the last 3 weeks and it just keeps getting worse every day.
605: My doctor started me out on 25mg for chronic pain and sleep deprivation. After a month of staying awake throughout the night. He increased the dosage to 50mg. Amitriptyline nightly has proven successful in pain reduction and sleep deprivation. The next day I feel a little groggy but once I am up and moving, I feel fine.
606: Dr thought this medication would be a good match since I have ptsd anxiety depression and mood problems and suffer from migraines and sleep problems. 2 months in and migraines are worse I cannot sleep and it causes so many bodily problems it doesn't seem worth it.  Huge weight gain with less eating and I hate myself more for it. Diabetes is now out of control as well. Always tired but can't sleep lack of energy cant use the bathroom blurry vision headaches..... Just not worth it.
607: Weight gain has been massive since taking this medication although appears to be working, I have no reason for my extreme weight gain other than from this medication
608: Have been on Amitriptyline for 2& a half weeks, it's gr8, only side effect dry mth, I feel like my old self, singing, cooking, looking forward 2 daily routine, only drug that has helped wean me off Zopiclones, also on Venlafaxine, only on 10mg,1 extremely happy patient,
609: I had a HORRIBLE experience with this med. I was instantly severely depressed and hopeless. To the point of suicidal thoughts. As soon as the doctor weened me off and I wasn't taking it anymore I was ok day by day. I was not on this medication for depression or any other mental disorder and I had real knowledge of what some people go through while on this medication.
610: I was prescribed this drug for frequent headaches. I took a quarter of a 25mg. pill. Before I took this medication I had lost 40 lbs. I have since put at least 20 lbs. back on, wake up feeling like I've been hit by a truck, very groggy. Headaches have abated but I don't like how I feel or the weight gain at all!
611: I just started back on this med. After 10 yrs of not taking it duw to other medical issues... Had a T-6-7 Sping injury that left me with only numbness and tingling from my rib cage to my toes, and upper arms.  And chronic pain, and not being able to sleep, I am only on day 4 of restarting this med. And I do Sleep 7 hours before waking up with less pain. However the other  symptoms will never go away, A good nights sleep helps me function the next day. I have  been extremly thirsty this go round, but as before I know it will go away the longer I  take it.  I have never gained weight from this drug as others have.For those of use with spinal injuries and chronic back pain  It does the job very well. The longer taken  the better results. speaking from past experience, and hope to have the same results this time.  Read More Read Less
612: after using this drug for several years i have started having seizurea i do not under stand why
613: I have frybromyalgia and since I have been taking this medication I have no pain and rem sleep.
614: I HAVE FIBROMALIGHA, CONBINED WITH THE OTHER MEDICATIONS I TAKE IT WORKS FOR THE MOST PART.
615: i was put on this medicine after a tramatic experience to help me sleep. but all it seems to have done is cause weight gain and hair loss and in combination with my other meds it's only a matter of time until I am completly bald and extremely overweight. I am now seeing a therapist and nurse practioner so hopefully I can work with them and find meds to help me with out causing other problems.
616: I have been given all types of migraine meds. I have now been on this med for 1 year and 5 months. I have NOT had a migraine since taking it. I had severe migraines previously. I did miss one dose and I had a severe headache. I take 50mg every night.
617: I was given this to help me with my sleep and PTSD. I does not help me but makes me feel dreadful and just weird.
618: Not only was I drpressed, but I was haveing difficulty sleeping.  I took this medication about 30 minutes before going to bed and have slept through the night and it has brightened my mood.
619: I was prescribed amitriptyline for chronic pain and Sleep disorders. It works for me.
620: This works very well for REM sleep which is why it was prescribed for me. Restorative sleep quality.  Wake up refreshed most days (if not working). Before taking it, I just skimmed the surface of sleep all night, never really falling deep into sleep.  However, been taking long term and it may be the cause of my high blood pressure which developed somewhat soon after starting it more than 5+ years ago.  Would like to stop taking it but worry I won't get restful sleep.
621: Less sleepness nights, eases pain.
622: i take it to help me sleep.
623: I HAVE BEEN TAKING THIS MEDICATION FOR OVER 25 YEARS. IT IS A WONDERFUL MEDICINE! I STARTED TAKING IT FOR A SEVERE DEPRESSION.EVENTUALLY I GOT BETTER AND MY DOCTOR REDUCED THE DOSAGE TO BEWEEN 50-100 ML AT NIGHT FOR A GOOD NIGHTS SLEEP AND A MATINANCE DOSE.IT'S WORKED FOR ME ALL THESE YEARS AND IT IS SUPER CHEAP BECAUSE IT HAS BEEN AROUND FOREVER.
624: lets me sleep much better right thru the night.
625: I was prescribed 50mg per night after having to lose my legs and left digits, to help me sleep better and as a mild antidepressant. I gained weight (two sizes) and constipated. I had a dry mouth, blurred vision but good sleep. All the side effects have passed. My hair near all fell out BUT it did get me though. Infact it was weired my 'happiness', probably because I survived Necrotising Fasciitus (the flesh eating bacteria). Its been 6 months and I want to stop it but I'm told that's not easy but overall it did the desired effect, despite the adverse effects
626: I was prescribed this for nerve pain. I slept 16 hours a day, and would fall asleep in the middle of a task. I nearly dropped my friend's newborn baby while feeding him because I fell asleep. I ended up stopping the medication cold because I developed pelvic pain & urinary retention, which put me in the hospital for 3 days.
627: I have been living with debilitating excruciating pain for almost a year. I could not even stand for very long due to the pain, let alone walk. 
Received an injection into my spine and began taking this. Absolutely no pain. I have been on it for two months now and I do not have one bit of pain. For me, it was a miracle drug.
628: I am taking 10mg of this medication which is prescribe for body aches/fibromylgia. The pain is somewhat controlled when I take it I do find that I am getting a good 5 to 6 hours of sleep now vs 2 good hours of sleep before however recently I noticed when I take the medication my legs feel get extremly warm almost feverish where as the rest of my body tempature is normal I have actually taken the temperature on my legs which reads 102 and my forehead read 98 degress. I also find myself craving lots and lots of sweets and being a pretty athletic person who rarely ate any sweets this is concerning to me. My vision has gotten worse and its worrysome to me trying to do homework with my 9 year old is a little frustrating.  I am consulting my dr. on Monday.   Read More Read Less
629: n/a
630: I had suffered with Peripherel Nuropathy for 20 yrs , 18mths ago I was prescribed (Endep)& Ive had very little pain ever since. What bliss
631: Have been on this for a year, works great, little to no pain and much better attitude.  Have anxiety and grumpyness when not taking it.  Did experience weight gain though but will take that over the overall every day better quality of life that I have now.
632: I took the titration schedule as prescribed by my neurologist.  From day one forward I began feeling more and more agitated and that continued into restless hands/wringing then into full blown panic attacks. I have had  similar experiences before and luckily knew how to wait it out.  VERY long nights as a result of taking a full dose of this med.  No sleep at all. Panic/pain constant racing thoughts.  I stopped after three weeks per the doctor and I still cannot sleep at night, but then again, anything over two hours a night is a good night sleep for me.  I suffer chronic pain in my muscles and joints that keeps me up at night.  My chest/back muscles were so tight last year that a sneeze broke a rib! I have a naturally fused L-5 disk that my back muscles constantly protect. It feels like someone is sticking a fork in my back and twisting the muscles like spaghetti, or conversely it feels like a railroad spike is lodged in my back/neck/chest/shoulder/hips.    Only relief from vicodin but the NEED to take the next dose 20 minutes sooner than the last one was just too much.  Read More Read Less
633: Night mares, can't wake up, talking in sleep
634: Well about to start this med at night,along with my cymbalta and klonapin. Use for situational depression/not sleeping well/and pain in neck and back.     We shall see,not to impressed by all the negative feed backs on here.
635: it made me to sleepy all the time,could not stay awake,feeling of being out of my mind,could not drive do any of my things that needed to be done didnot have the mind to do them.JUST DON'T LIKE NOT BEING IN CONTROL OF MY SELF OR MY LIFE.       I WOULD NOT RECOMMEND THIS MEDICATION TO ANYONE.IN MY OPINION IF YOUR NOT IN CONTROL OF YOURSELF FROM TAKING MEDICATION DON'USE IT.
636: I take 10MG nightly and have done for 10+ years. It ensures a relaxed sleep, and eases my muscle discomfort.I suffer from polymyalgia and grand cell arteritis.
637: After several years of very painful Crohns flare-ups (intense intestinal cramping, loose stool, near constant stomach pain) the only thing that seemed to relieve the severe flareups was demoral. New(er) GI doc wanted me to try this drug to help control these symptoms, mostly the pain. The first month I really couldn't see any improvement... just felt drowsy and had a dry mouth. Almost 2 months now, and I have semi-normal bowel movements, and can tolerate some foods that would before near put me in the hospital. I think it has been helping with my depression too... so, I've been happy with it thus far
638: I know it takes some time for medicine to work so I took it for a week not noticing any real improvment in my joint pain. I took 1 pill a night to help me sleep by day 7 I was up til 3:00 a.m. with uncontrollable twitching in my muscles all over I was teriffied. I thought I was going to have a seizure. I eventually fell asleep and woke up with the same symptoms I was shaking and twitching half the day. I called my doctor and they immediatly took me off the medicine.
639: Stopped taking due to increased depression and grogginess in the morning.
640: The medication worked great.  I was prescribed for IBS but developed a rash so I had to stop taking
641: I suffered from a recurring daily migraine, which started to subside after about 6 weeks on this medication.  Side effects have included drowsiness, heartburn, cravings for sweets, and weight gain.  Taking it at night eases the dopey feeling somewhat.  Drink lots of water!
642: i so far have no problems
643: I was put on this medication to help manage my anxiety and insomnia, I have had nothing but positive results. I've been on it for several months and no longer have any trouble getting to sleep or any anxiety attacks since being put on this medicine.
644: I began taking amitriptyline several months ago because of RA or Fibromyalgia .. I come up positive with lab work for RA Factor but my symptoms are more of fibromyalgia ...anyway, this medication helps my pain.. started out on 10mg but was increased to 20mg because pain was still hanging around...I also take Relafen as well...I feel much better BUT, I am so spaced out !!!! I work in a Dr's office and my mind is so in a fog that I actually cut back on one pill last evening...I awakened during night but was able to fall back to sleep...did feel achy this morn but better now... I simply cannot stand being in a stupor at work... other techs I have walked up on talking about me.... I have never been a rocket scientist but NEVER this FOGGY/FORGETFUL and it seems to be getting worst...I actually am considering on stopping it all together and I will contact my doctor's office for a substitute....Would appreciate f/b if U have experienced the same or similar problems.....Read More Read Less
645: It helps the pain in the bottom of my feet.
646: Was prescribed for tension headaches and it has worked great.  I have had no side effects.
647: Anyone have a child on this med?  I have a 13 yr old girl and she has just been prescribed this med for depression and insomnia.  Not sure if it's really helping yet (only on 8 days).  I'm worried about side-effects.  Can anyone help with more info?  Thanks
648: Constant headaches went away soon after starting amitriptyline, though I did feel somewhat giddy after 2 weeks. After a month, Rx ended, but my HA stayed away another month or so.
649: prescribed for chronic migraines, i definitely have had great results for the headaches and sleep better at night but am concerned about weight gain and feeling "foggy" during the day, anyone else have this?
650: I take this for Neuropathic Pain in my feet and lower legs. Works especially well with Gabapertin for this pain. Take it alone if it helps even 50% because Gabapetin makes you gain weight. Also, Amitrytiline causes severe drowsiness that gets worse for increased dosages.
651: Helps me fall asleep but everynight that I have taken this medication, it has caused me to have very bad dreams.
652: I was put on this med for severe migraines. Not only did my head keep hurting, I wanted to blow it off my shoulders! I became angry at the world, and impossible to be around. I began to think about hurting myself or someone else. Luckily my family noticed the changes immediately and I was able to get off the meds before it was too late. I am so thankful that I didn' do anything stupid in the short time I was taking this drug.
653: I have been 10mg for almost 3 weeks. I have been increasingly tired all day and starting to crave sweets more and more. I am so glad to see that it is also effecting others the same. I thought I was just getting lazy. I want to sleep all day. I sleep very well at night but dont ever want to wake up. When I do, I dont want to do anything. I am now worried about the weight gaining. I am overweight as it is....ALTHOUGH not one migraine, which is fabulous.....Vanity is nothing compared to being migraine free!!!!Read More Read Less
654: I am 32 years old and i was prescribed this medication for my headaches and neck pain. Im taking 10mg right now and have been on it for a month and the first 2 weeks were not good. I felt tired and not like myself.. i also felt non-social, which that is the opposite of me. but i stayed on it in the hopes that it would change and it did. All of a sudden one day i felt like me again. Before my mouth was REALLY dry and i felt dizzy, short of breath. Now i sometimes have dry mouth but not where it bothers me. I still feel a little short of breath so i am going to tell my doctor about it but all and all i feel better
655: My doctor prescribed 50mg at bedtime to relieve diabetic neuropathy pain/burning in my feet at night.  I only take 30 - 40mg at bedtime every or every other night at it keeps my neuropathy under control.  The relief was immediate.  I have gained approximately 10 lbs. and I am a gastric bypass patient.
656: I was prescribed this about a year ago and my migraines have significantly improved and I feel less tired during the day. There was an adjustment period of about 2 weeks for me where I was extremely tired in the morning, but after that, my body adjusted and I no longer am in a daze. I take 10mg a day at nighttime and it definitely also helps me fall asleep better at night.
657: It has been almost 1 month that I have been taking only 10 mg at bedtime.  I used to wake up every 3 hours and felt exhausted for so long.  After about 3 weeks I am sleeping great but I want to sleep longer than 8 hours. Also I have notices a weight gain. (Oh God)  that's not good at all for me my weight is my main reason for depression.  I am persisiting and watching my diet now that I know why I have these cravings.
658: i have been taking amitriptyline for a couple weeks.  then I took 2 tabs cause the dr told me I might need to try to increase if i have a migrain, which I did.  I felt strange, dizzy, tired the next day so I decided to decrease and only take .25.  Today I had a panic attack.  I wonder if I should continue taking it...also wonder what causes the panic.
659: Perscribed for IBS.  Took it for 2 nights (25mg).  Was serverly groggy all day long.  Brain fog as well.  Did not continue treatment so don't know if it would have worked for my IBS.
660: When I remember to take the medication it works really well. But I don't want to be on this the rest of my life.
661: I was prescribed this drug for tingling and foot pain and it truly does stop the pain and tingling.  Does give you an appetite.
662: EASES MY PAIN AND PUTS ME TO SLEEP...
663: Causes  confusion , forget what your doing, dizzy feeling all the time, dry mouth ,can not remember anything , not able to recall almost anything, and hands shacking . Almost impossible to stop taking, you crave one pill to take to stop the pain if you try to quit ! This should be against the law to take for anyone. When you stop taking this medication the pain level get like 60 time worse than ever ! Makes you feel like a zombie !
664: it does nothing for me, i was on for about3yrs, even when I first started bto tKE THIS MED NOTHING HAPPEN OR CHANGE, MAYBE MY IMMUNE SYSTEM WHERE TO STRONG FOR IT.
665: My neurologist prescribed 25mg daily and in two days the pain was under control. Did start having dry mouth/burning tongue but did not think it was due to medication. Neurologist took me off med after 5 months because of the dry mouth. After stopping usage, the neuropathy pain returned in 3 days, with the dry mouth/burning tongue had no change.So I started back on medication and the neuropathy is back under control. I am not convinced the medication is the problem because burning tongue symptons should have been minimized.Read More Read Less
666: I have been using 175 mg of amitriptyline at bedtime for 7 years.  It has not helped my migraines but has really helped my sleep.  If I sleep better, I feel better and I can't sleep without it.  I am on other preventative meds and use rescue meds when needed but unfortunately nothing helps my migraines.  I have dry mouth and weight gain but it is worth it to me so I will continue to take the med.
667: became very angrey and hostil, but was very very effective in prevention of my migraines
668: Pt.is to be to sleeper in the am
669: I used Amitriptyline to help prevent attacks of cataplexy. Unfortunately, there wasn't any improvement whatsoever in that regard. However, I rarely suffered from sleep paralysis while on it. I'd still be taking it if it didn't conflict with another medication.
670: I wish I were back on this to help me sleep better, a little anxety too..
671: treatment for ibs
672: Im 17yrs old and have suffered from severe headaches and fatigue for over two years now. I have only been talking this drug for ten days and although my headaches still often occur something is different and I am hopeful that this drug will have a bigger effect on my symptoms in the near future.
673: I have been diagnosed with fibromyalgia for over 20 years, and amitryptilin has been a godsend for me for the entire time I've had fibro.  Although I have the overall pain, fatigue and sleep disturbances were my biggest complaint with fibro.  Started on 25 mg Elavil at bedtime, and have found deep, restful sleep which helps reduce my pain levels.  I have had to increase dosages over the yrs due to drug tolerance, but am finding a good balance with sleep/pain at 75 mg.  Yes, it does have potential side effect of weight gain, but even at 75 mg, I was still able to lose 50+ lbs via Weight Watchers from Jan-Dec 2009, and kept it off.  I hope I never have to stop taking it.  Without it, I cannot fall alseep for many hrs or will wake several times during the night and never reach deep sleep.Read More Read Less
674: its one of the 4 different nighttime meds i take to shut my mind down so s i can sleep
675: 38 YEARS OLD...GOD GAVE ME THE GIFT OF R.A. CANT SLEEP DO TO THE PAIN IN MY JOINTS...THIS MED STINKS..1ST DAY 25MG SLEPT FOR 20 HRS,FELT LIKE I WAS IN A COMA FOR DAYS...SINICE I SLEPT 2ND DAY THE 3RD DAY WAS FORGETTIN EVERYTHING,LEGS FELT LIKE A TON OF JELLO..EXTREME DRY MOUTH..BEEN ON NOW FOR 2 WEEKS AND STILL CANT SLEEP NOW,JUST DRINKING ALOT MORE WATER,LOCKING MY KEYS IN THE CAR MORE OFTEN,AND FOR GETTIN MY ATM PIN NUMBER I HAD FOR 20 YEARS....DAMM
676: I have been on this med for a lil over a week now and it's helping with my migraines, but i'm always craving sweets. i feel like i've gained a lot of weight since last week. I never really ate sweets before i started taking this. It's making me have crazy dreams and i'm doing things in the middle of the night that i can't remember. ive started kicking real bad in my sleep. i'm always thirsty. and about 2 hours after i've been up i start feeling like i took a xannax or something. i've also noticed that i'm losing my hair. i am not liking this medicine at all b/c of the side effects. but as far as preventing my migraines it's done okayRead More Read Less
677: Earlier this year I spent 47 days suffering from migraines, vertigo, and nausea.  After many different tests and several doctors, I was referred to a neurologist who said I was experiencing "menopause" and he told em to take 1 pill every day at bedtime and see if it helped.  Within 10 days my vertigo had stopped, as did the nausea, and by day 12 my migraines ceased.  I am thrilled that such a low dose has relieved my symptoms - now I just wonder how long is this menopause crap going to last???
678: i've had a lot of migraines in my life. this is the best solution so far. at first it made me very sleepy. i still am a little bit. it gets better with time. i do however have some migraines but not as before.
679: It work's for me
680: I take 50mg at bedtime along with 2400mg of gabapetin. Relieves stabbing and much of burning sensations. Sleep thru night better, tired during day. But well worth the minor effects for relief of horrible pain.
681: I have been on it for a week. If I wake up at nite I can't fall back to sleep my mind is racing and my body starts twiching. Also during the day I have the shakes. I also take Lamotrigine which I have been on for 3 months.
682: Great for migraine prevention, BAD for weight control. I have been on a 50mg dose for three months, and have gained 20lbs. I am foggy in the morning, and do need a cup of coffee to get going. On weekends when I have no alarm, I will sleep until 11am, quite different from my normal 8am wakeup on the weekends...
683: My mother has taken this medication for 6 months now and it is wonderful.  She is 86 years old and was on ambien for quite a while for sleeping.  It took about a month but now she feels so much better and sleeps ALL night. I would recommend this for anyone just give it time to work,  you will be glad you did.
684: I use to get migraines all the time, they would basically immobilize me. I take Amitriptyline as a preventive measure... &  knock on wood, I have only had one bad migraine since January; when I use to get them almost 4-5 times a month.    I think this was probably the best thing my neurologist ever did for me!
685: Well I was perscribed this drug after a life altering experience that caused me to loose sleep so I guess you can say for insomnia. It definatly helped but I have a hard time waking up and recovering from the drug induced stuper it seems to put me in. The question I have is has anyone experienced memorie loss with this because I have BIG TIME!!!! Maybe it's because it makes me soooooo sleepy but i have to give it credit it helped me sleep!!!
686: I feel irritable and have put on a tremendous amount of weight
687: I have been extremely pleased with this treatment, I have got out of an unhealthy relationship & also had my father pass away & 2 job losses, this drug is gr8, stopped getting dizzy & enjoying reading again, Mum said I am a different person, 1 happy as person again
688: Phantom pain in rectom has not decreased.  Have scar tissue from having total cholectoral  (ileostomy) surgery 50 yrs ago
689: i was put on this drug due to a back injury, which i was also unable to sleep. My dr. put me on this i did have dry mouth for a while but at the time it work well i took 100 mg at night and had to take 10-20 mg in the mid morning to help with more pain as i kept taking it after long term use it no longer works. I also had decreased sex drive, no sex drive while taking it but for the pain and not sleeping it did work and is worth a try,
690: this med helps my fibro pain,sleep problems and in turn the PTSD and anxeiety by quieting the pain and assissiting the depression. This med I have used for post partum depression years ago till it became used for fibro it's under rated -effective and safe
691: Ok I have severe sleep deprevation From what i have read so far I am not so sure this treatment is for me I HAVE no depression disorders this medication sounds dangerous
692: After 18 months of chronic insomnia (trouble staying asleep) that was ruining my life, I was prescribed 50mg to take at bedtime.  This drug probably saved my life.  I now sleep and can easily go back to sleep if I get up during the night.  The only (but serious) drawback is the weight gain.  I've been on it for 1 year and gained 10 lbs in 6 months-all fat and my cholesterol has skyrocketed despite a strict diet and exercise regimen.  I've tried to wean off, but then the insomnia returns, but at least I'm sleeping again.  Tough choice.Read More Read Less
693: I was taking medicine for headaches about 3 times a day. My headaches have decreased to about 1-3 per week. It is wonderful not to constantly have headaches!  The only side effect I have noticed is constipation & bloating.
694: I am shocked how many different "diagnosis" doctors treat with this drug!  This is exactly why I do NOT see doctors.  I refuse to be a lab rat.  If you are depressed...change your lifestyle.  DON'T Take mind altering drugs.
695: After not sleeping at all for 5 1/2 months...yes it is possible and I'm not dillusional...I was put on 150 mg. of Amitriptyline.  It took 5 long weeks before I was able to finally fall asleep.  I have now been sleeping very well for the last five years.  Helped releive chronic pain also.  I am so thankful.
696: I have been taking this medicine to help me sleep. Yes I sleep but the quality of sleep SUCKS! I have very bad dreams. I wakeup and am afraid to go back to sleep. I scream in my sleep. I also sweat ALOT! I wake up in puddles. I have to sleep with a towel under me. I like others have gained alot of weight. This medicine has also brought my bloop pressure and pulse way up. Here's the funny thing.......my doctor did not take me off this medicine. She said all my problems were because of Paxil. No more Paxil and these problems are getting worse. So she gave me hydroclorthyazide. Funny how it took me getting on this website to know I don't need that & I definately will not take this medicine again. In my case, the good effects do NOT out weigh the bad.Read More Read Less
697: i am very happy with this medicine as it helped me allot and feel much better. mood and energy.....
698: I have been taking this medication (25mg) for many years alongside with Topomax.  Did not do much for my headaches (that is why I was prescribed it. But I sleep much better and wake up rested (as long as I don't oversleep (I need just 6 hours of sleep).  My mood is much better, I feel more positive and stronger emotionally.    But I still have headaches and manage them with yet different meds.
699: I am very happy with this drug  My healthcare marks it as dangerous but it has caused me no problems in the 25MG dose I take.  I had worked up to 100MG but that did cause dizziness and I went back to 25MG.  It does not completely eliminate my night time neuropathy but it lets me sleep.  I am not aware of any mood effects.
700: last night was my fisrt night taking this drug. the doc prescribed me 25mgs for anxiety and  imsonia. the first 2 hrs of taking it i experienced horrible anxiety attacks. the only good thing that happened was i slept 12 hrs straight(havent slept for months) but when i woke up i wasgroggy, foggy, shaky, numb and tingly all day. it has been exactly 24 hrs since my first dose and still experiencing all this. im not sure if its because it was a high dose or if im just not able to take this drug. anyone experienced this stuff to? Read More Read Less
701: Doctor recommended a 2.5mg dosage and having difficulty to cut these tiny tablets in four to accomodate the recommended dosage.
702: I took the 50 mg dose for two months, and although the med worked, there were too many side effects associated with its use. I felt very foggy-headed most of the time, like I couldn't recall stored information easily. Every day, all day was a fight to stay awake. I felt that at any givent time I could fall asleep. I gain about 10 lbs. and craved sweets frequently. I had dry mouth and drank so many caffienated drinks throughout the day. My speech slurred at times. I was very constipated. I felt that reality was distorted most of the time. most of all, I felt that I was not me. My dose was lowered to 25 mg. about 3 weeks ago and I still have the same symptoms. I would rather deal with the pain.Read More Read Less
703: constant dreaming,sleep longer, very angry feelings
704: i am on this for vestibulitis/vulvodynia and pain when passing urine. Been on it for over three weeks and feel better. Haven't suffered any bad side effects apart from difficulty getting to sleep at night.
705: it has given me memory loss.gain weight.dizziness only on 10 mg.but it did make me feel no pain and gave me good sleep.......
706: My doctor put me on amitriptyline for migraines and it works great. Where I was suffering with migraines at least 3-4 times a month,since taking amitriptyline I rarely get migraines at all now maybe 1 every other month and they are not as severe. I have not had any of the side effects at all which is rare for me. I am very senstitive to medication, but this has worked great for me. Highly recommend this medication.
707: I have a difficult time sleeping
708: I was started on 25mg per day to prevent migraines. Before taking this medication I was getting migraines daily, now I only get them about 3 times a month. Although, this medication has tremendously improved the frequency of my migraines i still have my reservations. I have gained about 10 lbs in 6 weeks and also have sudden mood changes. The mood swings are very apparent and have been pointed out by my husband and children. I also have VERY dry mouth which has lead me to drink tons of water which may have also contributed to my weight gain. The medication also helps me sleep which is an extra bonus, i dont feel overly tired or groggy in the morning. Im considering switching to another preventative due to the side effects. I hope this review helps others that are seeking control over their migraines.Read More Read Less
709: Was on Effexor but suffered major headaches, and loss of sleep.  This med seems to work better for me. No headaches and I sleep soundly.  No side-effects has described by others.
710: I hate taking amitriptyline for nerve pain. The side effects are terrible -weight gain and sleepiness. The only reason I am taking it is for severe pain. I couldn't tolenierate most of the other drugs. I wish there was a better drug with less side effects.
711: I gained considerable pain relief from my periferal neurolpathy.  The positive effect on mood was a pleasant by-product
712: I have been on this medication for 6 years. It works for me, no more headaches. Helps me go to sleep. Side effects are weight gain and dry mouth, but it is worth not having headaches all the time.
713: for leg spasms
714: Prescribed for nerve pain and inability to sleep during chemo, it was a great help in both areas.   Had to come off of it very slowly decreasing the daily dose by 5mg every 4 weeks due to heart palpitations and increased feelings of anxiety.  Come off of it very slowly for the easiest withdrawal.
715: I have found this drug very helpful, I have tried up to 3 Doctors, the 2nd one put me on this drug but wouldn't up it at all due 2 me taking sleeping pills as well, the 3rd Dr upped the sleeping pills by half & upped the ammi's & never been better, the 3rd Doctor worked 4 me not for himself, there is help out there, but depression is mainly a mind thing, nobody understands, I got this due 2 a relationship problem & family do this, do that did not help, you know when you feel better, Doctors need to learn to listen to their patients needs, not what they want, just because u on sleeping pills as well, you are far more likely 2 come off them if u are understood,Read More Read Less
716: Would 200mg.nightly for sleeping be excessive?
717: This medication was prescribed after several anti inflamitory drugs did not work.  I took two 25 mg. that night and the next morning my pain was gone.  I have been on this for 15 years.
718: My doctor put me on this to help with IBS and to sleep better.  No improvment with IBS, but I'm sleeping a lot better.  Problem is I don't want to do anything during the day.  Very groggy and tired.
719: BEEN ON LOWEST DOSE AT BED TIME CAN I STOP TAKING OR DO I NEED TO WEEN OFF?
720: I just got perscribed this medicine yesterday, along with diclofenac. I took them last night and fell asleep on my couch for two hours and didnt even know id done it until i woke up. I have been groggy and out of it all day (at work) I described it as feeling kinda like a zombie. Im not sure if this is normal for this med, the other one or if its just a fluke. But it is kind of annoying.
721: I have not noticed anything this drug has really done besides it makes me very very sleepy groggy and weird feeling the next day. I like most of the folks on the review have had serious weight gain. I approched my Urioliogist today about the weight gain and he told me this drug did'nt cause weight gain... Umm.. i think it does! I'am on several other drugs for my bladder problem also, getting ready for a possilbe bladder strech in a couple of weeks. I hope to be off all medications after the sugery. Thanks to everyone who posted the reviews, it has helped alot !! Read More Read Less
722: I have several diagnosis that this medication works on.  First and foremost is the migraine.  I would be in the ER 3-6 times a month for emergency pain management.  Now maybe one minor one every couple of months and all I need is an excedrin.  Second, I have bipolar depression.  This medication added to my others really brought the depression more in line.  I really really like this medication.  One important key to this is to slowly ween yourself on to the drug.  If a high dosage is started with, you could get bad reactions. You should titrate 25mg every two weeks and continue increasing by one pill every two weeks until you are migraine free and it get you to where you don't have them anymore.  If you need to come down off the medication quickly for any reason, please don't just stop.  you need to reduce your medication as described by your doctor.  generally you do the same thing backwards, but only four days dosages at a time.  Read More Read Less
723: what do the pills look like
724: this medication did a great job and worked very well
725: IDK really how I should rate this med.  I am a 5yr sufferer of chronic pain, and as of late my situation has gotten worse doe to a failed ACDF, and therefore pain is unbearable all of the time, but is somewhat controlled by a cocktail of medications, 2 being strong narcotics. My injury and failed surgery has altered my life completely. I am deemed disabled at this time, due to all work Ive done in the past has been physical laboring jobs, so needless to say can't do that anymore.  So became severely depressed, self-harming, wanting to just give up so I often have suicide ideations.  So I asked my doc to put me on an anti-depressant for depression, plus it helps when added to other medications to better help with chronic pain. I have taken it 2 nights, the first time I got the 24hr flu so I puked all night(don't believe the med had anything to do with it), 2nd night I fell asleep maybe 2hrs after taking it and I stayed asleep for the first time in many yrs, however, I could not wake up, stayed asleep till noon the next day slept 11hrs straight. Oh no cant do that.  Most of the post are scaring me, I even specified not to prescribe one with side effect of weight gain, due to the fact I am limited to what I can do physically due to injuries and chronic pain but I got it anyways and Im not going to stop it yet but I don't know if I can take 4wks of sleeping all the time, what a waste of precious time, however it was nice to acturally sleep through the night and not wake in pain,or by the nerve pain which always woke me on avg. 4x a night. So idk if this is for me, I will for sure stop if I see weight gain, oh hecks no.  I am in good shape, in body image meaning, not physically pursay, and I dont want to lose it. What to do what to do, plus I read the majority of the reviews and not many if any are on this for depression, docs dont listen or care they just keep throwing drugs at you to shut you up, I seriously feel like I get played every visit.wish to 4c the outcome...Read More Read Less
726: I was having 3-5 migraine headaches a week, that nothing seemed to cure other than patience. My doctor prescribed Amitriptylin, which I have been taking for about a year and a half. It worked! I have had maybe 3 migraines since beginning this drug, not including regular headaches that can be helped with Excedrin OTC. The only issue I have is that this makes me EXTREMELY drowsy. I take it at night and even after a normal nights sleep, it is very difficult for me to wake up in the morning. I have to set 2 alarms and hit snooze several times on both of them
727: i now stay focus without different thoughts going on
728: My 12 year old son takes this med for his migraines. He takes 10mg at night to help prevent his migraines. Since he started taking it his headaches are not as severe (no more vomiting) and they are less frequent, however he does still get them & he still misses school. His doctor bumped him up to 20mg 2 weeks ago, I've noticed my son is now too mellow, seems zombie like so I'm switching him back to 10mg. He did say he sleeps a lot better when he takes 20mg but it's not worth having a 12 yr old with no personality or drive, so I'm lowering the med back to 10mg
729: have taken this for almost a year it has reduced my migraines 100 fold.  Now I don't have to get in a panic if bacon touches my food.
730: I was prescribed this for a spasmotic colon. Initially 25mg per day then increased to 50mg per day.   While it helped with controlling the daily diarrhea, it makes me very tired.  It is hard to get up and get going.  I'm not sure what to do, it works great for controlling my colon but I feel like a zombie all day.
731: I USE TO TAKE THIS MEDICATION,AT THE FIRST FEW MONTHS I DID FAIRLY WELL WITH IT AND THEN I STARTED TO FORGET WHETHER OR NOT IF I HAD TAKEN MY DAILY DOSES,AND WOULD TAKE ANOTHER TO BE SURE.IT MADE ME FORGETFUL AND THEN I STARTED DOING THINGS I DIDNT REMEMBER DOING AND TALKING TO PEOPLE THAT WASNT EVEN THERE.I STOPPED THIS MEDICATION DUE TO THIS,IT WAS CAUSING ME MORE PROBLEMS THAN I ALREADY HAD.
732: Made me sleepy most of the day, dizzy, and I had terrible headaches. Just did not worked for me. Now I'm on Celexa. I can feel the difference.
733: Overall this medicine is a God-send, however I have gained some weight in the mid-section that I seem unable to get off.
734: Doctor prescribed 50mg for restless leg syndrome.  Took 1 pill and will definitely throw away rest of rx.  Woke up in the middle of the night with severe restless leg pain and have spent all of today in a "brain fog".  I am taking venlafaxine for depression and maybe it interacted with amitriptyline in a negative way.
735: Was on this med for a month for depression, anxiety , and cronic back pain. As far as the pain goes it was somewhat effective the first couple of weeks.For the other conditions, not very affective and too many side affects.
736: I was prescribed 25 mg at bedtime to enable me to sleep after my first back surgery. I would wake up with  pain which prevented me from sleeping through the night. Before being prescribed this medicine, I could only sleep for about 4 hours then would wake up in tears. My quality of life was horrible. While on the medicine, I was very thirsty. I started drinking LOTS of water, sometimes up to a gallon a day.  I think this prevented me from gaining weight; in fact, I was able to lose weight and felt good due to being rested, as well.  I have NOT been taking it for a couple of years but think I will go back on it as menopause symptoms are interfering with getting any restorative sleep.  My dad was recently prescribed 75 mg for cluster headaches after trying several other medicines. It's working well for him, as well.  I think this is truly a wonderful medicine.  Read More Read Less
737: Ok , so i have Anxiety with on and off episodes of Depression 
But also Ibs and gerd symptoms
as well as chronic fatigue 
I take this 25 mg at night after eating and before going to bed
For people with these issues like me , it will work from day one 
I dont know how but this medicine clearly effects your brain and/or body aside from antidepressant
I took it for my digestive issues and anxiety (either can cause the other)
Please talk to your doctor about this if those are your three main symptoms as very few other antidepressants deal with all three and people that those work for usually dont have digeative issues and/or chronic fatigue
Also take Rabeperazol for my GERD , neither have sideeffects , nor do they take time to relieve physical issues 
Been 2 Months , my health is still recovering whole on them but as i said they start working from day one (for fatigue and digestive issues) while anxiety takes 2 or so weeks to show changes
(Remember though : I started taking both together so i dont know what relieves what exactlRead More Read Less
738: In addition to migraine prevention, also take this med to enable me to reach REM sleep. I just finished reading 142 reviews that confirmed the biggest side effect I've experienced - weight gain of 30 lbs in 6 months - - have always been athletic and in pretty good shape, weighing 125-130. Was size 8; am now size 12 and VERY unhappy with self. Also experience memory problems, grogginess/drunken feeling upon awaking, want to sleep longer, have constant CRAVING for sweets, am constantly hungry, have dry mouth, constantly clearing throat, drinking lots of water due to increase in thirst, constipation, lack of energy.  It HAS helped with prevention of migraines;  however, not worth it to me to continue taking.Read More Read Less
739: BOY, where do I start.  I strongly feel that this medication is making my symptoms WORSE!!  I have chronic fatigue, lyme disease, fibermalgia, epstein barr and an immune system disorder.  I recently went through thyroid cancer, having it removed.  My sleep...well, this med does help that BUT, I wake up VERY tired, wanting to sit and sleep even the next day..all day.  I think that this med has also caused weight gain, something that I don't want to do!!  After reading the posts on here, I think even more so then I did before that this med is NOT for me.  I am tired..but more tired of feeling like dead weight, not wanting to do anything!!  I am going to aswkmy doc to check me for PSO, but I think this med is causing most of my symptoms.  Some days I feel well, most all days exhausted!  I am SO hoping that I dont need to be weaned off this, only on 10mg/per night, but I am stopping this med tonight.  Now I am wondering how long it will be before it is out of my system.  THANKS eveyone who has posted on this board.....you helped alot.  If you take the time to read ALL the posts as I did, you will see most are against this med.  Sometimes I wonder if the meds that we take make things worse.  Good luck to all and thanks so much to WebMD for allowing us to voice our thoughts and feelings.  It really does help to know that others think and feel as we do and know that it's "not in our heads" as to how we feel when going through different things (illnesses) in our lives.  Read More Read Less
740: I have been taking it for 20 years...my hair is falling out bad ,i believe it is because of this drug.
741: I took this med for migraine prevention and insomnia. Worked great for these conditions but I gained 60 lbs in about 10 months. Until reading this message board, I didn't know that it caused weight gain. I didn't know why I had gained so much, but now I have a pretty good idea. I have always been thin, unable to gain weight even if I wanted to. I was 5'8" tall and weighed 110-115 lbs. Now I weigh almost 170. I am angry that I was not warned of this potential side effect.
742: My doctor prescribed this medication for my insomnia & anxiety, i have been on it for 5 months. 2 major side-effects that i have experienced is massive weight gain, 10kg+ and extreme night time tremors/hallucinations and difficulty waking up in the morning. This medication is a general bandaid for a majority of conditions because it’s well known and was one of the first anti-depressants but i don’t recommend it for insomnia at all.
743: this medicine has helped with chronic leg pain at night but i have a hard time waking up in the morning and all i want to do is sleep now and i feel tired all day adn oh my gosh all i can think about is eating sweets which have made me gain weight , but overall it works and i have a hard time falling asleep becausse of being so hot after taking the medicine i have night sweats with it real bad
744: i have been on this medication for 3 weeks with no relieve at all. i did gain 3lbs. i slept all night but nothing for my migraines.
745: no results
746: I was put taking this for headeaches but it doesnt work for me. rather i stated having chest palpitation, shortness of brething, dizziness most of the days. extremely lightheaded and dosent feel like getting out my bed. loss of appetite, dry mouth and stif neck. very bad med for my body.I only took it for one week. I have to find another dr. OMG!!
747: Taking this drug for fibromyalgia sleep disorder, Take 2 10 mg tablets 1 hour before bed. Have gone off of it and those times have proven to me how important this drug is to my sleep and pain control.
748: I was getting migraines almost daily, with this medication I haven't had a migraine since I started using it. Now I've only been using it for a little over a week but for anyone with migraines any day without one, much less a week is a great day.
749: works great
750: It took adleast 6 months for the drug to take the edge off of my pain.  The concern now is the irregular heart beats that I am experiencing.
751: Started taking it and noticed improvement in my migraine the next day!! i even stopped taking it for a day just to be sure it was working and sure enough got a migraine!!!
752: I was prescribed this drug for anxiety and to help me sleep better. I am definitely sleeping better and I have less anxiety. I take 25 mg at night before bed.
753: I have just started taking amitrpityline to help me sleep. So far it is working good as far as helping me get to sleep at night, but I am finding that I am feeling groggy and kind of spaced out during the day too. Not so sure I want to keep taking this drug.
754: I have been prescribed Amitriptyline 10 mg for Functional Dyspepsia. I have Chronic Esophagitis and a small Hiatal Hernia. My main problem was severe stomach ache which I discovered was worse after eating anything with wheat or dairy. A dietitian put me on the FODMAP diet, but by week three into it, it was clear to me that the pain would no go by diet alone. I am waiting for the Hydrogen Test to establish if I am lactose intolerant. A previous Fructose Hydrogen Test already showed that I have "delayed fructose intolerance" (that is, pain and gas start after an hour and last for days). Being sensitive to any kind of PPI (which made the pain much worse, in my case), my gastroenterologist suggested Amitriptyline as a last resort. I hate medicines and their side effects, so I was reluctant; until a slice of bread knocked me down with pain for three days! On Amitriptyline, I was drowsy for the first two days; by day five I was "mentally" ok. The very good thing is that from day three I had no more stomach pain. I am writing on the 11th day and I am ok. The only downside is that my belly is a bit swollen, which is a problem  many users of Amitriptyline have (I checked online). My GP told me that I could double the dose after a week from starting it, but I have no pain and I don't want to get fat! If I become really large, I'll try and stop it to see if the pain returns; otherwise, I am happy to continue with it.Read More Read Less
755: I just stopped the amitriptyline a couple of weeks ago. I have been taking it for over a year - 50 mg a day for chronic pain. I gained 10 pounds from the medication, it made me groggy, very hungry and I had some hair loss. I am going to a chiropractor which helped my pain. I did not feel good on it. Now I am going to concentrate on losing the weight that I gained. The chiropractor help my pain with cold laser and traction.
756: not really sure it is working still have pain.
757: I have been prescribed amitryptylin five times since mid teens ( now 64) .Also, working in a highly stressful job in advertising led to my being aware many times over 20 years of others being prescribed it. The only symptom experienced while taking it was a dry mouth and I have never heard of anyone getting any withdrawal symptoms. It is out of your system in three weeks ( Prozac as a Benzodiazapine is only clear two years after stopping it)   It takes a couple of weeks for its effect to kick in but well worth it.Read More Read Less
758: i was in 2 bad car accidents had alot of head injury suffer from migraines stiff neck shatterd foot hip and leg painsi take this to try 2 sleep it does help but i been on 25 mgs for like almost 3 weeks seems like i need a stronger dose
759: Taken for neuropathy.  Started with 50mg. I am up to 225mg. with no relief from the pain.
760: I started taking the pills after I couldn't afford Topomax presciption price which was back in Nov 2008. So I've been on this medicine for 4 months now and have gained up to 35 lbs. I was weighing 110 and now I'm at 140. I'm content with the way I looked after gaining alot of pounds and how it controls my migraines. Most people said I look better with a few lbs on me.
761: The pain doctor prescribed it for osteoarthritis pain management but it did not help at all.
762: This helps the severe pain of fibromyalgia  and enables me to do more and to sleep better.
763: Fibromyalgia pain has decreased and I am sleeping better
764: i take it because i have trouble sleeping
765: This has really been a life saver for me.  I started low 25mg and gradually went up to 150mg.  I then decided that was too much, so I gradually went back down to 50mg and there I stay.  I like it the most for the fact that it helps me sleep and I don't have any hangover effect.  It takes a couple weeks to get balanced on it, but it's worth it.
766: HELPED WITH ALLEVIATE MY ANXIETY AN SOME DEPRESSION AN RELIEVE VOMITING
767: Dry mouth, dry eyes, dry skin - everything is dry, but it helps me sleep and control some of the systems of Fibromyalgia.
768: My doctor put me on a graduated dose which is now at the highest of 50mg for cough headaches.  It seems to have eliviated the pain for the most part but I am noticing a weight gain and mostly in my stomach.  I'm not happy with that and am wondering which is worse taking the meds and gaining weight or having cough headaches!
769: I was given this medicine for restless legs. I experienced aggitation, restlessness, insomnia, sleep deprivation, narcarlepsy, loss of voluntary muscule control, paralysis while conscious, could not move or speak for upwards of 30 minutes.  Condition improved after discontinuing the medication.
770: Depression and insomnia, I had taken this med in extremely large doses. It took 300mg. to put me to sleep. I didn't have any luck or other meds made me hallucinate or sleep walk. It seemed to be the only alternative regardless of the horrible side effects, massive weight gain, numbed out state all the time, lose of interest, difficulty in aquiring motivation,felt like everything was ten times harder to do everything. Now on doxepin. Same results,but insomnia is treated. Not getting any sleep is the worst of two evils.  Read More Read Less
771: this medication helps with the pain and also helps me to sleep
772: I started taking 10mg at night daily for tension headaches. This works great for my headaches. The dose was increased to 25mg about 4 months ago for increased anxiety. Works great and helps me sleep very well. Down sides is that it makes me crave sweets a lot and has really decreased my sex drive.
773: It did help a little with the chronic daily migraines but gave me a really bad dry mouth and then switched to nortriptyline and I had no side effects with that.   My new neurologist took me off it though and put me on Tizanide 4mg which is a muscle relaxer  and it's helping with the tensions headaches
774: 35 yrs on elavil, tried ssris, they were miserable. this is the only med that keeps headaches and some anxiety at bay. knocks me out at night even after all this time. weight gain is the most troublesome side effect, dry mouth makes you want to be eating or drinking something all the time. generally ok with it, works better than anything else out there for me.
775: I have been taking this medication for 3 months and still have migraines. Also i ave developed some cutting out in my speech and involuntary movements of the jaw or hand twitching like when writing or grasping things. I also take a depression medication called Citalopram. I`m not sure if these two medications mixed together in my system are causing these symptoms but I do know it is not curing my migraines as which it was intended to do. Hope it works for you!!
776: Was in a fog all day long and could not function
777: I have been on this medication for about a month now.  My dose was started at 25mg then increased to 75mg after two weeks and no success. Since then I have not experienced any migraines. However, I have gained 10 pounds, dry mouth, constipation, NO sexdrive, cravings for sweets and have become very forgetful.  This just isn't worth it!  I suffer about 2-3 migraines a week and daily headaches.  I will be switching meds ASAP.
778: I have been prescribed this to take every night to prevent migraines, but I am unable to do so because it knocks me out and I wake up with a medicine headache, if I wake up. As for preventing the migraine it works well, just not for someone with an active life.
779: Been taking it about 3 weeks and already put 10lbs on. 1 of the reasons im depressed is my weight. overall works well with my pain but gonna stop taking it.ASAP.
780: Took 1/2 tablet of 25 mg at bedtime for upper back muscle and neck pain for 2 years.    Pros: pain relief starts 30 minutes after taking & lasts through next day.   Cons: Drowsy, foggy, constantly hungry, dry mouth.     Stopped & lost all 13 lbs gained in 4 months.  Now take on as needed basis which doctor agreed to. Take early in evening & make sure next day is a day of rest.
781: Was prescribed 50 mg for treatment of migraines, depression, and insomnia due to post concussion syndrome.  I can honestly say it's helped with the intended purpose, but the side effects have been awful.  Constant state of fogginess (which had gotten better with time on the drug), I'm up 30 lbs in 4 months, causes bad acid reflux and constipation.  Also do not drink alcohol at all ... Had two drinks and woke up on my basement floor at 4:30 am.  I can't wait to be off of this...
782: i HAVE BENN TAKING THIS MADICATION FOR 6 WEEKS  I FELT A CHANGE THE FOLLOWING DAY,BUT NOW I FEEL A MOOD CHANGE,SO I WILL ASK MY DOCTOR IF THERE IS A HIGHER DOSE.MY STIF NECK AND SHOULDER PAIN IS GONE AND I FEEL RESTED.
783: I have to say that it has helped me sleep by taking either two 10mg or three 10mg but as far as my depression goes....forget it!!! I have been on it for about 3 months now and it has NOT helped me at all with my depression! I am SO disappointed.  I am going to stop taking it but you CANNOT just stop all at once! You MUST do it gradually by one-half each week or so as not to cause a "serotonin storm" I believe they call it. Very dangerous.  Maybe after I stop, I should just continue going to the psychiatrist and talk and start WALKING outdoors in the fresh air everyday and listening to soothing music. Also, taking deep breathes help to calm people as long as you do not take too many. Breathe in through the nose and out through the mouth!  I wish everyone here the best of luck and....by the way......this medication DOES make your STOMACH LARGER!!!! How about gaining around 17 pounds in 3 months!!! I was 163 and now I am 180!  God Bless you and try to hang in there. I know....it is SO very tough sometimes but believe me....there are SO many of us out here that have problems in general and I always try to think to myself about all the people who are MUCH worse off in life than myself. I do thank GOD every single day for being there always for me.  Take good care and have nice Holidays coming up!Read More Read Less
784: feel tired in the day especially in the morning but this improves within a few weeks; need to increase dose slowly to cope with tiredness; palpitations as a side effect led to ECGs which have shown QT prolongation; now combining with Propranolol and reduced dose; repeat of ECG in a month; may have to withdraw from treatment; fairly effective for migraines, especially in combination with Propranolol.
785: Extraordinary weight gain!
786: im very happy with this drug. the dr put me on it for migraines but it has helped my sleeping problem and my mood is elevated quite a bit. im bipolar and had came off of all medications for it due to the side effects. i havnt seen any side effects yet. i have been on it for a month now
787: I was prescribed this med today, but decided to read up on it and read all the reviews.  I definitely will not start to take this med for all the terrible reviews.  Thanks to all
788: Has been using it to treat a bladder problem (a constant feeling of a full bladder,even after emptying it).  Was treated for overactive bladder with other meds that did not aleviate my urge to urinate.  Once I started treatment with this med that awful feeling went away.  I was getting up up to 5 time a night and was unable to urinate.  This was the magic pill for me.  One pill before bed time.
789: I am on 75mg now.  It works only if i take it with Lorazepam (1mg).  It was prescribed for me to help with sleep and fibromyalgia.
790: this medication works for me.  It helps me with sleep and has helped with my seasonal depression.  However i occasionally have a strange side effect.  I feel like i have a extreme case of lock jaw.  this cramping/painful feeling occurs in my jaw, neck, troat and upper chest/back.  has happened a couple of time.  it occurs 10/15 minutes after taking it.  It is not a panic or anxiety attack.  it is definitly different.  I want to know if anyone else has experienced these side effects?  i have not found these side effects list anywhereRead More Read Less
791: tired following morning for a few weeks untill your body gets used to it
792: BEFORE I STARTED TAKEING THE MEDICINE I HAD A MIGRAIN ON AND OFF FOR 21 DAYS. SINCE I STARTED TAKEING 25 MILIGRAMS ONCE A DAY (IN THE EVENING)I HAVE NOT HAD A MIGRAINE. I ALSO TAKE 3000 MILIGRAMS OF NEURONTIN DAILY THIS COMBO HAS BEEN WORKING FOR ALMOST A MONTH NOW. THE ONLY SIDE EFFECT I HAVE FROM THE AMITRIP. IS ENLARGED BREASTS (NO COMPLAINTS THERE)BUT THEY ARE REAL SORE.
793: I had one 10mg pill for Neuropathic head pain, I slept well, no night terrors, woke up very drowsy with screaming tinnitus. Its now two days later and my tinnitus which used to be on a level 3 is still elevated at about 8. I can only hope things will calm down when this drug is out my system. Will go back to alternating with a half tab of Piriton or two Solpadeine Max before bed as they work for me with sleep. I had read that this drug can give some nasty side effects, its not for me.
794: i use this medication for irritable bowel syndrome and it has worked for me for a very long time, over time it has become slightly less effected, but that is expected, i experienced no side effects
795: noticeable relief from tingling and minor pain due to idiopathic, non-diabetic foot neuropathy
796: I started amitryptaline 2 months ago and I love it! I sleep well at night. I am not tired during the day. My sex drive has increased and that makes me very happy!
797: good results in lower migraine on 75 mg, when up to 150mg had problem sleeping, returned to 75 and sleeping fine now. Had migraines 2 time weekly now 1-2 monthly
798: Was put on it for Insomnia and was told to take it 1 to 2 hours before bed. As I write this (11:14pm) it has been 4 hours since I took it and nothing yet. Even if I do get sleep the dreams I have are sooo bad I rather not get any sleep at all.
799: Helps with both depression & sleep
800: slept
801: light headed, sweat
802: works with fewer side affects than vicadon
803: TAKING ONE AT NIGHT HELPS ME TO SLEEP.I GO TO A PAIN MGT. CLINIC, AND DR. SAID TO TAKE THESE CAUSE THEY WILL EXTEND THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE METHADONE I'M PRESCRIBED
804: I had a severe complex concussion. I was prescribed 25 mg for pain and sleep. I had to cut it in half as that dosage was too strong for me. I slept great but was drowsy in the morning. I felt less happy as my serotonin levels were ideal prior to usage. It did help with allergies as it has a slight antihistamine response.  It may have caused more aches in feet and body. It did help with pain and getting much needed sleep. Overall it was a mixed bag. On a very temporary basis it worked great and I could easily stop the medicine with no side effects
805: prescribed for IBS,headach,sleep. Taken for over 20 years and would not be without it. Anything that controls my IBS is great with me. I learned though that I must take it at bedtime because it does make me tired. It took about 2 weeks before I felt "normal". I felt like I was drunk but it passed quickly. Still get headaches but with less intensity. One side effect I don't like is the weight gain and some edema in legs but my job requires me to sit for long hours so that may be the cause and the sun sensitivity causes me to get sun poison if I don't use a good sunscreen and limit my exposure. My doctor monitors my blood and it does elevate my liver functions but nothing abnormal just a little on the "high" normal rating. I can't imagine my life without it. I would probably be a house bound person if not for this. Just make sure you get a yearly checkup and if your doctor is like mine he will make sure it is working for you or not.Read More Read Less
806: I am more calm and my friends tell me that is makes me the same as when years ago I didn't have depression.
807: its blurred my vision,that's not good going from one problem to another.
808: Makes me sleep walk, talk to people in my sleep. Go outside of the house at night when i am sleep walking. etc
809: i have tried so many meds to make my pain go away.. finally enough was enough, i got a second opionion, although i have more tests to do.. the FIRST day of taking the oral pill after waking up the following morning, i DID NOT HURT.. no low back pain, no hip pain to dress my self.. after every moment of pain, i couldn't believe something was finally  working... it's changing my life.. if only i had known...
810: i have been on this for 10 years and i cant sleep at night without taking it. it causes long term effects like irritable bowel sydrome. i now have to take all kinds of meds to go to the bathroom. please be areful with this!!!
811: It's hit or miss with me it depends on the day if the medicine works
812: It's good, I had severe tension headaches atleast 3 times a week but now after 3months of using this pill I have 1 or even no headaches a week. I have had no side effects, everything is good.
813: After taking Cymbalta for a few months, it seemed like I could not wake up in the mornings.  My doctor changed me to amitriptyline 10mg to start.  Then he bumped up my doseage to 25mg, then 50mg.  I started noticing that my hair was falling out at an alarming rate so I weened myself back off of it and no more hair loss.  Back on Cymbalta, but I've got to stop that one too because of the arm and leg swelling so badly.  I guess I wasn't meant to take these medications. Oh well.
814: The doctors first put me on topamax and I have severe problems. It messed with my brain to the point that it took me an hour and a half to work out how to help my 4th grade son on a math problem. They switched me to this and now my memory is back where it should be. I have not had any of the bad side effects that everyone else lists here. I was having migraines hitting every other day. It took two or three weeks to get my dosage regulated right. I now take 100 mg every night. I started taking it 11 months ago and since I was moved up to the current dosage, I have had maybe 5 migraines hit. It works great for me. I know medication affects some people differently but I would not change from this one for anything else.Read More Read Less
815: My 15 year old son has been taking this for two years for migraine prevention. It was prescribed by his pediatric neurologist. He takes 10mg pill am and 20 mg pm. Works great when he remembers to take them.
816: I was on 75mg/day at bedtime for about 2 months for migraines and has absolutely no change in my headache patterns. I started out on a low dose but as soon as I got up to 75mg all the side effects piled on. I started having tremors all throughout my body, looking like some sort of drug addict going through withdrawals. I work as a nurse and my hospital was forced to send me home because it was so uncontrollable. Around the same time, I started having difficulties urinating. It began as just a difficulty in starting but turned into a complete lack of ability to urinate. I ended up in the emergency room to have my bladder drained and hurry the medication out of my system. I'm told my reaction was not common, but I just want anyone who may begin taking it to know what possibilities may lie ahead. This was a complete nightmare!! Read More Read Less
817: My mother died from this drug. She wasonly 52 just truned this january. My mother had severe bowle issues, liver disease, chronic depression, hig blood pressure, trouble sleeping, severe arthritis, asma, and was an alcholic and this pill was the death of her due to teh doctor falslty medicating her this drugs. My mom died because i will neve rtake a drug any doctore perscribes me.
818: I am a 55 year old female who had been having severe headaches over a period of 6 months.  I was prescribed one 10mg dose at night and it has got rid of the headaches.  I do feel groggy first thing in the morning but that soon goes.  No weight gain either.
819: I take this medication for depression and pain due to a decompression and fusion off the cervical spine. My dosage is 100mg.and I have only been on it for a month.
820: Regardless of my dosage, I was in an extreme state of somnia- barely able to function for months beginning the second or third day. I literally slept most of a comlete week then managed to sleepwalk thru a couple of months. Dr said it would improve, but it didn't. When my hair started coming out in large clumps, I asked the doctor to put me back on nortriptylene which I tolerated much better. Same family of drugs, but insanely different for me.
821: This medicine works ive been on it for a week now but the downside is i feel like a zombie when i wake up and it makes me tired and want to sleep all day long. I have 2 children so i cant be sleeping all day. I am going to ask for something else. My migraines are not going away and they hurt worse if anything.
822: It was given to me, in hopes that it would help with my firomyalgia.  It has not done anything except give me blurred vision.
823: I use it for restless legs, I have used this medication for sixteen years. It has worked for me the only side effect iI hsve is dry mouth and constipation other than that It helps with my problem
824: I just started taking this med for help with sleep, frequent urination, migrains and stress. Now that I have read the reviews I wish I hadn't purchased it. I already have problems with tingly fingers and feet. I think I will stop buying all the meds doctors tell me to try...I think we are all lab rats for pharmaceutical companies. I literally have a grocery bag of prescriptions!
825: Was prescribed for cystitis.  Really helped. Have anxiety and depression really helped first few week. Wss 100% happy. Now not working so good. Will try the 25mg at night. Do not wa t to go back adderall and xanax. Hope it works.  It us helping g with the cystitis.
826: I was prescribed 25mg by my GP 4 weeks ago. Tried to go up to 50mg, but had to resort back to 25mg after two sleepless nights. Went to my GP yesterday, and he took me off of Amitriptyline, and prescribed 5mg of Escitalopram. He told me to just stop taking the Amitriptyline. Today, I'm really feeling Ami's revenge...panic attack and anxiety. Anyone else have similar experience?
827: Prescribed for nerve pain related to cervical disc and nerve pain.  Unable to sleep at night due to pain.  After first does (25mg. at bedtime), the following day I could not hardly stay a wake.  This medicine left me in a fog or dazed state where I could not function.  It also increased my appetite greatly!  With having disc bulges I do not think that the extra weight would be good for my spin either.
828: I have taken this med for almost 3 years now and it helped take care of my problem of throwing up every morning. I started at 25mg and then went to 50mg when the vomiting persisted. At 50mg I felt tired all day and couldn't concentrate very well, so I switched back over to the 25mg. When I switched back, I had terrible mood swings for about a week and I still have mood swings if I forget to take it. I worked out running and weight-lifting all summer and could not lose any weight, so I am assuming that the med had something to do with it. I am planning on switching to a different medication at my next drs visit because I do not like taking an antidepressant.Read More Read Less
829: I have been on this medication for about 5 years now and I have had success in migraine prevention, anxiety relief, eating disorder aid, and help sleeping.  Complaints: when I forget to take my pill for one night I have violent nightmares and wake up abruptly many times during my sleep cycle. Also, this pill has caused me to have difficulty waking up to alarms. Also, if I have missed one dosage my anxiety levels the next day are skyrocketed and I begin to obsess over my eating disorders.   This pill is extremely difficult to get off of and if I had known that, I wouldn't have begun it at all. The migraine pain is better than the nightmares and mood swings! Good side? This pill has caused zero weight gain.Read More Read Less
830: I was prescribed this drug for arm itchiness. Not only did it stop my itching, it stopped my migraines, helped me sleep and helps me urinate alot less. I would not stop this drug for anything. It has changed my life so much for the better. My 20 year old daughter started getting migraines,the doc put her on amitriptyline and she too can sleep and has no more headaches. The side effects are minimal. Once in a while when I awake from a deep sleep I will hallucinate and see huge spiders. I will gladly see the spiders for the benefits it gives me.   Read More Read Less
831: This  medication has worked for me
832: I have nerve pain from ms. Second time trying this med. Only taking 25MG. but my craving for sweets is overwhelming. I NEVER crave sweets. Also, my muscles feel weak and I am embarassed by slurred speach. This was the reason I stopped last time. I plan to continue this time, at least for 1 month. Helps me sleep without neuropathy but it whears off soon after waking up. I feel oversedated & just generally ILL.
833: I was prescribed this medication for IBS. But I have a history of PTSD, migraines, and eating disorder. Prior to taking this med. I had a traumatic life experience  where my PTSD, IBS, anxiety where gosh daily activity were impossible and eating disorder flared up. I am seriously not a believer for psyche meds. I refused for years until I was desperate and gave it a try. I started with lowest dose and truly migraines gone, ptsd is slightly controlled of course with therapy, eating: able eating is at its peak in the morning (if taken at night). Anxiety controlled and noticed at day one. The only down call I would say is that if not taken at the same time or not allowing your body to get the needed sleep 8 hrs. Drowsiness kicks in. Other then that. It’s helpful med ! I sleep a full night sleep uninterrupted! Not planning to stay on it forever but for the moment it’s been a positive life changer ! Read More Read Less
834: I have had pain n my legs and arms for about 1 year , My family physician tried different things with getting different test but could never help. Sent me to a neurologist,, he did few test and ask questions.. put me on this medication and with in aweek I waws pain free.. I feel really GREAT...
835: I am very satisfied with this medication. I am using it for sleep due to severe insomnia. I love it i no longer am having to stay awake all night and just stare at the walls. I am no enjoying a peaceful and full nights sleep. I believe i will continue to take the med as long as it is proven effective for me. I have had no suicidal thought at all.
836: I was prescribed this medication for insomnia, after not sleeping for three days. The only problem I had was waking up after taking it, but it was very very effective.
837: My 15yo son was given Amitriptyline to prevent his Chronic Retractable Migraine. His side effects did not begin until he skipped a dose on accident. He was on a steady increase weekly of 10mg to 20mg to 30mg a night. After the 30mg increase he started to have problems with his stomach and the migraine peaking on him constantly. Usually it is present but not spiking. His blood also became VERY thin when using Ibuprofen to try to treat the spike. He is now being weaned off of it, but his doctor said down to 20mg for 2 days and then 10mg for 2 days then to stop taking them. His mood was horrible from the skipped dose, so I was not pleased to hear this and pushed for a week for each step. After reading a review that said 6 weeks I am happy I stated my concern. I am not pleased to have the weaning effecting him more than then the actual increases.  The side effects he has felt include blurry vision,dizziness upon standing, stomach discomfort/ache,mood swings, restlessness, sleeplessness, and worse migraine pain
838: I started getting migrians when i was 10 years old after have menigitis.   migrains consumed my school life went home sick alot! im 19 now and have been on the drug for 9 yrs and 2 years ago i upped my dosage. but when i do get a migrain they are very sever! They last anywhere from 5hrs-3days.  i am happy with this pill!!
839: Ive had trouble sleeping for the past ten years and pretty much just ignored it and worked at night.Finally my life changed and i couldnt just wait until I was exhausted to sleep, so i was prescribed elavil. For the first couple weeks I felt drowsy almost drunk all day then that went away. For the first couple months I had silly nightmares but those stopped as well. The funny aftertaste it caused lasted for a few months but it has gone away too.I dont get cotton mouth in the mornings anymore either. So I'd say try to tough out the weird side effects if the benefits outweigh them. I sleep well every night and dont get the hallucinations and blackout periods that other sleeping meds have caused.Read More Read Less
840: It help with headech and sleep No side  effects  at all . 20mg before bed.
841: I've tried several anti-depressants for nerve pain due to spinal surgery.  All had very bad side effects.  My PM finally prescribed an oldie, but goodie as he stated.  This drug has helped me tremendously, I can't function without it.  I seriously would be on disability and have to quit my life.  I do not have any side effects either which is fantastic!
842: A year ago I was diagnosed with "Chronic Abdominal Pain." The pain was to the point I was in E.R. 5 times in one month. An E.R. doctor gave me Amitriptyline as a pain reliever. I do have to say it has helped with the pain however, every couple of months i have to up the dosage. I am now on 150mg... It works for the pain but turns me into a zombie. My family calls it the zombie drug... All in all it works if you take a natural supplement called B12.
843: this med was givin to me for the 1st time when i was sent to pain manage i really had some problems with this at 1st made my tummy feel like yuck you know like couldnt go to the potty then it did this bad thing to my eye but told the doc it wasnt working for me when i 1st started it but he said get up to the 600mg's then see what happens me being a lil stoopid took it then my eye started to get where i couldnt see outta it for me i think the med is no goood at all
844: Amitrityline, aka Tryptanol, had a calming effect for my chronic pain..After 4 surgeries, I take amitrityline, 25 mg. in the evening before bedtime. No side effects noted while taking this medication.
845: This medication works for easing pain and calming anxiety. The major problem: it increases the appetite. I gained a substantial amount of weight while on this medication.
846: Would taking 200mg. daily for depression be considered excessive?
847: I have Fibromyalgia and did stay awake most of the night tossing.  I can now get the sleep I need to allow me to function during the day.
848: I was feeling very sad and down everyday.  This has been going on for months now.  I use to just sat and cry for no reason.  Amitriptyline has changed that, i dont cry anymore.
849: Has helped me sleep during the night but has caused me to have some horrible dreams & twice I heard voices. I've just contacted my Doctor because I want to come off this drug sap.
850: This did nothing form me.
851: I have slept better, but gained a lot of weight!
852: only been on this for a month, dont know if it works or not
853: I have had both Panic disorder and IBS. Dr prescribed this drug in attempt to ease IBS symptoms.     Chose to discontinue due to increased heart palpitations.
854: I was taking this to prevent severe migraine flare ups. I was given 25mg to start then up to 50mg.i still get migraines nt not as bad. This med has made more probs then its worth. Its made me severely more sensative to any light,made me gain weight,& made me feel "druged"all day.It dsnt even help me sleep. On top of chronic migraines i also recently have a concussion & its not even helping that! Save yourself the added stress & avoid this medication.Im stopping this medication today.
855: The pain in my legs went away 75% of the time which is a big increase and I plan on asking the doctor to increase the amount to 100 MG per dose at night, I'm now taking only 50 MG 1 time at night.  Highly recommended....
856: It gives me muscle shakes and dry mouth.
857: I am a female and was around 20 years old and took a small dosage (10mg) at bedtime and had paralysis while I was still awake, I could not move nor speak for about 30 minutes - it was a terrifying experience - I took it for 2 or 3 nights but the effects never diminished - now I always mark on my medical records that I cannot take that medicine.
858: I am not going to sleep after taking it  but it makes me stay asleep longer.  I can not wake fully up until almost  7 8 p.m.
859: After years of migraine medicines, including small doses of amitriptyline, the true preventive for me is 100 mg/day.  Truly great results.
860: It keeps Migraines away, but it also helps me sleep. If I don't take it, I don't sleep.If I run out , my family will get it for me. they say I am really grumpy with out it.
861: It has given rise to urinary retention.  Howeverr, it helps me to get a good sleep.
862: I love this drug. I know that sounds bad, but before this pill I couldn't sleep. I herniated a disk and the pain caused anxiety, which caused insomnia, which caused more anxiety and pain. This, along with my anti-inflammatory, has been wonderful. I'm usually asleep within an hour of taking (25mg at bedtime) and wake up feeling refreshed. I'm not sure if my weight gain was from the drug or inactivity, but it hasn't been substantial.
863: slows down anxity
864: Low dose 50mg for reducing lower back muscular pain
865: it was the best years of my life. Unfortunately my wait increased so much I had to be taken off. My life has never been the same with any other medicine for depression, anxiety and insomnia
866: I was put on this after a pretty good concussion to help me sleep and "calm my brain down".      I've gained weight, I feel very negative and sad and the only thing different is this medicine. I don't really see the benefit of being on this medicine...it is supposed to help me sleep but I don't think it does. I'm not interested in taking it but my doctor believes I should.
867: I have been on this med for depression and cronic pain it seemed to make the pain worse, I am tired all the time,stated out with 25mg then went to 50mg one pill taken at night, then that stopped working my doc increased dosage to 100mg one at night started that does 3 weeks ago. I am now weening myself off this drug. it does nothing I am tired all the time,very forgetfull, have gained 30lbs in the past 6 months the weight gain is all from this pill, because I do watch what I eat.I do not recommend this drug to anyone for anything.and to the woman out there the weight gain is all in your stomach and you do get alot of bloating. good luck to everyone who is taking this med
868: just started using for migraines
869: I was kinda worried about taking this but sucked it up and tried anyway. I hate this stuff. The dry mouth is uncontrolable. Made my anxiety triple, my irraitablity was quadrupled. I also heard noises like somthing being hit on the wall when there was nothing there and I feel like Im moving while Im siting or standing still. Hope nobody else has these. Good luck to the ones it works for.
870: I have been taking this for about a year (25 mg) and have gained 35 pounds.  I started it because of depression and it does help that but I am very very moody and very very irritable.  My sexual desire is G.O.N.E andit was not like that until about 5 months after taking this drug.  I'm going to gradually stop taking this...as per my doctor.
871: Doctor prescribed this medication for sleep.  Along with my lexapro it has great benifits.  no more panic attacks, no more anxiety, no more break through depression.  I feel like my old self again.
872: My doc presribed this medication for me following post herpitic neuralgia; I guess this happened after contracting shingles. I didn't ask for help with sleep, but the MD ordered this to be taken at bedtime.      I experienced some difficulty in the mornings with a feeling of slight drunkiness, especially if I have to get up early (less than 7-8 hours sleep).  Since I am a recovered alcoholic (no alcohol for over 10 years), I am particularly concerned about possible dependency, and getting to the point of enjoying the early morning numbness.    All in all, I can't really tell if it's doing anything for or against my normal habits. But, the burning sensation on my chest and back are continuing; and it's a  h___ of a feeling.  I wouldn't wish this on my worst enemy.Read More Read Less
873: I have been taking this for about 4 months.  I don't have any headaches anymore and my stress level at work has went way down.  I used to come home from work venting everyday but not anymore.  This works very well for stress along with headaches.
874: I started out on 50MG and couldnt tell a difference.  My doctor put me on 100MG at nite and I sleep so much better and my days are so much easier to handle.  I know the "depression" is still there but I dont ride that roller-coaster hourly any more.  I am also on Effexor 300MG in the morning and the combination works well for me.  I have friends that could never take that high of a dose!  But my suicidal thoughts are gone, I feel back on track.  I admit that I have been thru the gamit of antidepressants before one doctor said "lets try this..."  I'm glad i waited.  Only side effets are, yeah, eating, mostly sweets, and dry mouth.  But i'm not gonna change meds for that!  I hope other people get help from it like I did.Read More Read Less
875: to help with insomnia
876: Prescribed for migraines and related headaches that I get 5 to 6 times a week.  Been taking it over a month and I can't say if it has had any effect.  It may have knocked out about 10% of my headaches which doesn't amount to much but my sex drive is gone, and I've gained 5 pounds in the last month.  Also I have started having trouble with depression which is something I almost never have a problem with.  I'm a pretty even dis-positioned person but for the last two weeks I've been really down.  I am having trouble concentrating and staying focused.  I also am very tired and groggy throughout the day.  Going to stick with it just to see if the headaches get better but in the long run I think I'll ask to be taken off of it.Read More Read Less
877: My only complaint about this medication is    dry mouth and severly chapped lips.  Other than that it is excellent for nerve pain due to four back surgeries.  50mg a couple of hours before bedtime does the trick.
878: I was just prescribed this drug, and have not yet started taking it. After reading the posts on here, I am seriously re-considering it.  I have a constant low grade migraine, that hardly ever goes away, and treat it with pain killers when I absolutely have to - when it has worn me down especially after a long day at work.  My neurologist has prescribed Topomax (terrible side effects - heart racing, trouble concentrating and focusing, etc) and then Propanol (horrible nightmares and trouble getting back to sleep after them), and it has been several months since I stopped it, so my doc decided to try something else.  I am not convinced after reading others experiences with this drug that this is the best course of action. Will keep searching..
879: This I'd a game changer for me. Got it to Help me sleep at night. It lessens the effect of my monthly migraine. I still get thw symptoms just very watered down. Very manageable didn't even need to take a pain killer. I'd been suffering chest pain for months. Had all the tests. Pain completely gone on day 2. Wasn't expecting that. Period pain has lessened too. But the biggest surprise is the effect its had on my anxiety. I hate anti depressants. They turn me into a zombie and I feel nothing on them no good or bad. But this has taken the edge off my anxious thoughts and I can rationionalise them now when they appear. Doctor said no way does amatryptaline at 10mg low doseage help anxiety. But here I am. Feel like myself for the first time in years. And able to live again. Does cause me a dry mouth and dehydrates me a little but fine after a glass of water in the morning. Takes a little longer to wake in the morning. I dont jump out of bed full go anxiety like I used to. It's more of a sloe comfy stretch and have to roll myself out of bed to get started amd you more slowly come to
880: Amitriptyline in combination with other supplements and birth control pill have helped change my life! I had tried many other antidepressants, birth control pills and pain medications before Amitriptyline, that weren’t the right fit for me. Amitriptyline has helped removed pelvic pain, mood swings and depression. I take them along with my birth control pill (Zoely), as well as other supplements like Pcositol, Inositol, KIKO Vitals Hormone balance, Primeve Plus, Source naturals Theanine Serene with Relora which I think have all played apart to help balance my hormones. I changed my eating to a more regular balanced diet that is high in fibre and protein and started walking and doing strength training 3 times a week. I have battled with weight loss due to Insulin resistance levels, but since following the above I have lost weight and not gained weight from the medication. 
I must add at first I didn’t see changes and actually felt worse, but my doctor asked me to give the medication and birth control pill three months and I’m so glad I did. Wasn’t easy while my body was adjusting in those three months, but life is so much sweeter now! So thankful ????Read More Read Less
881: This is a life saver for me, I have IBS and the doctor tried this on me to see if it would work. It does.
882: I was given this drug because of a bowel problem. Maybe Irritable Bowl problem. I was having bouts of sudden Diarrea and loose bowels. Bowel movements were not complete.
883: i find it's easier to sleep although i am not  sleeping through the night totally. also, this medicine helps with my fibromyalsia pain.
884: i`m easier to live with.I`m happier,calmer,life is good
885: Use for IBS/ Habba Syndrome.  Has worked when nothing else has worked.  Although, have had severe weight gain.
886: I've been taking this for migraine prevention for the last 60 days. It has helped with the frequency from a migraine everyday to maybe one every 2 weeks or so. I do still get them but will give this a chance for another 30 days. I do sleep better. The only side effect so far is the dry mouth which I keep hard candy and gum at hand.
887: I am a sufferer of migraines now for 12 years. I was put on this med. when I was 16, and now am 28. I stopped taking this when we decided to have a child. After that was over I returned to taking this med. Well, I decided I didn't want to take it anymore and stopped. Friday I was given topamax and was a confused zombie and could take care of my family, and called the doctor and now started something else. Inderal LA. Well, I almost feel like I may come back to this because it's been very good to me for the most part. It's the one pill that I have had zero side effects at all, nothing. After a while it seemed to not work as well as it did in the begining, but it still helped with reventing less headaches for me. I took it at night so the tired feeling wasn't bad, and when I woke up int he morning the first few days, I was groggy, but after that, fine. So, I do recommend this med to anyone who needs something it was a lifesaver for me, and chances are I'll be going back on it in the next month.Read More Read Less
888: i take for irritable bowel syndrome  very effective  1 pill a day
889: i get pain
890: I have worn glasses for near sightness for years, I noticed my eyesight is getting worse.
891: It is to get me to sleep but I don't want to wake up in the mornings.  I am zoned out.  It's horrible.  My eyes and my mouth get very dry during the night.  3pm still dozy
892: I have FM and am sensitive to many medications so cut my 10 mg pill in half to start. I seemed to have more energy and better concentration but craved sweets and had rapid abdominal fat gain. My greatest improvement in sleep came from Dx of sleep apnea which I took on before taking amitriptyline. My MD keeps encouraging me to up the med. and claims that it helps 90% of his patients in combination with sertaline and states most of them have weight LOSS. I have seen no one reporting here to cite weight LOSS on amitriplyline. For now I will continue with OT/PT, Bowen Therapy, and chiropractic BGI, all of which have made me more functional and control pain. Light exercise and pacing are also important to prevent flare. Brain fog and concentration has improved using CPAP and these other alternatives to medication
893: Prescribed for Depression/Sleeplessness/Irritability  Effective for sleespless, Somewhat effective for depression, Somewhat effecive for irritability.
894: This medication has helped me tremendously. I am so glad my doctor found something to help me. It is great. Thank you.
895: This drug caused  my to get worse. I suffred from anixety but not depression now  I have worse anixety and sucidle thoughts and have even hurt myself now I'm facest with the problam of stopping the drug and from what I've read and experiened it will only get worse for it gets better
896: i have tried a handful of medication to help with these headaches and stiff neck and back i have been getting almost everyday for the last 3 months.  this is the first thing that has helped me to function through the pain.  but it has made me so tired and it is so hard to keep up and move.  i fight myslef to get out of bed in the morning, i haven't been on it long so i am just hoping it gets better
897: My doctor gives me 25mg one a day at night. They really help me sleep without awaking with pain in the night.  However my doctor also gives me 75mg of Levothyroxine and it advices on your site not to take the two together?
898: I was prescribed 10 mg at night to give me REM sleep and have taken it for around 20 years and still do .I used to lay in bed for 1 to 3 hours trying to fall asleep  and had lots of pain from my body not getting enough rest. I take it about 2 hours before I want to go to bed and fall asleep in about 10 minutes yet can still get up  easily after 4-0r 5 hrs sleep and drive if I need to without any drowsiness. I am thankful to the neurologist that prescribed it for me.
899: I am a 20 year old female and suffer from daily headaches for the past 2 years.. my doctor just prescribed this medication... i was wondering about the weight gain... did you all find yourselves more hungry and eating more or did it slow down your metabolisms? did it really relieve the pain of your headaches? i am desperate for a cure, this interferes with my life and i have remained in my home for the last 2 years suffering from headaches... i want to go to college and i need a fix for this... please someone give me a review of my questions about the weight gain and reliance of the medication for the migraines...    thanks everyoneRead More Read Less
900: I've beentaking 75mg of this med since March for Fibromyalgia. I had severe pain in my legs, feet, hands arms. Until yesterday.. I've pretty much had awesome sleep and tolerable pain. I'm hoping just upping it might work.It's only $4.75 a month.
901: I take this drug because I spend too much time in stage two sleeping it has made a dramatic impact for the better in my life I had no idea how much my sleep had affected my day and mood.
902: never felt better
903: I was prescribed this drug for migraine prevention. It helps me sleep better and my moods are not as quick to change. Unfortunately I have gained 30-40 lbs. since starting this med. So, unfortunately, it hasn't done much for my depression.
904: Started taking this drug 3 days ago for fibromyalgia.  Was having trouble sleeping because pain in legs, back and shoulders was so intense.  So far so good.  Has helped me sleep well and has had no side effects.  Also has helped with pain I was having during the day.
905: I have a hital hernia and was put on this medication to help my esophgeal spasms which were causing me to belch consistantly. I take a 25mg dose every night before bedtime. To date I have not had a belching problem.
906: it has helped me with my sleeplessness problem.  i still wake up several times a night but am readily able to go right back to sleep.
907: I take it once every night. Since I've been taking it I've had no migraines. Whenever I forget to take it though I always have a migraine the next day.
908: Seems to be good for depression and I have been using it as an addition to pain medication.  I have had (L)THR (hip replacement) 7 times over 40 years after a car accident at age 17.  My doctor says that it tells my brain that I am not in so much pain.  However, I am concerned with its water retention and weight gain.  I stopped using it about a year ago because I am on Oxycodone and I read on WEBMD that combining it can cause heart problems.  Also the hospital was asking me if I was experiencing heart palpitations so I was starting to wonder about it.  Anyway I have lost 30 pounds since discontinuing its use. My doctor originally told me that it causes water retention and I have severe lymphedema in my leg which is also better as far as swelling in concerned since discontinuing.  I wish I could find another drug that would also help with Major Depressive Disorder since my own mother was afflicted with this.Read More Read Less
909: Was prescribed Amitriptyline for migraines and associated health anxiety. Not going to lie, the first week wasn't fun. I felt dizzy, and jittery pretty much all day. After one week I started to feel really good. Migraines gone and health anxiety became tolerable. I am on it for about 6-7 months and at this point I'd be happy to take this for the rest of my life. This med will make you feel worse at first but please do yourself a favour and stick with it for at least 10 days. It really works and made me normal again.Read More Read Less
910: have been taking this medicine for two months for insomnia and depression.  has worked great.  first 4-5 days was groggy in the morning, but not after that.  sleep a deep sleep and wake up feeling rested. racing thoughts and overall body aches from depression has subsided.  will continue to take
911: This drug worked great for about 1 1/2 months.  After that the migraines came back and although I was dieting and exercising twice a day, I could not lose weight.  Stopped taking it and lost 3 pounds in 3 days.  The only good thing was how it helped me sleep.
912: It's hard to sleep if you missed a dose or stop using the medication. Sometimes helps in preventing headaches. Also this medication has made me gain weight.
913: I experienced severe restlessness, my heart beat was fast, and made me shakey all over.  My emotions where as quick as a light switch.  I was scared having this medicine in my body.
914: My mother has been talking this medication and it has worked wonders for her.  She is very happy with it for many reasons: one, it helps with her pain; two, it helps her with her depression, (she was like on 2 or 3 different types); and 3, it helps her with her sleep.  Before her taking this medication, she would only sleep 3 to 4 hours a night, now she has a full night of sleep.  As her daughter, I am very happy with this medication.
915: I am 30 yrs old I have been taking this medication for 8 yrs. The doctor gave it to me because of IBS and I couldn't sleep. I did not gain weight from it. It keeps me calm to calm. I finally went to my other doctor and asked him to help me slowly get off of it and he gave me a chart and I should be off of it in May. Now that I am taking in on different days and slowly coming off of it I feel different and I have more energy in the day but the nights I have to take I am not happy the next day I sleep and I am in a bad mood. So beware taking this pill It may help but the side effects I went through for eight years I'd rather have delt with the pain. I did research while I was on this Doctors tend to give this but before taking this see if there is a different medication to avoid the future problems of this pill
916: I sufferes a brain injury and my family practitionaer has put me on this medication to prevent my headaches but it only seems to be making it worse an me realy drowsy!I have a 9 month old on the go.I cant be laid up in bed all day in pain!
917: I have had a few occasions where I got up at night and spoke nonsense to my husband about things that don't make sense and I have no memory at all the next day
918: this pill has help in more was than one!
919: taking for rls its very inexpensive
920: I have fibromyalgia and take only 10mg about 7:00 at night to sleep it has been very successful for me and I have been taking it for over 10 years. Taking it earlier in the evening eliminated the groginess in the morning.
921: I am on this for Fibro. Somewhat helps with the pain. But not enough to want to stay on it, when it makes me have urinary issues, bowel issues, weight gain, and mood swings. It also does not help put me to sleep, or keep me asleep, also the pills taste awful...thanks for nothing amitriptyline!
922: I was prescribed this medication to help treat my fibromyalgia.  It didn't work AT ALL!  Granted it did help me sleep better, but did nothing for my muscle pain and tingling sensation. It altered my mood tremedously. I was irritable and aggitated and the smallest thing set me off.  I mean my dog having to go outside to pee, I screamed and yelled at him. Never taking this medicine again.
923: I have been on Amitriptyline for almost 2 years. The dose has gradually been increased to treat my fibromyalgia, sleep deprivation and pain. It has not treated any of those issues and has caused severe weight gain! I have found it effective for treating anxiety that I didn't realize I had but it was effective for that in 10mg. Every time the dose increases I experience a weight gain of at least 5 pounds. I wouldn't recommend this medication for the use of fibromyalgia treatment but it has been helpful for anxiety. Please note that it's also used to treat bulimia and that is because it causes a HUGE increase in appetite.Read More Read Less
924: This has helped sensitivity in my forearm and brachialplexus after a post surgery injury.  I am able to tolerate OT and PT much better. Has really helped get over the hump.
925: I've been taking 10 mg for about 3 months now and I've gained weight also starting to need more than 10mg.  It did help a lot with the headaches and well being but now the headaches are back and I'm Feeling depressed. Not sure if I want to up the dose as buying new clothes is costly, so, damned if I do and damned if I don't, HELP.
926: It does take care of the nerve pain but I am taking 25 mg and I sleep more than I am awake...it makes me very tired and it makes me sweat .
927: On 25mg dose, it has almost eliminated my weekly migraines down to only two migraines a month. Those two are hormone driven.
928: works very well for herniated disc pain and allows the user to sleep.
929: Does not help the tingling in my feet
930: Works well for sleep and reduces the number of times waking up with headaches.  Also, much better as a sleep aid versus ambien.  Ambien is was an awful drug for me
931: The only thing negative I've experienced with amitriptyline is dry mouth & extreme sensitivity to high temperatures, & I live in Arizona! which sux,summer sux here anyways. But I had suffered heat stroke working outside in 2013. Not gonna do that again! Thank God for whoever invented A/C! it does make a person drowsy and groggy. I take it 2 hours before I go to sleep, and make sure I don't have to wake up less than 7-8 hours. otherwise i'm goo. Great for solid REM sleeping. I've been an insomniac since I was a kid. I'm a walking zombie with out it.  Read More Read Less
932: 25mg used for nerve ending pain is very  satisfactory.
933: I still get very depressed,I want to try something else!But I'm on so much other stuff.So I am affraid to go off this med!I haven't noticed any sideaffects though.It really is not strong enough.
934: IT WORKED FOR THE FIRST FEW DAYS, THEN QUIT WORKING, SO I DOUBLED MY DOSAGE, OK FOR A DAY OR TWO, THEN I TRIPLED MY DOSAGE.  IT WILL ONLY WORK IF I SKIP IT FOR ABOUT TWO WEEKS.THEN FOR ONLY LIKE A DAY.
935: Just keeps him awake at night and tired in the day and trying it in the morning still didn't work.
936: Pain has been better, sleeping is amazing, less stressed throughout day...weight gain a bit frustrating, but feel overall better with this drug.
937: It helped me fall asleep, but no help for fibromyalgia pain or depression. Chronic dry mouth. I took it for about 10 years before moving on to Lyrica for sleep. I always took SSDI meds for depression and other meds for pain.
938: On 10 mg/day for head and nerve pain after concussion, headaches, and to help sleep.  It has done nothing for me except cause problems.  I sleep less, have problems urinating, and extremely sore breasts.  Don't take it!
939: I was on this drug and had an unusual side effect..i took regular dose but without realizing took more and more of it and ended up overdosing and in hospital..had one dr that said this had happened to others but other drs said I took overdose on purpose which I did not.  this drug scares me.
940: PERSONALLY FOR ME THIS MEDICATION DID NOT WORK. I STILL HAVE THE SAME FEELINGS AFTER TAKING THIS MEDICATION AND I TRULY DO NOT FEEL ANY DIFFERENT.
941: Taking 25mg back pain was waking me up. Still waking up with pain but the pain isn't like before. I notice that I am more hungry now, will see if i gain weight.
942: Took this medication for 2 days and had a migraine.  On the 6th day woke up with diarrhea had it all day. On 7th,8th, and 9th day woke up vomiting, diarrhea, and severe abdominal pain. I thought I had a stomach virus then maybe a ulcer. I took this med at night and was supposed to help me sleep and it kept me up. The pain and vomiting only lasted til about mid-day while diarrhea lasted all day. I didnt take it on the 9th night and felt a lot better 10th day and even better the next days. My neurologist said these aren't normal side effects but to stop taking it. Now I am going to try verpamil for prevention of migraines
943: I also have an autoimmune disease and have been taking amitriptyline for a little over a year to help me sleep. I also take Ambien CR 12.5 at bedtime, but I take 30 mg amitriptyline about an hour before bed. I didn't think it was helping that much until tapered off for awhile and realized that I'm sleeping better when I take it. Nothing at all like my old "normal" sleep, but definitely better.
944: had inner ear infection, ringing in my right ear. I went from the 10 MG pill to the 25 MG pill. Not any improvement. Need something stronger.
945: I was prescribed 25mg at night for migraines.  I was never able to get to the point where my body could adjust as I was sleeping 18 hours a day.  It's just not possible to sleep that much and be a functioning human being.  I also felt disconnected/dreamy, dizzy, and nauseous.  This is not a drug that works well with my body.
946: I take it for  calming of the brain cells,that creates a   slight shaking and noise in m head
947: helps a lot on restful sleep.
948: I feel it is helping me a little my body seems like it is responding o.k.
949: I used this as a nerve block for vulvavestibulites.  It was like a miracle.  After years of intense vuvla pain that totally interfered with my daily life, one little pill stopped the pain over night.  I've been on this for years and never had to increase my dosage.
950: I took 100mg for 4 years and I gain 75 in 4 years I didn't think it was this pill at all, I quit smoking around the same time. YOU WILL SLEEP GREAT ON THIS PILL. I was working night shift so it really helped to sleep, then I moved to a state that I couldn't get health insur so easy so I ran out of my pills, I stated losing weight, I lost 55lb in 8 months still not thinking it was this pill, I moved to CA. & was able to get back on this pill & then I stated gaining weight again, NOW I AM LOOKING THIS PILL UP AND FINDING IT WILL MAKE YOU GAIN WEIGHT, I am taking 50mg now to see if it stops my weight gain, if not I will stop taking this pill and take a sleep aid. I still don,t smoke.
951: All I did is sleep I could not take care of myself loss memory
952: I have been given this drug for my Migraines and sleep problems. I have been told to take 40mg for my problems by my neurologist. Sometimes it works for me and sometimes it's terrible and i ended up staying up all night.
953: I got nothing but the jitters taking it and this feeling outweighed any help.
954: My mother has been on this drug because of shingles and the pain of them.  The small dose of this drug of 25mg at night did not affect her.  She still continued to hae pain for the shingles so the doctor increased her dose to 50mg 3x a day, and then 100mg at night.     Before she started the increased dose she had a pace maker put in. She was in the hospital for 24 hours.  After being dismissed from 1 hospital she was showing signs of confusion. I am her daughter and I stayed with her duing the rest of that day and the night.  She continued the rest of the evening to be confused.  I then had to take her to the local hospital.  They did several test including a cat scan of her brain.  It showed that she had not had a bleeding on the brain.  She had a UTI and was admitted to the hospital.      Then all of her meds were taken to the hospital which included the amitriptyline in the high doses.  She has several of the symotoms including involuntary movement of muscles including hand, arm and leg twitching while sleeping. A masked look on her face, extreme confusion, not knowing people. She had none of this until being given the amitriptline in the high doses.  I contacted the doctor and let them know that I was extremely concerned about my mother and her condition.  She was taken off the drug after being on it for 36 hours or so.  I hope that she will recover from these symptoms.  I just wanted to let you know that you should watch out for you older parents and keep a watchful eye on there medication and new symptoms.Read More Read Less
955: I was given this drug by my neurologist to help my vestibular/balance system. I suffered brain damage in an accident. This helps me to be steadier on my feet, helps to prevent the vertigo, nausea and falling that I was experiencing.
956: I am taking 10 mg for headaches. I sleep better, but am groggy a lot during the day. It helped to decrease my headaches. The side effect of nightmares including strange visual disturbances is enough to keep thinking about going without the drug. I have also gained weight, about 5 lbs, and it shows in my abdomen.
957: I use this drug for both depression and sleep issues.  It helps with both.  I had to lessen the dose due to being to tired the day.  Now I am at a effective does that does leave me to tired.  I had to increase my fiber intake to keep from becoming constipated. Overall a good drug
958: I am taking this medicine to help with sleep. I used to wake up in the middle of the night with panic attacks. Haven't had that problem since I started taking it.
959: Extreme drowsiness.
960: im tryin to gain weight
961: I have had migraines since I was 8yrs old. drug after drug nothing had worked until this drug. I get a better nights sleep since I started taking it 4 months ago. Don't wake up very quickly in the morning anymore. In fact I've slept thur my alaem a few times. Not a big deal. And I have noticed my temper has a shorter fuse. The only side effect that really bothers me is the weight gain. I have gone from a size 8 to a 12 in just the last three months. I have not changed my diet and the pounds just have added up so quickly.  Overall I am happy with the results I have gotten. From a migraine twice a week to maybe two a month. Now all I need is a drug to melt the weight without any side effects.Read More Read Less
962: I have been on this med for appr a year now and have gained 50lbs.  I went from being underweight to being overweight.  I was 98lbs when I first started taking it and am now 150lbs.  Not happy with this at all.  Had to replace wardrobe twice now.  Have now stopped taking this med even though it did help my headaches but I couldn't handle the side effects (fast weight gain).  Headaches did come back after I stopped taking this med, went to the neurologist and he put me on different meds.  Hopefully it helps and my weight will return to normal.Read More Read Less
963: i still have miagraines and i have gained alot of weight in a short period of time and i have hair all over my face. side effects out way the benefits.
964: It stopped all the pain of severe neuropathy.
965: The headache is much better but the side effects are not pleasant.
966: started this for nerve pain from a failed back surgery, help's with some nerve pain, help's me sleep better but, am kind of groggy in the morning.   started at 25mg then 50mg and up to 75mg now. get dizzy a lot feel's like I'm gonna fall so try to be careful..
967: I have had migraine headache all my life. But they away completely but the last 3 or 4 years. they have become more and more depilating. My doctor prescribed Amitriptyline; and I was really during quite well over the last 4 or 5 years. But within the last year or 2, they have come back twice as hard.  What do u think as to why they have returned in my late years of living.
968: I also get migraines,. and this drug has helped immensely!!!
969: If I hadn't started losing hair from my head from taking this medication(my doctor believed it was male pattern baldness)-it would come out in big pieces in the tub. Shortly after discontinuing this medication my hair loss stopped altogether. I told my doctor.
970: I was given this rx in addition to my other pain medications.  My Dr. said "lets give it a shot" for insomnia.  After a few adjustments, I now take 100mg at bed time.  I sleep great now...BUT...I have gained 25lbs in 3 months!! So I now have to decide if I want to be fat and sleep well, or thiner and tired all the time!  I will be discussing the weight gain issues at the next visit. It truly has helped my sleep issues amazingly well(I have suffered most of my life with insomnia), and I have taken just about every sleeping pill known to man. I just am not happy with the major weight gain.  Read More Read Less
971: I had depression and anxiety pretty bad after loosing my mother in law to cancer recently which opened up old wounds in me from my own mother dying from cancer when i was a little girl. I cried so much and worried my self to death about getting cancer or some incurable disease and dying from it and im only 24. I also never slept. I started using this drug about six months ago and i sleep good and feel much better. I dont worry so much about every thing. only side effect i had was i didnt want to get up in the mornings but once i got up and got going i was fine. zoloft and lexapro made me nauseous and dizzy. I am very happy to say that i hadnt had any effects like that from this drug. it truly helped me.Read More Read Less
972: This medication is ideal for me.  I use it primarily for nerve pain.  I have had four back surgeries and now I am living with permanent nerve damage.  I also suffer from a form of depression called Dysthemia. This medication has been extremely helpful to me with both nerve damage and severe depression.  Thanks for reading,    Antonio
973: TERRIBLE EXPERIENCE FOR OVER 10 YEARS. BAD THOUGHTS AND WORSE DEPRESSION. SPEECH PROBLEMS. DIZINESS,SEVERE VISION PROBLEMS. THOUGHTS OF SUICIDE. THIS IS THE ONLY DRUG OUT THERE THAT CAN MAKE ME SLEEP AND ADDICTING SLEEPING PILLS ONLY KEEP ME UP ALL NIGHT. ONE 100 MG AMITRIPTYLINE WITH A 2 MG XANAX IS THE ONLY WAY I CAN SLEEP. IF I GO WITHOUT I WILL STAY UP FOR 10-15 NIGHTS. I WENT OFF THEM LAST MONTH AND NEVER PLAN TO TAKE THEM AGAIN.THEY CAUSE CONFUSION ALL THE TIME AND HAVE RUINED EPISODES OF MY LIFE AND CAUSED ME TO HAVE SERIOUS FALLING ACCIDENTS AND MEMORY AND EVERYDAY THINKING PROBLEMS. THIS PILL IS WORSE THAN ANY ADICTING DRUGS AND IS VERY ADDICTING BY ITSELF WITH EVERY IMAGIONABLE SIDE EFFECT IN ALL THE PILLS I'VE EVER TAKEN. ALSO, MAJOR WEIGHT GAIN WAS ANOTHER SIDE EFFECT BUT THE WORST SIDE EFFECT IS THE WAY THIS DRUG STAYS IN YOUR BLOOD AND MAKES YOUR MIND TOTALLY OUT THERE. I TAKE PROZAC AS AN ANTIDEPRESSANT BUT WAS PUT ON AMITRIPTYLINE FOR SLEEP AND IT IS VERY VERY ADDICTING AND THE WITHDRAWLS ARE THE WORST OF ANY SLEEPING PILL. PHARMACISTS AND SOME DOCTORS KNOW THIS AND I BELIEVE IT SHOULD BE PULLED FROM THE MARKET. IT HAS RUINED MANY YEARS OF MY LIFE.Read More Read Less
974: I wake up in the mornings with my head to about to blow up.And I have to lay back down to sleep it off,real bad headaches,and have small headaches all day long,,
975: Like the 44yr old woman's review, my story is very similar.  I am 32 and have suffered migraines since age 5.  I've taken this medicine for several years now and am searching for something else.  This med doesn't prevent as many migraines as I'd like, it causes drowsiness, uncontrollable body movements, dry mouth which leads to tooth decay, constipation, ringing in ears, cold fingers & toes and irritability.  I would not recommend taking this for migraine prevention unless you have no other options.Read More Read Less
976: I have used this madicin for 3 years, this did not work for which doctor has prescribe me but believe me it was like miracle to me. I was able to get proper sleep, muscle was growing faster, suddenly I was able to score too good grades in collage, able focus on things I do. Feeling happy and fearless. Everything was going great, but its blurred my vision,that's not good going. When I stop taking this madicin now every thing changed back to normal.  It is dangerous to take for longer time because it will Blur vision, kidney problems and Liver. Once I stop I could not able to sleep well and mood is changing.   Better continue with small dose it u don't face blurry vision or don't have eye sight problem   Other wise this madicin is like miracleRead More Read Less
977: My wife calls Amitriptyline "Zombi Juice."  I started with a 75 mg dose. Cured my insomnia, neuropathy pain, pain from severe osteorarthitis. WARNING: The only side effect was a DRYMOUTH.  I am diligent about cleaning my teeth, but after 5 months on this med I went in for a teeth cleaning.  I found out that the drymouth caused severe decay.  I am now facing a $9,500.00 dental bill to replace 6 crowns, one bridge plus a root canal. I now take a 25 mg dose and have less "drymouth."
978: this medication makes me really lethargic,yet it does help me to sleep better and more hours at night,as for the depression,it doesnt really help tht much,the headaches it works pretty good for,but not as good as other medications ive tried.
979: I have found no change in treatment of migranes;still getting the same amount.
980: My 83 year old mum is diabetic, has high blood pressure, high platelet count and arthritis. This med was prescribed by her dr after she complained of knee pain. During the first week of taking, she was ok.On the 8th day, she was extremely agitated and wakeful during the nite and went without sleep for more than 24 hours. She was also hallucinating, speaking to people who were not there. When she was finally able to sleep, she seemed unable to stay awake. She slept continuously and had the masked face look. Also, her skin seems pale and she seems uninterseted in her surroundings.We have decided to take her off the medication.Read More Read Less
981: My husband has just recently stating taking this medication. He has declared leagally blind, and is also diabetic, with high blood pressure,and end stage kidney failure. All of this accurred before he turned 40 yrs old this February.
982: I was put on this med for severe migraines. It immediately stopped the migraines. My Doc wanted me to take 25mg a day, I did and after a couple weeks I started feeling dizzy & had night terrors. Doc said inc dosage to 1 1/2 tablets a day, I did. Everything fine,now I am back to worse night Terrors & feeling extremely strange! I am getting OFF this med, I feel as worse now as I did before getting on this med! I would not recommend this med to anyone! Going to deal with my migraine some other way! Read More Read Less
983: Just take one get good rest wake up no headaches or mirgraine
984: In addition to typical dry mouth and other relatively minor effects, this drug DESTROYED my 20-20 eyesight, caused a rapid and sustained/chronic enlargement of the prostate, night sweats, huge recurring hives, skin irritation and chronic ear ringing of an intolerable level.  Began the use of this medication in 1988.  I used the drug for two years and I still have the complications today.  I would add that I was not suffering from depression when the drug was prescribed.  I can't believe that this drug is still being prescribed...but considering that our medical professionals prescribe Warfarin...what can we expect.Read More Read Less
985: I was prescribed this medication for two different reasons. Primarily it was prescribed to help prevent migraines, which it does a great job at. Secondly, for insomnia, which is a bit iffy, but not horrible. I’ve been on this medication for a few months now and I have many notes.

1. Every morning I wake up with dry eyes, dry mouth. Dry mouth leads to my throat becoming sore because I talk constantly at work. 

2. As another person mentioned, I am incredibly irritable. I am usually a cheerful woman, but as of late, I get irritable with everyone very quickly and over silly things. 

3. This medication has caused me to have tachycardia. Last night I took a trip to urgent care (for unrelated issues) but they were more concerned with my BPM which was averaging 135-142 while resting. I was not nervous, just didn’t feel well. I have made notes to my significant other many times about my heart rate seeming abnormally high for no reason. Doing very mundane tasks causes my heart rate to soar. It usually feels like I can’t satisfyingly breath. 

Overall, this medication works for my migraines, but when it comes to side effects like tachycardia (which can put a lot of stress on your heart if it goes on for an extended period of time) it’s not worth it in my opinion. Not every person who takes Amitriptyline will experience tachycardia, but please be aware that it CAN happen. If you already have underlying health issues with your heart, this can be incredibly dangerous
986: I was diagnosed with fibromyalgia and was originally prescribed this medication. I refused to take it at first because I had taken it years ago with very bad side effects and results.  Reluctantly, I tried it again.  After 3 days of taking this I flushed the entire prescription down the toilet.  I constantly felt too stupid and "doped up" to funtion at work, fell asleep at my desk, and almost fell asleep driving.  I couldnt think and constantly had terrible brain fog.
987: I initially went off of this because of rapid weight gain. I am a person that has only fluctuates 5 pounds and only gained 15 pounds during pregnancy. Knowing this could cause weight, I was careful with what I ate, yet still gained 10 pounds in 6 weeks (all around my abdomen). Besides the weight gain, I did feel a little more "snappy" than typical - like more easily fly off the handle. As long as I took this around dinner and got 8 hours of sleep, I did not feel too "zombied" the next day. I went off and continued to try other classes of drugs, but found my body could not tolerate them. I am going to go back on temporarily (10 mg/day) while I get through a this difficult time in my life. I will deal with the weight gain later when I come off. It does help with sleeping, calming my racing mind, and lessen my body aches I experience from the depression/stress/anxiety, and generally give me a little more energy.   Read More Read Less
988: Only side effects really were the increased craving for sweets and dry mouth.  Did not work to stop my headaches.  Giving it the rest of the month to start working, but from what I hear it usually starts working immediately, so I am discouraged.
989: i was taking this medication to help with my depression and sleep issues. it helped with both but i had horrible nightmares that my husband would have to wake me up to get out of them. i would wake him up screaming and kicking. when he was able to wake me up i felt like i was being attacked by someone and woke up terrified. it also gave me very bad anxiety attacks. i am bipolar and wasnt sure if that made a diffrence in how the drug affected me or not. it worked fine up until about 6 months after i started taking it
990: i wasn't sleeping but 3 to 4 hours at a time. without proper rest my fibrolgia flares up. then i have horible pain.
991: I have pains in the nights near my ears when I lie down to sleep only.  My doctor says it is trigeminal neuralgia.  I also have trouble sleeping.  This medicine helps me to sleep so much better and it relieves the pain near my ears.
992: I started taking this a couple of weeks ago for fibromyalgia.  I haven't noticed too much of a difference in being able to fall asleep, however I have noticed that it has been harder to wake up and I am tired all day.  I have had the brain fog and it hasn't even really helped with the pain.  I'm getting off of it tonight.  It's not worth it.  I want my life back.
993: This was originally prescribed for preventing grinding of my teeth at night - but found an excellent side effect - it relieves restless leg syndrom completely!
994: I started taking this medication for tension headaches and it has worked great.  I have had no side affects and one added benefit has been that I sleep deeper and wake up feeling better.  I would definitely recommend giving this medication a chance if troubled by tension headaches.
995: I had nerve pain in my upper thigh area from an unknown cause. Within a week the pain subsided to where it was occurring intermittently and after two weeks the pain was gone completely. I was given a two month supply. I hope the pain does not return after the pills are exhausted.
996: This medication was prescribed for insomnia. It has not helped at all. Ambien is better but not long lasting.
997: It has helped my chronic pain in shoulders and neck. Stopped me from aching and helps me sleep better.
998: I have taken it about 6-8 months now.
999: I was taking this medicine for sleep and it works very well I was on 25mg but splitting it in half at night. I noticed a high pitch buzzing in my ear and decided to look it up on the internet and looked at the side effects and it was one of the severe side effects. Has anyone else had this problem?
1000: I have been taking this for fibromyalgia for about two years, to help me sleep. It does work to keep me asleep. Just in the last few month I have noticed more side effects. Fast heartbeat and swelling, sore breasts. Not sure will continue with this med or not.
1001: JUST DRY MOUTH
1002: I have been taking this Rx for quite a while. My Dr. recently increased my dosage not only for the fibromyalgia pain but also to help me fall asleep faster & have a deeper, more restful sleep.
1003: I started this medication 12-28 with 2 tab a day 1 week, then 2 a day for week, then 3 a day for a week then 4 etc. I just increased to 3 yesterday. I've gained no weight but am craving sweets. Having dreams at night, but not too bad to deal with. Still have pain but might bedeminished somewhat. More time is needed to really determine effectiveness. I'm not having to take as much vicodan, and soma.
1004: When I take this medicine  I have a tendency to get restless legs. What can I do about this?
1005: I am very tired
1006: i suffered major depression. other medications did not work but this one did. thank god
1007: I take this med for migraines. Started in January 2012. The only thing it did was make me feel like a zombie every day with continued migraines every 2-3 weeks. Since that last migraine in May I've had none. What a relief. However I've gained 20# in this 8 months. At gym 4 times a week for past 2 months and feel as if I'm fighting a losing battle. I, like others mention, crave sweets I have never wanted in my life! I sleep like a baby, but will talk with the Dr on next visit about decreasing dose so I'm not so groggy the next day and maybe get some weight off.Read More Read Less
1008: When first taking this medication (10 mg for a week increased to 20 mg), I felt tired all over and I was questioning why I was taking it but the next few days were great! I sleep great every night and I haven't had a migraine yet and its been over 2 months. I still occasionally get daily headaches but none are as bad. I would recommend this medication but luckily I haven't had any of the horrendous side effects others have had. I am fearing the day where I have to stop taking this drug
1009: I've used this for Irritable Bowel Syndrome and I'm 99% better.
1010: It reduced the frequency of my migraine headaches.  If you take it mid night it will help you sleep and helps with insomnia.
1011: helpful to obtain sleep
1012: I have been on 10 mg for 7 months,doctor put me up to 25mg 2 months ago and I am having all of these side effects ,very fast heartbeat,decreased sexual ability,ringing in my ears,shaking,very thirty, can`t sleep and i feel like fainting alot of the time
1013: helps my headaches but weight gain is starting to really bother me most of the weight is in the stomach wish i could find something to take care of that.
1014: I take it because of not sleeping well. Now I have fibro and have to use it.  I have gained alot of weight. I asked my doctor and she said it dosen't make you gain weight, but listening to some of these people gain weight also.  I don't believe my doctor at all about this
1015: I'm sleeping, that's about it. I haven't noticed a change in depression, not really any side effects. It puts my mind to sleep, but maybe that's all I need right now...
1016: I feel better..but I have trouble swallowing this little pill....it gets stuck in the back of my throat and burns very badly... that lasts for about 1 hour. Very uncomfortable.
1017: I first started taking 1 pill at night for migraines. It worked but they started up again. Now I take a pill and a half at night, but I'm just realizing the side effects. I thought they were from something else but now it makes sense. The worst of my problems was the migraines but idk if I can keep dealing with the swelling in my ankles, blurred vision, dry mouth, and especially the weight gain. Before my dosage was increased I had lost about 20 lbs now I've gained back about 10. I'm still working out 4 days a week and eating healthy but it's a little unbearable knowing that the 1 thing that's actually helping is also kinda hurting me.Read More Read Less
1018: At first I was apprehensive about taking this drug, but now I an sleep at night (all night) without my leg and body jumping or the burn in feet.
1019: I could not sleep after I took this medication.  I was unable to function and experienced horrific hallucinations - even when I closed my eyes.  This is not a symptom I have experience with other anti-depressants.
1020: I use it for IC
1021: I was taking this for a back injury. I had the worse reaction. I thought I was having a stroke. I went numb down my whole right side. I could not speak and my face was twitching,I was short of breath. I went to the hospital and was told I was having anxiety attacks. They said it was a severe side effect to the medication. I rather be in pain then to ever have to take that medicine again.
1022: I am taking this drug for incontinence. After 5 weeks I see no improvement. My side effects are dizziness, fast heart beat, shortness of breath.
1023: I have found this drug has helped my fybromialgia although it was prescribed for IBS. IT HAS ALSO MADE A DIFFERENCE TO MY IBS BUT NOT AS GOOD AS I EXPECTED
1024: I have taken this for about six months now (10mg) I take it for severe and daily migrains. I do not have them but maybe once a month now. I have had few side effects. I get tired alot durring the day (may be unrelated to this drug)
1025: I was put on this to relieve my fibromyalgia, but sadly, I couldn't stay on the medication long enough for it to work. I get sleep paralysis some nights, but when I started amitriptyline, about 1 week later, my sleep paralysis episodes occurred every night, were harder to escape from, lasted longer, and I was more likely to hallucinate. They also caused agitation, panic, anxiety, paranoia, crying, and episodes of extreme fear. My nan took these for restless legs syndrome and it caused her to have jaundice, chills, and stomach cramps. However, my mum takes them for cluster headaches, and they work very well for her, and aside from weight gain and an occasional dry mouth, she has no other side-effects, so I personally do not know whether to recommend this drug, but if you do decide to take it, do so at your own risk, baring in mind what it can cause for you.Read More Read Less
1026: The first 2-3 weeks of taking this medicine I was very tired all of the time. I would sleep for hours.
1027: I STARTED SUFFERING FROM HEADACHES A FEW YEARS AGO. THEY WOULD BE WITH ME ALL DAY EVERYDAY. MED REALLY HELPED AND GOT RID OF THE HEADACHES STARIGHT AWAY, SLEEP BETTER. HOWEVER STARTED TO NOW NOTICE THAT I GET ILL FREQUENTY. VERY DRY MOUTH WHICH HAS LED TO GUMS BEING VERY SORE AND BLEEDING.AM ALWAYS TIRED BUT WHAT I FEAR THE MOST IS THT I AM STARTING TO GET ANGRY OVER LITTLE THINGS NOW AND ITS GETTING WORSE. FINALLY AS MOST PEOPLE I HAD QUITE ALOT OF WEIGHT GAIN, ABOUT 2STONE OVER 2 YEARS HOWEVER WTH EXERCISE AND GOOD EATING HABITS HAVE NOW LOST THE WEIGHT. IS HAS HELPED SO MUCH WITH THE HEADACHES BUT IS NOW CAUSEING ME ALOT OF OTHER PROBS. BUT SO FAR NOTHING ELSE IS AS EFFECTIVE AS THIS FOR MY HEADACHES BUT MAY HAVE TO TRY SOMETHING ELSE.Read More Read Less
1028: This med help 100% for my migraines. Never had a migraine for the time I was on it.  It also helped well for my depression.  The only thing I hated about it was I gained about 20 lbs. while taking it. Felt very sluggish from wieght gain.
1029: Started on 10mg. for sleep and anxiety. Worked very well. Over the years have increased to 20mg which produced side effects of shakiness, ringing in ears, cold hands & feet, heartburn, fast heartbeat, some nausea. As for weight gain, yes but minor and controlled with excercise and watching what you eat. If I don't take it , I don't sleep very well and my fibromyalgia pain flares up. Will be talking to Dr for alternative, but unfortunately most other sleep medications are very habit forming and not recommended for long term.Read More Read Less
1030: I've been taking this for years for migraines.  I have tried anti-seizure drugs and high blood pressure meds also and this stuff is the best.  I have not experienced any weight gain.  If I happen to make the mistake of forgetting to get a refill, the return of my headaches is immediate and severe.
1031: Started taking this drug 15 years ago, 150mg. Have slowly gone to lower doses over the years. Can't tell any difference except I am having sleeping problems now. Have been off (25mg dose) for a month now. I had gained weight slowly, total of 40 pounds in 15 years. I am not a real exerciser, so that could be part of the problem. I am a 65 year old female with the thinking of a 35 years old! I thought when I stopped taking it that I might have more back pain but I don't.  So my advice to you is don't stay on it a long time in case it isn't really helping you with pain.Read More Read Less
1032: I took amitriptyline for tension headaches that plagued me daily.  The headaches would come on in the late afternoon; usually the worst pain was between 5-8pm.  Started with 10mg, worked my way up to 50mg, and then after 2 years, withdrew by 10mg until off after five-six weeks.  Withdraw made me anxious, but the worst was over after only 2 weeks - make sure you plan a good exercise, hydrate, and health eating plan during this 2 week period.  Overall, the drug helped and got rid of the headaches, but the daily grogginess made me want to quit and i quit successfully
1033: I used to get 3 totally disabling hemiplegic migraines per week, I was prescribed Rizatriptan at first, however it did not work to help after my migraines had already started. A new doctor wanted to try preventative measures and prescribed Amitriptyline, since then, 3 years later, I have not had a migraine and I've only had to increase my dosage one time. The only side effect that has bothered me is drowsiness, but I take it at night so that's never been a huge problem/
1034: I have been taking this drug for 8 months to prevent migraines.  I was waking up in the middle of the night with severe migraines. I was taking 25mg but it made me feel the next day very tired, no motiviation. So the doctor had me cut the pill in half and its much better.  I am very pleased with the outcome.
1035: I was given this to decrease the mumber of times to urinate and for kidney stones. I curently take it for neurlogic pain and it works, but for urinary systoms----????????
1036: I have tinnitus(ringing in the ears).  My ENT doctor prescribed this for me to eleviate the ringing. I can say that this medication has not helped at all.  There is not an effective medication for tinnitus.  He gave it to me for the side effects of the tinnitus.  No help.  What I am finding out about this medication is that I do not need to use Ambien for sleep.  It helps me better than Ambien. I can say that if it does not work for one reason it works for another.
1037: I take 75mg of Amitriptyline at night and it's worked pretty well for me. It helps me fall asleep which I struggle greatly with and also helps me stay asleep. I noticed I snore and my sleep apnea was worse on the higher dose of 150mg someone may need to have someone monitor their sleep if they are on a high dose and have sleep apnea. But the 75mg works well. I am groggy most mornings but I can live with this side effect if that's the only one.
1038: how lon it takes to get the toxic out your system.I did stop using it,so and could somebody tell me,how long it takes to get out your system?I don't want to be addict to it.Is this the purpose to be addict,so the Drug co. could make tons of money.Legal drugs usage?
